http://www.rezabastani.ir
IRANIAN CIVIL CODE
Articles 1 to 1335
PREAMBLE
On the Publication, effects and execution of laws in general.
Article 1,
Laws must be Published within three days of their receiv-
ing the royal consent.
Article 2,
In Tehran Jaws must be Put into force ten days after
publication, and in the Provinces after the expiry of a fiiroiJar
Period Plus one day for every Six farsakhs (36 Kilometers) that a
PJace is distant from Tehran, unless the law itself embodies a
' ,
special Provision as to the date of its entry into force.
Article 3.
The text of laws must be Published in the official Journal.
Artlele 4.
A J.aw shall be effective only as from the date of its coming
into force, and shall not be retrospective, unless special provisions
to this effect have been laid down in its text.
Article 5,
All inhabitants of Iran, whether of Iranian or of foreign
nationality, shall be subject to the laws of Iran except in cases
which the law has excepted.
Article 6.
The laws relating to Personal status, such as marriage,
divorce, capacity and inheritance, shall be observed by all Iranian
subjects, even if resident abroad.
Article '1.
Foreing nationals resident in Iranian territory shall, within
the limits laid down by :treaties, be bound by the laws and decrees
of the Government to which they are subject in questions relating
to their Personal status and capacity, and slroUarly in questions
• relating to rights of inheritance.
Arilele 8.
Immovable Property, of which foreign nationals have
~-' ,,.---
~--
2l'
.'
It•
taken Possession or shall take Possession under the terms of.trea-
ties, shall in every respect come within the scope of the laws of ·
Iran.
Article 9,
Treaty stipulations which have been, in accordance with
the Fundamental Law, concluded between the Iranian Govern-
ment and other Governments shall have the force of law:
Article 10,
•
Private contracts shall be binding on those who have signed
them, providing they are not contrary to the explicit provisio~
of a law.
VOLUME I
CONCERNING PROPERTY
BOOK I
GENERAL PROVISIONS CONCERNING OWNERSHIP
CHAPTER I
In definition of the various kinds of property..
Article 11,
Property is of two kinds, movable and immovable.
SECTION 1
CONCERNING IMMOVABLE PROPERTY
Article 12.
•
Immovable property is that which cannot be transported
from place to place either because it is the nature .of the thing
to be fixed in one place or because, as the result of human action,
the moving of it would necessarily involve damage or injury either
to the property itself or its emplacement.
Article 13,
Land and buildings and mills and everything wich is fixed
in a· building and is by common use considered a part of it are
immovable, and similarly pipes which have been laid under the
ground or in a building for carrying water or for other purposes
are to be accounted immovable.
Article 14.
•
.
Mirrors, painted curtains, statues and similar Objects, in
so f8a' as they are attached .to the· ground or to a building in such
23"' "
·J ,,-~,
.,.,
;. -· ,_-~Jj.L ·
-~i}t
http://www.rezabastani.ir
\ Y' \
a way that their removal would cause injury or damage to them
or to their emplacements, are considered immovable.
Article 15.
Fruit and crops shall be deemed immovable provided that
they have not been picked or reaped, and if a portion shall have
been picked or reap,ed, only that portion shall be accounted
movable.
Article 16.
.
In general. trees and the branches thereof, young plants,
and cuttings as long as they have not been cut or dug up, be con-
sidered immovable.
Article 17.
Animals and equipment which the owner shall have provided
specifically for cultivation such as oxen, buffal.oes, machines, im-
plements and appurtenances of husbandry, seeds etcet.era, and in
general all movable goods which are necessary for the prosecution
of farming operations and have been devoted by the owner ex-
clusively to this purpose shall, for purposes of competency of
courts and of attachment of property, be considered as forming
part of the landed property and shall be treated as immovable
property, as also shall pumps, oxen and other animals, appropria-
ted for the irrigation of fields, houses and gardens.
Article 18.
Rights of benefit from immovable objects such as a life
interest. the right of residence and siroiJarly the rights of easement
(JVer the land of another, such as the rights of passage and of
transit of water and rights derived from immovable property such
as demands for eviction and simUar applications, shall follow the
rules concerning immovable property.
SECTION 2
CONCERNING MOVABLE PROPERTY
Arilcle 19.
Articles which it is possible to transport from place to
place, without causing damage either to the articles themselves:.or
to their emplacements, are considered movable.
.&rUcle 20.
All debts arising out of loans, or the price of things sold,
24.or the rent of things leased shall, for purposes of competency of
courts, be considered movable, even if the thing sold or rented is
itself immovable.
Article 21.
Ships, large and small, boats, mills and bathhouses, plying
on or situated on rivers or seas, and capable of movement and all
work places which, in view of the manner of their construction
do not form part of a permanent building, shall be accounted
movable, but the att.achment of certain of the above-mentioned.
may, in view of their importance, be carried out in accordance with .
special arrangements.
Article 22.
Building materials such as stone, bricks etc., which have
been prepared for use or because of some defect have become
' separated from the building, so long as they have not been em-
bodied in tb,e building, shall be considered movable.
SECTION 3
CONCERNING PROPERTY WHICH HAS NO PRIVATE OWNER
Article 23.
Benefit from property which has no private owner shall
be taken in accordance with the relevant laws.
Article :U.
No one shall take possession of common roads and high-
ways, nor of streets of which one end is not closed.
Article 25.
No one may take possession of property which se1:'Ves the
common good and which has no private owner, such as bridges,
caravanserais, public reservoirs, ancient schools, and public open
places. And the same applies to the aqueducts "ghanats" and wells
of wich the use is public.
Article 26.
Government property which is disposed for the public ser-
vice and profit such as fortifications, fortresses, moats, mllita.cy
earthworks, arsenals, weapons, stores, warships, and similarly the
furniture and buildings of the royal family, government buildings
and .telegraph wires, museums, public libraries, historical monu-
ments and similar objects, in brief whatever property movable
25,, ".. ,·. .,.
,. .;., . ;. t~~-- .
! ·,:--
http://www.rezabastani.ir
IV' V
or immovable, is in use by the Government for the service of the
public and the profit of the state, may not be privately owned. And
the same provisions shall apply to property which shall have been
appropriated for the public service by provincial, district or muni-
cipal authorities.
Article 2'1.
The appropriation of property which is not private pro-
perty and which private individuals, acting in accordance with the
regu]atk>ns contained in this law and the special laws dealing with
each particular category, take into their possession and exploit,
shall be termed permissible, and under this beading shall come
waste lands, that is say lands whi~h have fallen into disuse and on
which are neither habitations nor cultivation.
Article 28.
Property of unknown ownership shall be devoted to the
needs of the poor, subject to the judge's permission or that of a
• person authorised by him.
CHAPTER II
Concerning the various rights which accrue to persons from
the possession of property.
Article 29.
It is possible for people to derive the following rights from
prop.erty;-
1. The right of possession (whether of the substance of
the tbing or its benefit.)
2. The usufruct or the right of exploitation.
3. Rights of easement or the servitude in the property of
another.
SECTION 1
CONCERNING OWNERSHIP
Arilcle 30.
Every owner has unlimited rights of occupation and ex-
ploitation over his property except in matters in which the law
has made an exception.
Article 31
No property can be alienated from the possession of its
owner except in accordance with a legal ord,er.
26
'http://www.rezabastani.ir
I Y' '\
Article 32
All products and appurtenances of the property whether
movable or immovabie, produced naturally or as the result of ex-
ploitation, are the property of the owner.
Article 33
Products and crops which have come out of the ground
are the property of th,e owner of the land, whether their growth is
natural or the result of the owner's operations, unless the product
or crop has sprung from the roots or s~eds of another party. If
this is the cas,e the trees or crops shall be the property of the owner
of the roots or seeds, even if they have been sown without the
approval of the owner of the land.
Article 34
The progeny of animals shall be of the same ownership
as the mother, and whoev.er is the owner of the mother shall be
considered the owner of the offspring.
Article 35
Possession by title. of ownership shall be taken as proof
of ownership unless the contrary be proved.
Article 36
Possession which is proved not to be derived from a title
to ownership nor from a lawful transfer, shall have no validity.
Article 37
If the present occupier admits that the property formerly
belonged to the claimant, he cannot, urge, in refutation of the
other's claim, his own occupation of the property, unless he can
prove that the property has been transferred to him according to
the correct procedure.
Article 38
The ownership of ground carries with it the ownership of
the air immediately above it up to any height, and the same ap-
plies to the area under the ground; in brief, the owner has unlimi-
ted rights of possession in the air and the ground, unless the law
shall have made provision to the contrary.
Article 39
All buildings and trees above the ground and all buildings
and excavations beneath the ground shall be considered the pro-
perty of the owner of the ground unless the contrary be proved.
27I\" o
SECTION 2
CONCERNING THE RIGHT USUFRUCT OR THE OF EXPLOITATION
Article 40
The usufruct or the right of exploitation comprises the
right by which a person may derive profit from property which
either belongs in proprietary right to someone else or has no special
owner.
SUB - SECTION 1
Concerning life-rights, (Roghba), rights for a prescribed
period and rights of occupation
Article 41
A life right (Omra) is a right of exploitation which has
been established by means of a contract entered into by the owner
in favour of someone, either for his own lifetime or for the lifetime
of the user or that of a third party.
, Article 42
"
A right for a presoribed period (Roghba) is usufruct or
a right of exploitation which the owner grants for a limited time.
Article 43
If the usufruct or the right of exploitation includes the right
of occupying a habitation, it is termed residential or the right of
habitation (Sokna) and it is permissible for this right to be as-
signed as a life right or as a right for a limited period.
Artlele 44
In cases where the owner has not prescribed a time-limit
for the . usufruct or the right of exploitation, the surrender is
absolute, and the said right shall run untill the death of the own.er
unless he revokes the surrender before his d,eath.
Artiele 45
In the above mentioned cases it is only permissible for the
•usufruct or the right of exploitation to be granted on behalf of a
Pifil'S<>n or persons who were alive at the time of the creation of
the said right, but it is also possible for the right of exploitation
to·, follow on in succession for persons who were not alive at the
time of the conclusion of the contraot, and as long as the own,ers
of the usufruct or the right of exploit.ation are alive it shall be
valid; and after their decease it shall. lapse.

IRANIAN CIVIL CODE
SUB-SECTION 2
CONCERNING ENDOWMENT
Article 55.
An endowment consists in the surrender of the property,
and the devotion of its profits to some purpose.
Article 56.
An endowment takes place when the bequeather of pious
foundation makes an offer by any form of words which definitely
carry this meaning and when the first generation of beneficiaries,
or their legal representatives if they are limited in number, as
in the case of children, accept it; or if the beneficiaries are un-
limited in number or the endowment be made for the benefit of
the public, then the acceptance of the judge is required.
Article 57.
The bequeather of pious foundation must be the owner
of the property to be endowed and, in addition, must be possessed
of capacity to contract and to make valid transactions.
Article 58.
It is permissible to endow only such property as can be
exploited without detriment to its existence, whether it be movable·
or immovable, held in undivided shares or divided up.
Article 59.
If the endower does not hand the substance of the endow-
ment over to the possession of the foundation to which it has been
bequeathed, the endowment is not yet completed, but once it has
been delivered the endowment is authentic.
Article 60.
In respect of delivery, urgency is not essential: so long as
the bequeather of pious foundation has not revoked the endow-
ment, whenever delivery is given the endowment become final.
http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 61.
When the endowment takes place in the proper form and
is delivered it is binding and the endower is not permitted to revoke.
it nor to make any alterations in it, nor may he expel any one of
the beneficiaries, nor make any new benneficiaries, nor appoint
anyone to share with the beneficiaries; nor, if in the text of the
agreement the administrator is not specified, may he appoint
an administrator, nor may he interfere in the capacity of adminis-
trator.
Article 62.
•
In the event of the beneficiaries being limited in number
they themselves shall take delivery, and delivery to the first genera-
tion shall be sufficient; and if the beneficiaries. are unlimited or
the bequest is to be devoted to the public use, either the adrniniS-:
trator or the judge shall take delivery.
Article 63.
The guardian and executor of persons who are . under
disability will take delivery of the endowed property on their behalf
and if the bequeather of pious foundation has reserved the office
of administrator to himself, then the fact of his taking delivery
shall suffice.
Article 64.
Property of which the profits are temporarily granted to
· another party can be the object of an endowment, and sirnUarly
it is permissible to endow landed property to which a right of
easement is attached, without prejudicing the said right.
Article 65.
The validity of an endowment which may result to the
detriment of the endower's creditors, is dependent on the permi-.
ssion of the credtors.
Article 68.
An endowment for an unlawful purpose is null and void.
Article 67.
The endowment of property of which it is not possible to
give and take delivery is null and void, but if the l>equeather- :c5f
·2.6http://www.rezabastani.ir
1-.Y
pious foundation alone is not capable of taking and giving delivery,
but the beneficiary is capable of taking delivery, then such an
endowment is valid.
Article 68.
Anything which, either by nature or in accordance with
usage and custom is reckoned as forming part of the dependencies
and appurtenances of the endowed property, is included in the
endowment, unless the endower has made special provision to
the contrary, in the sense mentioned in the Chapter concerning
Sales.
Article 69.
An endowment for the benfit of non-existent persons is in-
valid, unless it follows in succession from living beneficiaries.
Article 70.
If an endowment is made jointly to persons who do not
exist and to persons living, it is valid in so far as it concerns the
living and null and void in so far as it concerns those who do not
exist.
Article 71.
Endowments to persons unknown have no validity.
Article 72.
An endowment for the benefit of the bequeather of pious
foundation himself in such a way that the endower makes himself
the sole beneficiary or one of the beneficiaries or provides for the
payment of his debts or other obligations out of the profits of the
endowed is null and void, whether it is concerned with his life-
time or with the period after his decease.
Article 73.
Endowments to children, relatives, servants or guests and
so on, are valid.
Article 74.
In the case of an endowment for the public use, if the
endower also becomes entitled to benefit under the endowment
he .is. permitted to benefit.

Article 75.
The bequeather of pious foundation may reserve to him~
self the trusteeship- that is to say the management of the affairs
of the property - either for his lifetime or for some specified period,
and also may appoint as guardian some other person who either
independently or in conjunction with the bequeather of pious
foundation shall administer the property. The guardianship of
the endowed property may be handed over to one or more persons
other than the bequeather af pious foundation who will carry out
the administration either individually or jointly, and similarly
the bequeather of pious foundation may lay down the condition
that he himself or the trustee appointed, may arrange for an ad-
ministrator, or may make provision for any arrangement to this
end which he shall consider proper.
Article 76.
Anyone whom the endower has designated as administrator
has the option, in the first instance, of accepting or refusing the
trusteeship: once he has accepted he cannot withdraw; and, once
he has refused, it is as if he had never been designated as ad-
ministrator.
Article 77.
In any case in which the endower has vested the trustee-
ship in two or more persons independently, when one of them
deceases, the other or others take possession individually ~d if
it be laid down that such taking possession shall be collective,
then an act of taking possession on the part of any one of the
trustees shall not be valid unless it has the approval of the other
or others, and after the death of one of them the judge shall
appoint a person to be added to the survivors in order that they
jointly enter into possession.
Article 78.
The bequeather of pious foundation may appoint a super-
vising trustee without whose knowledge and approval no admi-
nistrative act may take place.
Article 79.
Neither the endower nor the judge can remove an adminis-
trator who has been specifically appointed in the deed of endow-
28http://www.rezabastani.ir
,;~·.·1'
·-.:,tk''.•
;'
.
'
~---------·------·---·----------- ---- --------
ment, unless such a right shall have been provided for, and if the
administrator be shown to be dishonest, the judge shall co-opt a
trustee.
Article 80.
If the endower has made a special provision concerning
the attributes of the administrator, and the administrator loses
those attributes, he ceases to act as an administrator.
Article 81.
In the case of endowment to the public, if the bequeather
of pious foundation has not appointed a trustee, the management
of the affairs of the endowed property shall be carried on in the
manner prescribed in Article 6 of the law of the 28th Shaabai:;i
1328 (September 4th 1910) but in the case of endowments to
private individuals if there is no special trustee, the supervision
is incumbent on the beneficiaries themselves.
Article 82.
In all cases in which the endower has made special arrange-
ments for the management of the estate, the administrator shall
carry out these arrangements, and if no arrangements are laid
down, he shall act with regard to repairs, leases, and the collection
. of profits and their division among the beneficiaries and the main-
tenance of the property and so on, like a trustworthy agent.
Article 83.
The administrator may not entrust the trusteeship to
another unless the endower has given permission in the text of
the deed of endowment, but if in the deed of endowment it is not
stipulated that he shall personally administer the property he
may appoint an agent.
Article 84.
It is permissible for the endower to make provision for a
portion of the profits of the estate to be devoted to the remuneration
of the trustee, and if no remuneration for the trustee has been
specified, the administrator is entitled to a fair remuneration.
Article 85.
After the profits of the estate have been realised and
29http://www.rezabastani.ir
apportioned, each of the beneficiaries specified may take possession
of ~ portion, even if the administrator withholds permission,
unless the bequeather of pious foundation has made such permi-
ssion a condition of possession.
Article 86.
Should the bequeather of pious foundation not have made
special provision, the expenses for upkeep and repairs and for
the operations necessary for the exploitation of the estate shall
be a prior charge before the ri~hts of the beneficiaries.
Article 87.
The bequeather of pious foundation may lay down that
~e profits of the estate be divided between the beneficiaris equally
or unequally, or that the division shall be made at the discretion
of the trustee or of some other person to divide the profits as he
thinks best.
Article 88.
The sale of the estate in the event of its· suffering damage,
or of fears being entertained that damage will be incurred of such
a kind as to render it incapable of exploitation is permissible,
provided that the maintenance of it is impossible, or that no one
can be found to undertake it.
Article 89.
Whenever part of an estate becomes damaged or liable
to damage in such a way that exploitation is rendered impossible,
that portion shall. be sold, unless the damage to that portion .is
detrimental to the :exploitation of the remainder, in which case
the whole estate shall be sold.
Article 90.
An endowment which is allowed to be sold shall be con-
yerted into an estate which is as. near as possible to the intentions
of the endower.
Article 91.
In the following cases the profits of the estate endowed
for the public shall be expended on public services:-
1. In cases where it is not known how the profits of the
30http://www.rezabastani.ir
111/1
estate are to be expended, unless there exist some indications as
to the endower real. desires.
2. In cases in which the expenditure of the profits of the
estate in the special manner laid down by the bequeather of pious
foundation is impossible.
SUB-SECTION Ill.
CONCERNING THE ENJOYMENT OF RIGHTS OPEN TO EVERYONE
(MUBAHAT}
Article 92,
Everyone may, in accordance with the laws and regula-
tions applicable to each one of them, derive benefits from rights
open to everyone (mubahat)
SECTION 3
Concerning the rights of easement concerning the Property
of another and the rights and privileges appertaining to a
landed property in relation to adjacen t property.
1
SUB-SECTION I
CONCERNING RIGHTS OF EASEMENT RELATING TO
the PROPERTY OF OTHERS
Article 93,
The right of easement (ertefagh) is a right held by one
person on the property of another.
Article 94.
Owners of property may grant to others such rights as they
please on their own property, and in this case the basis of a claim
arises out of a deed or contract in virtue of which the right was
granted.
'
Article 95.
Whenever someone's channel for runing water or rain
water has passed through the land or house of another person,
31http://www.rezabastani.ir
\AV
·---····--·- ...
---··...a.=,__.___ _
-- .-------·-····
------
the owner of that house or land cannot prevent their-- passage,
unless the absence of his right is proved.
Article 96.
A spring situated in someone's land definitely belongs. tci
the owner of that land, unless another person has rights over its
substance or its profits.
Article 97.
Whenever a person has for a long time had a water chan-
nel running through the house or property of another to his own
property or has had a right in his favour, the owner of that house
or land shall not hinder the _taking of water nor its passage
through his property, and similarly with regard to rights such
as ~olding rights in doors, openwork windows, aqueducts, irriga-
.tion channels and so on.
Article 98.
If the owner of property has given perm1SS1on to p~
through it to someone who cannot do so by right, he may rescind
his permission whenever he wishes and .prevent the other from
passing through; and similarly with other rights of easement.
Article 99.
No one has the right to take his water channel into the
property of another nor·to cause rain water from· his roof to flow
onto the roof of the property of another nor to throw snow on to
it unless he has permission from the owner.
Article 100.
-- If the water channel of one person passes through the
house of another, and if it becomes damaged in such a\fty.'.{ls
to cause damage to the house, the owner of the house has no
right to oblige the owner of the channel to repair it, but he him-
self must take steps to prevent it· from causing him loss. S}:l,Ql.ll1:i_·
ihe. damage to the channel obstruct the passage of ~ter; th~
owner of the house is not obliged to repair the channel, l>ut tlle1
owner of the right of passage must himself remove the obstruc-
tion, and to make the repairs may enter the house or land; but
except when there is such a necessity, he has no right of entry,
· ,. ·
without the permission of the owner.
---- ·------··
32http://www.rezabastani.ir
""·---·-
"'
\ -
-----
Article 101
Whenever someone derives profit, such as the working
of a mill or similar things, from water which is the property of
someone else in accordance with some right, the owner of the
water. cannot change the course of the channel in such a way
·as to prevent this right from being profitably exercised.
Article 102
Whenever an estate is transferred either in its entirety
or in part to someone else, rights of easement over another estate
or portion of it being included therein, such rights remain un-
changed, unless there be a stipulation to the contrary.
Article 103
Whenever the partners in a property possess rights and
benefits and that estate is divided between them, each partner
shall, in proportion to his share, become the owner of those rights·
e. g., if an estate possessing the right of passage through another
estate be divided between several persons, they each have the same
right of passage as before over the said place.
Article 104
A right of easement necessarily implies the exploitation of
that right e.g., if a person has the right of taking water from the
springs, tanks or reservoirs of others, he shall have the right of
passage to such springs, tanks and reservoirs for the drawing of
water.
Article 105
Any expenses which may be necessary for the enjoyment
of a right of easement are a charge upon the owner of that right,
unl.ess an agreement to the contrary has been arrived at between
him and the owner of the property.
Article 106
The owner of a ;property on which another person has a
right of easement cannot use his property in such a way as to
result in da,mage to, or suspension of, the said right, except with
the permission of the owner of the right.
Article 107
The benefits attaching to a right of easement are valid
33http://www.rezabastani.ir
\Ao
to the extent agreed upon, or to the extent recognised by ~ommon
usage, and necessitated by the exigencies of exploitation. ·
Article 108
In all cases where a person's exploitation of another per-
son's property rests upon a simple permission, the owner can
withdraw his permission whenever he pleases, unless there exists
a legal impediment to this. ·
34http://www.rezabastani.ir
l,j-::lJ:if 4/ .:, 1.,i! .) .>.A .:J_;.j ~
IRANIAN CIVIL CODE
SUB-SECTION II
Concerning the rights and privileges
appertaining to a property in relation
to adjacent property.
Article 109.
A wall situated between two properties is considered as
common property of the owners of the two properties, unless
there is an indication or reason to the contrary.
Article 110.
Building by placing marks and pavement or the placing
of a beam, are among the indications which denote occupation
and exclusive rights.
Article 111 .
Wherever there are buildings adjoining the wall in a per-
m.anent manner on both sides, or beams are placed on the wall
is on both sides, the wall deemed common property unless the cont-
rary is proved.
Article 112.
Wherever the!'e are circumstances of exclusive right on
one side only, the whole wall is deemed to belong to the owner
of that side, unless the contrary is proved.
Article 113.
Expenses in connection with a common wall a.re a charge
upon those. who have a share in it.
19http://www.rezabastani.ir
r •V
Article 114.
Neither of the partners can oblige the other to build or
repair a common wall, unless there is no other method of
avoiding loss.
Article 115.
In a case where a common wall is damaged and one of
the partners refuses to repair it or to allow it to be taken in
hand for common building operations, the other partner can
repair his own special part of the wall.
Article 116.
If one of the partners agrees to the other taking the wall
in hand for building operations, but declines to bear the expense,
the other partner can repair the wall, and in this case, if the
new fabric is made with common materials, the wall will be a
common wall, otherwise it belongs to the partner who has re-
paired it.
Article 117.
If one of the partners damages a common wall and the
damaging of it was unnecessary, he must rebuild what he has
destroyed.
Article 11 8.
Neither of the tow partners has the right to raise a common
wall, or to impose a structure or place a beam on it, or to open
a window or a niche in it, or make any kind of change, except
with the permission of the other partner.
Article 119.
If one of the partners has beams on a common wall, he
cannot change their position and place them on another part
of the wall without the consent of the other partner.
20http://www.rezabastani.ir
T I '\
H
------·.
,,·.--
··-·-. .
-"-
~-=-
-··-. --.-.-~---"·•---··--·-·------- ·-.·
Article 120.
If the owner of a wall gives his neighbour permission to
place a beam upon his wall or to build on it, he can withdraw
his permission whenever he plea ,es, unless he has bound himself
to forego this right.
Article 12 l.
If someone has placed a beam upon a wall with the per-
mission of ·the owner of the wall, and then removes it, he cannot
replace it except with fresh permission from the owner of the wall:
and the same applies to other encroachments.
Article 122.
If a wall is leaning over towards another property or a
highway, or the like, in such a way that it is near to collapsing,
the owner of it is obliged to pull it down.
Article 123.
If a house or a piece of land is divided between two persons,
one of them cannot oblige the other to join v.rith him in erectiong
a wall between the two parts.
Article 124.
If a beam of a building has in the past rested on a neigh-
bour's private wall and the past history of this occupation is un-
known, it must remain in its former state, and if by reason of
the decay of the building, the beam is removed, the owner of the
building can renew it, and the neighbour has no right to prevent
him from doing so, unless he proves that the former state of
affairs had been brought into being solely by his permission.
Article 125.
If a lower storey belongs to one person and an upper storey
to someone else, each of the owners can n1ake normal use of his
21http://www.rezabastani.ir
r,o
own special part, but as regards the ceiling between the two
storeys, each of the owners can use the floor or celling of his own
special par only in such normal way as not to interfere with the
rights of the other.
Article 126.
The owner of a lower e.part.ment and the owner of an upper
apartment are acknowledged as the sole possessors of the walls of
the lower and upper apartments respectively, and as the joint
possessors of the ceiling between the two apartments.
Article 127.
An upper staircase is accounted the property of the owner
of the upper storey, unless the contrary is proved.
Article 128.
Neither of the owners of an upper and lower storey can
oblige the other to repair, or help to repair, their walls and ceiling.
Article 129.
If a ceiling between an upper
and lower apartment is
damaged and the two owners do not agree as to its repair, and no
binding agreement between them has formerly existed, and if
one of the owners repairs the ceiling as a pious act, the ceiling
is a common one if it has been made with common materials, and
belongs to the person who as built it, if made with private ma-
terials.
Article 130.
No person possesses the right to put up a projecting porch
on his house overlooking his neighbour's courtyard without the
latter's permission; and if he has put up such a porch without
permission, he will be obliged to remove it.
Article 13 l .
If a branch of someone's tree enters the courtyard. of bis
22http://www.rezabastani.ir
neighbour's house or into his land, the owner must bend it back,
and if he does not, his neighbour can bend it back, and if this does
not succeed, he can cut it away from the boundary of his property;
and these provisions apply also to roots of trees which enter ano-
ther's property.
Article 132.
A person cannot make. use of his property in such a man-
ner as necessarily to involve a neighbour in loss, except such use
as is customary and is required in order to satisfy his needs or to
avoid loss.
Article 133.
A person cannot put a door in a wall of his house leading
to a negihbour's house, even if the wall is his private property;
but he cam make an aperture or a lattice in his own private wall,
and his neighbour has no right to prevent him, but can put up
a wall or a curtain in front of the aperture or lattice to prevent
his seeing through it.
Article 134.
None of the partners in a ferry or a water-course can pre-
vent the other partners from crossing it or taking water away.
Article 135.
Trees, pits and the like, which separate properties will be
subject to the same provisions as party walls.
SUB-SECTION Ill
CONCERNING THE "BORDERS" (HARIM) OF PROPERTIES
Article 136.
The borders (harim) of a quantity of land are the boun-
daries of the property, the water channels. the streams and the
like, which are necessary for the complete exploitation of the land.
Article 137.
The "borders" of a well are 20 gaz for drinking water and
30 gru for cultivation.
23http://www.rezabastani.ir
T • I"
Article 138.
The "borders" of a spring or a water channel (qandt) are
500 ga2 on all sides in loose earth, and 250 ga2 in hard earth; but if
the distances mentioned in this and the preceding article are not
enough to avoid loss, distances to the extent required to prevent
loss shall be added to them.
Article 139.
"Borders" are governed by the provisions applicable to the
property of the owner of the "borders" and any occupation or use
of them which is contrary to the purpose of the "borders" is invalid
without permission from the owner; and therefore nobody can
dig a well or a water-channel (qanat) within the borders of ano-
ther spring or channel. but activities which do not cause loss are
permissible.
BOOK 2
CONCERNING THE CAUSES OF ACQUISITION
Article 140.
Ownership is acquired:
(1) By the cultivation of waste land and the annexation
of unclaimed things.
(2) By means of contracts and agreements.
(3) By acquisition in virtue of a right of pre-emption.
(4) By inheritance.
Part I
CONCERNING THE CULTIVATION OF WASTE LAND AND THE
ANNEXATION OF UNCLAIMED THINGS
CHAPTER I
CONCERNING THE CULTIVATION OF WASTE & UNCLAIMED
LANDS
Article 141 .
Actions directed towards the reclamation of land are
24http://www.rezabastani.ir
those which make waste and unclaimed land profitable by means
of operations which are included by custom under the heading
of cultivation, such as husbandry, tree-planting, building etc.
Article 142.
To begin to cultivate land e.g. by arranging stones round
a plot or by digging a well etc., is called (tahjir) and does not
bring about ownership; but it creates for him who has performed
the tahjir, a prior right to carry out the cultivation.
Article 143.
A person who cultivates with the intention of taking pos-
session thereof, a part of a stretch of waste and unclaimed land,
becomes the owner of that part.
Article 144.
The reclamation of the boundaries of a piece of land
involves the ownership of the middle of it also.
Article 145.
The cultivator must observe in every respect the other
laws relating to this subject.
CHAPTER 2
CONCERNING THE ANNEXATION OF UNCLAIMED THINGS
Article 146.
"Annexation" means occupation and laying hands upon
a thing, or the preparation of the means of annexation or occu-
pation.
Article 147.
A person who annexes unclaimed goods and observes the
relevant laws becomes the owner of them.
25http://www.rezabastani.ir
y•I
Article 148.
A person who digs a canal in a piece of unclaimed land
and joins it to a river has made that canal and becomes the owner
of it; but while it is still separate from the river it is counted as
" tahjir ".
Article 149.
If a person digs a stream or a channel for the . purpose
of annexing unclaimed water, the unclaimed water which flows
into this stream or channel belongs to the owner of the channel,
and another stream cannot be opened from it, or land watered
by it, without the owner's permission.
Article 1SO.
If several persons are partners in the digging of a channel
or a well, they become the owners of the water in proportion to
the labour and expense which has been effective in bringing about
improvements, and the water will be divided between them in the
same proportion.
Article 151 .
None of the partners can open up another channel from
a common channel, or broaden or narrow the mouth of a stream
or build a bridge or a mill over it, or plant trees beside it, or make
any use of it, except with the permission of the other partners.
Article 152.
If the appointed share of water of one of the partners in
a common stream flows into a private channel belonging to him,
that water becomes his private property, and he can use it in
any way.
Article 153.
If a stream is common to a number of people, and there
is a dispute about the size of each man's share, they shall be
26http://www.rezabastani.ir
judged to have equal shares, unless there exists a reason for the
share of some of the1n to exceed others.
Article 154.
A person cannot carry water to his property across the
property of another person without the latter's permission, even
if there is no other route.
Article 155.
Everyone has the right to irrigate his land from an un-
claimed st:['.eam or to open up another stream from it for his land
or his mill or his other needs.
Article 156.
If the water of a stream is not enough to irrigate all the
land round it and the owners of the land are in dispute about
priority and non-priority, and none of them can prove a right
of priority, every piece of land which is nearer to the source of
the water shall, in due order, have right of priority over land
which is lower down, to the extent of its needs.
Article 157,
If two pieces of land on both sides of a stream are also
situated opposite each other and the right of priority of one
over the other is not established, and both owners wish to draw
water at the same time, and the water is not enough for both,
they must draw lots for priority in drawing water in proportion
to their shares, and if the water is enough for bothe, they will
divide it in proportion to their shares.
Article 158.
If the dates of the beginning of cultivation of lands border-
ing os a river are different, the land first cultivated has a prior
claim to the water over land cultivated later, even though it is
situated lower than the latter.
27http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 159.
If a person wishes to cultivate for the first time a piece
of land bordering on a river, and there is a surplus of water and
the owners of the existing plots will not be hampered, he can irri-
gate the new land with the water from this river; otherwise he
has no right to draw water, even if his land is higher than the other
lands.
Article 160.
If a person digs a qanat or a well in his own :land or in
unclaimed land for the purpose of annexing it, in order that he
shall reach water or cause water to flow, he becomes the owner
of the resulting water, but so long as he has not struck water in
unclaimed land, his activities are accounted a tahjir.
CHAPTER 3
CONCERNING MINES
Article 161.
A mine situated in somebody's land belongs to the owner
of the land, and the working of it will be subject to special laws.
CHAPTER 4
CONCERNING FOUND ARTICLES AND STRAY ANIMALS
SECTION I
CONCERNING FOUND ARTICLES
Article 162.
A person who finds an article worth less than ten shahis
can take possession of it.
Article 163.
If the article discovered is worth ten shahis or more .the
finder must announce the find for one year; if the owner of the
28http://www.rezabastani.ir
~=-··--a·----~-- ~ -
1~/1
- - - · , a a • • - - - , - - - - - - • - · · · - ~ ~ ~-•~ -~--
~
___ _
article does not appear within this time, the finder is empowered
to keep it in trust or to make use of it. In the event of his
keeping it in trust and it is destroyed through no fault of his,
he will not be responsible for it.
Article 164.
An announcement of the finding an article consists in
publishing and advertising, 'based on the 'required indications
of time and place, in such a way that the finding of the article is
brought to the notice of the inhabitants of a place in a customary
way.
Article 165.
Anyone who finds an article in a deserted or ruined place,
which is uninhabited and which is not privately owned, can take
possession of such an article and need not announce it, unless it
is evident that it belongs to modern times, in which case it will
be considered in the same way as other articles found in inhabited
places.
Article 166.
If anyone finds an article on another's property or on pro-
perty that has been bought from another and presumes that the
article belongs to the proprietor or the former proprietors, he must
inform them. If these proprietors claim the article and if there
is some proof of their ownership, the article must be returned to
them. Otherwise the finder must deal with the article in the
manner already prescribed.
Article 167.
If an article found is not durable but is perishable, it must
be sold at a reasonable price and this price will be considered as
the property itself.
Article 168.
If the article found no longer exists when its discovery is
29http://www.rezabastani.ir
\ ~ V
reported, through no fault of the finder, he shall not be held res-
ponsible.
Article 169.
When an article has been found, any profit accruing to it
belongs to the former owner till such time as the finder has estab-
lished his right to keep it: after that, the profits belong to the
finder.
CHAPTER 4, SECTION 2. NO LOST ANIMALS
Article 170.
A lost animal is an animal possessed by someone which
is found without being in anyone's possession. Animals, however,
on their grazing grounds or near a watering place or those capable
of defending themselves from ferocious animals cannot be con-
sidered as lost.
Article 171.
Anyone who finds a lost animal must return it to its owner
or, if the owner is unknown, he must deliver it to the judge or his
substitute. lf he does not do this, a finder will be held responsible
for an animal, eve.n if he has released it after taking possession
of it.
Article 172.
If a lost animal is found in an inhabited area and the
finder, though he has access to a judge or his substitute, fails to
hand over the animal, he will not be entitled to claim eventually
from the owner expenses incurred. When an animal has been
found in an uninhabited area, the find~r can claim any expenses
from the owner so long as he has gained no benefit himself from
the animal. Otherwise the expenses incurred will be brought
into account against any benfit gained and only the balance will
be claimable by the finder or the owner as the case may be.
30http://www.rezabastani.ir
\~i
CHAPTER 5, ON BURIED TREASURE
Article 173.
Buried treasure is that found by chance below ground 01·
buildings.
Article 174.
Buried treasure of which the owner is not known is the pro-
perty of the finder.
Article 175.
If treasure is found buried on the property of another
person, he must inform that owner; in case the latter claims the
treasure and can prove his claim, the treasure will belong to the
person who claims ownership.
Article 176.
When treasure is found buried in unclaimed land it shall
belong to the finder.
Article 177.
Jewels found in the sea belong to their finder. Flotsam
and jetsam also belongs to their finder.
Article 178.
Articles which have sunk in the sea and have been aban-
doned by their owner belong to the one who retrieves then1.
CHAPTER 6, ON GAME
Article 179.
Captured wild animals belong to the pursuer.
Article 180.
Ca.pture of tame animals and of other animals that bear
marks of ownership does not confer ownership.
31http://www.rezabastani.ir
\ ~ 0
Article 181.
If anyone prepares a hive or a place for bees, the bees and
the honey shall be his property. Simiarly pigeons gathered in a
pigeon tower belong to the owner of the tower.
Article 182.
Other game laws will be laid down special regulations.
32http://www.rezabastani.ir
~JtH '-1 ~1.r.1 jJ..o ~_,;\i
Iranian civil code
BOOK 2,
PART 2.
REGARDING CONTRACTS, TRANSACTIONS AND OBLIGATIONS
CHAPTER 1.
ON CONTRACTS AND OBLIGATIONS IN GENERAL
Article 183.
A contract is made when one or persons make a mutual
agreement with another one or more persons, on a certain thing,
and that agreement is accepted by the latter persons.
CHAPTER 1.
SECTION 1.
ON THE DIFFERENT TYPES OF
CONTRACTS AND TRANSACTIONS
Article 184.
Contracts and transactions are divided into the following
categories-an irrevocable contract-a revocable contract-an optional
contract - an unconditional contract - a conditional contract.
Article 185.
An irrevocable contract is one which cannot be broken by
either party except under specified circumstances.
Article 186.
A revocable contract can be cancelled by either party
whenever he likes.
Article 187.
A contract may be irrevocable on one party but revocable
by the other.
28http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 188.
An optional contract can be cancelled by either party, by
both parties or by a third party.
Article 189.
An unconditional contract is one which is not, in the in-
tention of the makers, contingent upon any outside matter.
otherwise 1t 1s a conditional contract.
CHAPTER 1.
SECTION 2.
ON THE ESSENTIAL CONDITIONS
FOR THE VALIDITY OF A TRANSACTION
Article 190.
For the validity of a contract the following conditions are
essential.
(1) the intention and mutual consent of both parties to
the contract.
(2) the competence of both parties.
(3) there must be a definite thing which forms the subject-
matter of the contract.
(4) the cause of the transaction must be lawful.
SUB-SECTION (1)
REGARDING THE INTENTION AND MUTUAL
CONSENT OF BOTH PARTIES TO THE CONTRACT
Article 191.
A contract only becomes complete through the real inten-
tion of the contractor, and this real intention must be accom-
panied by some factor which proves that there was such an in-
tention.
Article 192.
If either party or both, are unable to speak, a si!!'n which
indicates intentions and acceptance will be sufficlenL.
29http://www.rezabastani.ir
\
,.
Article 193,
The performence of a transaction may be effected by an
act which indicates intention and agreement, such as taking de·
livery or handing over unless in circumstances excepted by the
law.
Article 194.
The words, signs or other acts by which both parties per-
form the transaction must be co-ordinated so that each party ac-
cepts the transaction which the other intended to perform.
Otherwise the transaction will be null and void.
Article 195.
If anyone makes a contract when drunk, unconscious or
asleep, the contract is null owing to absence of intention.
Article 196.
Anyone who makes a contract is 'himself bound thereby,
unless in making the contract the contrary is laid down. or unless
subsequent evidence to the contrary is produced. When making
a contract, however, any one can make provision for the benefit
of a third person.
Article 197.
If the price or the subject of a sale in a contract is a thing
which belongs to a third party, the contract will be on behalf of
the owner of that thing.
Article 198,
Either or both parties may represent another or conversely
one person can represent both parties to a contract.
Article 199,
Agreement reached by mistake or with reluctance will not
make a transaction effective.
Article 200,
Only mistakes connected wi~h the subject of a transaction
will invalidate it.
30http://www.rezabastani.ir
I", A
Article 201.
A mistake made as to the identity of one party will no1;
affect the interests of the other party in the transaction, except
when the identity of this second party forms the principal reasen
of the transaction.
Article 202.
Reluctance is caused by acts which affect any sane person
through threats against his person, property or honour in a way
that he cannot be expected to withstand. In connection with such
threats the age, personality, nature and sex of the person con-
cerned must be taken into consideration.
Article 203.
Reluctance will invalidate a contract even when it is caused
by an outside party other than the two parties concerned.
Article 204.
Threats made by one party against the body or soul or
honour of close relatives (of the other party) such as husband,
wife, fathers or children are regarded as causing reluctance. In
connection with this article the closeness of the relationship must
be considered, according to custom, in estimating the reluctance.
Article 205.
When a threatened person knows that the threat cannot
be carried out or when he is able to defend himself without dif·
ficulty from the threat or from performing the contract, the man
who made the threat cannot be regarded as having used undue
force.
Article 206.
If anyone is constrained to make a transaction through dis-
tress, this is not regarded as undue force and such a transaction
is. considered valid.
Article 207.
A transaction entered into by a person because constrained
by an order of competent judicial authorities is not considered as
made under undue force.
31http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 208.
If one party fears the other, though not threatened by him,
this 1s not regarded as being undue force.
Article 209.
A transaction signed after the removal of any undue force
is binding.
SUB-SECTION (2)
REGARDING THE cotv,PE'l'ENC:S OF THE PARTIES
Article 210.
Both parties should be competent to transact the business.
Article 211.
In order that a contract may be valid both parties to it
must be of age, must be in thetr proper senses and must have
~ached maturity.
Article 212.
A transaction between people who are not of age, nor in
their proper senses nor mature is invalid because of their incom-
petence.
Article 213.
A transaction made by persons under some diaab111ty can..
not be valid.
SUB-SECTION (3)
REGARDING TH~ 0BJECf OF A TRANSACTION
Article 214,
The object of a contract must be some property ()r act
which both the parties agree to deliver or execute.
Article 215.
The object of a contract must be capable of bMng Offlltld
and must embody some reasonable and Iegltllhate ad.vantage.
32http://www.rezabastani.ir
I 'I '\
Article 216.
The object of a transaction should not be ambiguous ex-
cept 1n special cases where a general knowledge of the matter
would be sufficient.
·
SUB-SECTION (4)
REGARDING THE REASON FOR A TRANSACTION
Article 217.
In a contract it is not necessary to explain the reason for
making it, but if this is done, the reason must be a legitimate one;
otherwise the contract will be null and void.
Article 218.
If it is shown that a contract has been made with the in-
tention of evading some liability, such a contract is not binding.
CHAPTER 1.
SECTION 3.
REGARDING THE EFFECT OF CONTRACTS
SUB-SECTION ( 1)
REGARDING GENERAL RULES
Article 219.
Contracts made according to law are binding on the
parties or their substitutes, unless they have been cancelled by
mutual agreement or for some legal reason.
Article 220.
A contract not only binds the parties to execute what it
explicitly mentions, but both parties are also bound by all conse-
quences which follow from the contract in accordance with custo-
mary law and practice, or by virtue of a law.
Article 221.
If any party undertakes to perform or to abstain from
any act, he is responsible to pay compensation to the other party
33http://www.rezabastani.ir
in the event of his not carrying out this undertaking, pro-
vided the compensation for such losses is specified in the contract
or is understood in the contract according to customary law or
provided such compensation is by law regarded ·as guaranteed.
Article 222.
In case of failure to comply with the above-mention sti-
pulations, a judge can, while observing the above article, authorise
the party in whose favour the undertaking was made to perform
the act in question himself and can sentence the delinquent to
pay any relevant expenses.
Article 223.
Any contract entered into is understood to be genuine
unless its false nature is proved.
Article 224.
The wording of a contract shall be read according to the
meaning understood by customary law.
Article 225.
If certain points that are customarily understood in a
contract by customary law or practice are not specified therein
they are nevertheless to be considered as mentioned in the con-
tract.
SUB-SECTION (2)
LOSSES INCURRED THROUGH NON-FULFILLMENT
OF CONTRACTS
Article 226,
In the event of non-fulfilment of an undertaking by one
party, the other party cannot claim damages for loss sustained,
unless a special period was fixed for fulfillment of the undertaking
and that period has expired. If no period was fixed for the ful-
fillment of the undertaking a party can only claim damages if
the power for fixing the period for such fulfillment was vested in
34http://www.rezabastani.ir
---~-~ - - - - - - . ~ '-' t
him and if he proves that he asked for the fulfillment of the
obligation.
Article 227.
The party who fails to carry out the undertaking will
only be sentenced to pay damages when he is unable to prove
that his failure was due to some outside cause for which he could
not be held responsible.
Article 228.
If the object of an agreement consists of the payment of
a sum in cash, the judge can, subject to the terms of Article 221,
convict the debtor to pay co1npensation for losses incurred through
delay in the payment of his debt.
Article 229.
If a man who has entered into an undertaking is prevented
from fulfilling it by some accident not within his control, he,
shall not be convicted to compensation for losses.
Article 230.
If in a contract the amount of compensation to be paid
in the event of its non-fulfilln1ent is laid down, the judge can
condemn the offender to pay more or Jess than the sum fixed.
SUB-SECTION (3)
REGARDING EFFECT OF CONTRACTS ON
THiRD PARTIES
Article 231 .
Undertakings or contrac~s are only binding on the two
parties concerned or their legal substitutes except in cases coming
under Article 196.
35http://www.rezabastani.ir
CHAPTER 1.
SECTION 4.
REGARDING CONDITIONS FIXED
AT THE TIME OF MAKING CONTRACTS
SUB-SECTION (1 ),
REGARDING DIFFERENT TYPES OF CONDITIONS
Article 232.
The following conditions are of no effect though they
do not nullify the contract itself.
(1) Conditions which are impossible to fulfill.
(2) Conditions which are useless and unprofitable.
(3) Conditions which are not legal.
Article 233.
The following conditions are of no effect and will nullify
the contract itself:
(1) Conditions which are contrary to the requirements of
the contract.
(2) Conditions which are unknown and of which ~ack of
knowledge entails ignorance of the two things the exchange of
which forms the subject of the contract.
Article 234.
Conditions are of three different kinds :-
(1) Conditions of qualification.
(2) Conditions of corollary.
(3) Conditions about the performance or non-performance
of a contract.
Of these the first category to the quality or quantity of
the object. The second provides for the fulfillment or the hap-
pening of some extraneous event: and the third arises when
a condition is made as to the performance or non-performance
by one of the two parties or by a third party.
36http://www.rezabastani.ir
SUB-SECTION (2)
REGARDING PROVISIONS GOVERNING
THESE CONDITIONS
Article 235..
If there is a condition of qualification which is not fulfilled,
the party who stands to benefit by the contract shall have the
right to cancel it.
Artiicle 236.
As regards the corollary of a contract, if the reaUsation of
the result does not depend upon a special circumsta.nc~ it rouowa
from the fulfillment of the condition itself.
Article 237.
If the condition, made as part of the contract, ~ a. uon•
dition involving the performance or the non-performance of an
act, a person who has undertaken to carry out such an act must
do so; in the event of his failure to do so, the other party may
aipply to the judge asking t.hat h.e may. be compelled to execute
the condi1;ion.
Article 238.
If the performance of some act has been undertaken under
the terms of a contract, and if it proves impossible to force the
party who should perform the act to fulfil his obligation, though
the act could be performed by some other person, the judge can
at the expense of the person at fault arrange for the performance
of the act.
Article 239.
If it is not possible to force the fulfillment of a.n act by
the person who should perform it and if the act is of such a kind
that no one else could prefortn it on his behalf, then the other
party shall have the right to cancel the contract.
Article 240.
If when a contract has been made it is found that the catry~
ing out of its condition is impossible or if it becomes known that
the carryin;_. 0 11t was impossible when the contract was ma.de, the
37http://www.rezabastani.ir
I' I
person in whose favour the contract was drawn up will have
the option of cancelling the contract, unless the condition becomes
impossible of fulfilment owing to some act of the person in whose
favour the contract was drawn up.
Article 241 .
In a contract it may be specified that one of the parties
should give security or pledge for the fulfilment of his obligation.
Article· 242.
If it is stipulated that one of the parties should pledge
certain property and if that property is destroyed or damged, the
other party will have the right to cancel the contract but not the
right to demand the delivery of the equivalent of the pledged pro-
perty or any compensation for damages. If such pledged property
1s destroyed or damaged after delivery there will be no right of
cancellation of the contract.
Article 243.
If a contract provides for a guarantor and if this condi-
tion is not fulfilled, the person in whose favour the condition was
made will have the right to cancel the contract.
Article 244.
A party in whose favour a condition is made may surrender
bis claim to the fulfilment of that condition, and in that case the
condition ceases to be part of the contract; conditions about the
result of a contract cannot, however, be cancelled in this way.
Article 245.
The surrender of the right to a condition may be made
either orally or by some act, which indicates such surrender.
Article 246.
When a contract is annulled by mutual consent or can-
cellation its condition becomes null and void and if one party has
fulfilled his obligations under the contract he can claim compen-
sation. from the other party in whose favour he did this.
38http://www.rezabastani.ir
(Q) I J ~ l/ ;;., f.1t I j JJi ;;.,Ji li
Iranian Civil code (5)
CHAPTER 1.
SECTION 5.
REGARDING CONTRACTS WHICH DEAL
a:,WITH THE PROPERTY OF A THIRD PARTY OR WHICH ARE
UNAUTHOltlSED.
Article 247.
Contracts regarding the property of others, except those
entered into by guardians, trustees or legal representatives, are
not binding even though the owner of the property inwardly
agrees thereto: if however after the contract has been made the
owner of the property signifies his consent, the contract becomes
good and binding.
Article 248.
The consent of the owner of a property in an unauthorised
contract can be signified orally or by an act which signifies his
consent to the contract.
Article 249.
The silence of the owner of a property, even if he is present
when the consent is made, cannot be taken as indication his
consent.
Article 250.
Such consent is only effective and valid if it has not been
previously refused; otherwise it is not effective.
50http://www.rezabastani.ir
--~.-~----
·-·
--~~·
-----
y • ,..
Article 251 .
The refusal of an unauthorised transaction is effective
whether expressed orally or by some act which indicates absence
of consent.
Article 252.
Consent or 'refusal need not be immediate; in case of delay
causing loss to a party who has acted in an authorised manner
he shall have the right to break the contract.
Article 253.
In the case of an unauthorised contract, if the owner of
the property dies before signifying his consent or refusal, this
consent or refusal can be given by the heirs.
Article 254.
If the property referred to in an unauthorised contract
subsequently passes into the possession of the unauthorised person
in some way, this mere ownership will not make the original con-
tract binding.
Article 255.
If anyone makes a contract which is acknowledged to be
an .unauthorised contract and subsequently it transpires that the
property in question belonged to the man who made the contract
or to a person, on whose behalf he was authorised to act as a
guardian. or legal representative, the validity of the contract
depends on the renewed consent of the person who made the con-
tract; if he does not give such a consent the contract is invalid.
Article 256.
In the event of anyone transferring property of himself
or anyone else in one contract, or accepting the transfer of pro-
perty, for himself or another the contract is binding on himself
but. is considered unauthorised for anyone else.
51http://www.rezabastani.ir
T•V
Article 257.
If the object of an unauthorised transaction is made the
object of other transactions also, before the owner of the property
signifies his consent or refusal to the first unauthorised transac-
tion, this owner can approve any of the transactions which he
likes and the transactions dependent thereon shall be valid, while
the previous ones shall be null and void.
Article 258.
In respect of any profit on a property which formed the
object of an unauthorised contract or in respect of any return on
that property, consent or rejection will be effective as from the
date of the contract.
Article 259.
When any property has been handed over to a party in
accordance with an unauthorised contract and when the owner
of the property does not give his consent, the party who holds
the property is responsible for the same and for any profits
thereon.
Article 260.
If a party holds property or its equivalent which formed
the subject of an unauthorised contract and if the owner of that
property agrees to the transaction and to that party's retaining
the equivalent value of the property, then that original owner
shall have no right to claim on the other party.
Article 261.
In the case where property has been disposed of without
authority and the original owner witholds his consent, the pur-
chaser will be responsible for the actual property and any pro-
fits on it during the time he held it, even if he has not derived
a.ny benefit from it, and also he will be held responsible for any
damages to the property while it was in his possession.
52http://www.rezabastani.ir
,.,
Article 262.
Under the circumstances described in the above article the
purchaser of the property shall have the right to claim from the
man who sold it to him without authority for the return of the
actual property, or the price paid or its equivalent in value.
Article 263,
If the original owner of any property refuses to sanction
a transaction about it and the purchaser is ignorant of the fact
that the sale was unauthorised, he can claim back from the
unauthorised seller both the price paid and also any damage,
but he can only claim back the price paid if he knew that transac-
tion was made without authority.
CHAPTER L. SECTION 6. REGARDING THE TERMINATION OF
OBLIGATIONS
Article 264.
Obligations can be ended in the following ways:
(1) By fulfilment of the obligation.
(2) By cancellation -0f the bargain.
(3) By release from the obligation.
<4)By substitution of .a different obligation.
(5) By adjustment, or offsetting of one obligaion against
another.
(6) By passing of ownership (from creditor to debtor) of
the amount owed.
SUB-SECTJON (1) CONCERNING fULf.lLMENT
OF THE OBL1GATION
. Article 265.
If anyone gives property to another, he obviously has not
done so without consideration; therefore if a person gives property
53http://www.rezabastani.ir
T, o
to another, while he is under no obligation to do so, he can ask for
the return of such property.
Article 266.
If an undertaking is made but the person in whose favour
it is made has no legal right to demand its fulfilment, in the event
of the maker of the undertaking fulfilling it of his own will he
can have no claim for the return of the object of the undertaking.
Article 267.
If someone who is not the actual debtor pay the debt in
question although he does so without the debtor's permission, the
debt shall be dicharged; if however payment is made by per-
mission of the debtor, the payer can refer to the debtor, but other- ..
wise not.
Article 268.
The performance of an act, when it has been stipulated
that it should be done by a party to the contract, cannot be effected
by another person except by consent of the party in whose favour
the contract was made.
Article 269.
For fulfilment of an obligation a payment by a party
thereto is only effective if he delivers what he himself owns or
what he is authorised by its owner to deliver, and if he is personally
competent to do so.
Article 270.
If a party to an undertaking makes some payment in ful-
filment thereof, he cannot claim for the return of the same from
the party in whose favour the undertaking was made on the
grounds that when he made the payment he did not owe the
amount in question, unless he proves that the amount belonged
to another but was legally in his possession though without the
right to pay it to anyone.
54
,http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 271.
A debt shall only be paid to the creditor or his attorney
or to someone legally entitled to receive such payment.
Article 272.
The ,payment of a debt to anyone other than those specified
in the foregoing article can only be made by consent of the
creditor.
Article 273.
If a person entitled to receive payment of a debt refuses
such payment, the man under the obligation to pay can obtain
discharge by making payment to a judge or his substitute and
from the date of payment his liability for damages in respect of the
object of the undertaking shall cease.
Article 274.
If a party in whose favour a contract is made is not com-
petent to receive any payment thereunder, such payment will
not be valid.
Article 275.
A party in whose favour a contract is made cannot be
obliged to accept any goods thereunder that are not specified in
it even if they are of a like or greater value.
Article 276.
A debtor in fulfilment of an undertaking cannot deliver any
goods, of which the disposal has been forbidden by a judge.
Article 277.
A party to a contract cannot deliver only a proportion of
the amount due to the other party in whose favour the contract
was made, but a magistrate may grant a period of grace or arrange
for payment by instalments if the debtor's financial situation calls
.
for such action. ·
55http://www.rezabastani.ir
y •'
Article 278.
The delivery of some property specified in a contract to
its owner in its actual s.tate at the time of delivery shall discharge
the party who delivers it from his responsibility, even if the pro-
perty is deficient or defective, so long all the deficiency or defect
fs not due to the wrongful acts or the misuse of the party who
hands over the property, except in the cases stipulated in this
law. If however a party bound by a contract delays in delivering
such property at due date and when its delivery has been claimed,
he mill be responsible for any deficiency or defect even if this
deftclency or defect was caused by no fault of his,
Article 279.
When goods to be handed over under a contract are- not.
particular goods but are of a general nature, a party bound by
the contract need not deliver goods of the best quality, but he
must not hand over goods which according to custom and usage
are considered defective.
Article 280,
Any act under a contract must be performed at the place
where the contract is made, unless the parties to the contract
have made a special arrangement or unless usage or custom
require some other procedure.
Article 281.
Any expenses incurred in connection with the payment
of a debt must be born by the debtor, unless a provision to the con-
trary is made.
~
Article 282.
If under a contract one party owes several sums to one
other party, the debtor shall decide on what count any particular
payment is made.
56http://www.rezabastani.ir
SUB-SECTION (2), CONCERNING CANCELLATION OF BAIG.AlN
Article 283.
After a. contract has been made, the parties may cancel it
by mutual agreement and declare it null and void.
Article 284.
Cancellation can be made by any oral declaration or by any
act which indicates such cancellation.
Article 285.
The object of a cancellation may be whole or part of the
object of a. contract.
Article 286.
In case of the loss of one of the two things exchanged in
the transaction (e.g. the thing sold and the consideration given),
the contract can still be cancelled.
In such a.n event the counterpart of one of the things ex•
changed, if the transaction be an exchange of similar things, or
the price, if the transaction be a sale of an object for a pricce, may
be given in its place.
Article 287.
Accretions and separable benefits which accrue under a
contract between the time of its being made and its cancellation
shall belong to the party who under the contract has become
owner. But profits which are an integral part of the property
dealt with under a contract shall belong to the party who owns
the property after the cancellation of the contract.
Article 288.
If the owner of some property by a contract improves the
property after the making of the contract so that it appreciates
in value, this difference in value shall belong to him when the con-
tract is cancelled.
57http://www.rezabastani.ir
T• I
SUB-SECTION (3) CONCERNING RELEASE FROM AN OBLIGATION
Article 289.
Release from an obligation takes place when a creditor
voluntarily waives his claim.
Article 290.
Release from a contract is only effective when the.party to
the contract has the power to terminate it.
Article 291.
The release of a dead man from a debt case can be effected.
SUB-SECTION (4). CONCERNING ALTERATION
OF THE OBLIGATION
Article 292.
Alteration of an obligation can be effected in the following
cases:-
(1) When both parties to a contract agree owing to whate-
ver cause to the change of the original contract in some way and
its replacement by a new contract as its substitute, the party who
made the original undertaking shall be released from it.
(2) When a third party agrees with the consent of the cre-
ditor under the contract to pay the debt due by the contract de-
btor.
(3) When the creditor under a contract transfers his rights
to another party.
Article 293.
When an obligation is altered, any securities laid down in
the original agreement will not be binding under the subsequent
agreement, unless the two parties have made express stipulations
to that effect.
58
',.
,,http://www.rezabastani.ir
T• '
SUB-SECTION (5), CONCERNING ADJUSTMENT
Article 294.
When two parties are indebted to one another, adjustment
may be effected regarding their mutual debts in the ways explained
in the following articles.
Article 295.
Adjustment is an automatic process which is effected
without the necessity of the two parties giving their consent.
Thus when two parties are indebted to one another at the same
time, their debts are annulled by adjusment to the extent of the
amount owed by both parties and the parties are to that extent
released from their mutual debts.
Article 296.
Adjustment can only take place when object of the debts
are of similar kind and when their place and date of payment
coincide, no matter what may be the reason for the debt.
Article 297 .
•
When after a guarantee has been given, the person to whom
the guarantee was given (i.e. the creditor) becomes indebted to
the person for whom the guarantee has been given (i.e. the debtor),
this fact will not release the guarantor from his undertaking.
Article 298,
When only the place of payment differs in two debts, adjust-
ment will be effective either on payment of the cost of transport
entailed in transferring the thing from one place to another or
an agreement between the parties not to require delivery in the
specified place,
59http://www.rezabastani.ir
Artide 299.
Adjustments will not be binding in respect of the indispu-
table rights of third parties. Thus if an object owed to a certain
creditor is seized legally on behalf of a third party and if, after
this setzure, the debtor becomes a creditor of his origmal creditor,
tbe former cannot, under a plea of adjustment of debt refuse to
deliver the seized goods.
SUB-SECTION (6), CONCERNING PASSING OF OWNERSHIP
{FROM CREDITOR TO DEBTOR OF AMOUNT OWl:D}
Article 300.
If a debtor becomes owner of (the equivalent of) what he
owes, his llabllity ends. Thus, if anyone ls the debtor of someone
who has made him an heir the debt ls settled after the death
of the testator to the amount of the inheritance left to the debtor.
l
60T T' '
(9\) ~~, ~
~,JI., ~i<M .:,~li
(b)Jranian Civil Code
CHAPTER 2. OBLIGATIONS INCURRED WITHOUT A CONT!tc\CT
CHAPTER 2.
SECTION 1.
GENERAL DEFINITIONS
Article 301.
Any person, who intentionally or inadvertently acquires
goods to which he has no claim, is bound to deliver such goods to
the actual owner.
Article 302.
If anyone owing to a mistaken belief that he is in debt
pays that debt, he has the right to reclaim the amount in ques-
tions from the person who took it without right.
Article 303.
Anyone who accepts any property without any right is
responsible for the actual property and for any profits that may
accrue thereto, whether or not he is aware of his having no right
to the property.
Article 304.
If anyone, under the wrongful impression that he is en-
titled to possess some goods, disposes of the same, this transaction
is regarded as an unauthorised one and is subject to the provisions
laid down regarding such transactions.
Article 305.
In the cases described above the owner of the property
must pay any expenses entailed through its maintenance, unless
the man who took possession of the property knew that he had no
right to do so.
6
http://www.rezabastani.ir---- - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
Article 306.
If anyone manages the property of a party who is absent
or who is not competent to transact business or who suffers from
some such disability (and if he does so) without the permission
of the owner or the person who has the right to give permission,
he must give an account of his period of management.
If it would have been possible to have obtained permission
at the time or if delay in interfering in the matter would have
caused no loss, then no claim for expenses of management can
be entertained. If however a lack of intervention or a delay in
such action would have entailed losses to the owner of the pro-
perty, expenses of management can be claimed by the person who
performed the duties of manager.
CHAPTER 2. SECTION 2.
ON AUTOMATIC GUARANTEES
Article 307.
The following matters entail automatic guarantees:-
(1) misappropriation and acts so adjudged.
(2) deliberate destruction.
(3) indirect destruction.
(4) taking advantage.
SUB-SECTION (1) ON MISAPPROPRIATION
Article 308.
Forcible seizure of another's right is called misappropria-
tion. Laying hands on another's property without justification is
also considered as misappropriation.
Article 309.
If anyone prevents the owner of property from taking
possession of it but yet does not himself exert control over the pro-
7
http://www.rezabastani.irperty, he is not considered to be guilty of misappropriation, but if
he destroys the property or causes such act, he will be responsible.
Article 310,
Anyone denies that property has been deposited with him
or lent to him or similarly delivered to him, although such delivery
has taken place, he is considered to be guilty of misappropriation
as from the date on wich he denies the fact.
Article 311 .
A person who has misappropriated anything should return
the thing itself to the owner or, if it has been destroyed he must
give a similar property or its value. If any other reason the return
of the actual property is not possible, he must provide a substitute
or equivalent.
Article 312.
If an equivalent substitute for the misappropriated pro-
perty cannot be found, then its value at the time of delivery must
be paid. If howver an exact substitute can be found but its posse-
ssory value has disappeared, the last (or original ?) price must
be paid.
Article 313.
When anyone on his own land builds with another's ma-
terials or plants another's trees, without the owner's permission,
this second party can demand the demolition of the building or
the uprooting of the trees unless some mutual agreement for de-
livery of their price is reached.
Article 314.
If as a result of the acts of the person who misappropriated
property its value appreciates, the one who has been :guilty of mis-
appropriation will have no right to claim the difference in it's value;
8
http://www.rezabastani.irin CS1Se however this difference forms part of the actual property
the guilty party can claim the difference.
Article 315.
A party guilty of misappropriation is responsible for any
deficiency .or defect that may have been caused during the period
of his holding it, even if such deficiency or defect has been the
result of his action.
Article 316.
If anyone misappropriates any property from the man
who has previously misappropriated it his responsibility shall be
similar to that of the previous offender, even if he is not aware of
the original offence.
Article 317.
The owner of any propetry can claim the actual property
or,. if it has been lost, similar property of the value of the whole or
part of it from either the man originally guilty of misappropriation
or from anyone who has subsequently misappropriated it.
Article 318.
Whenever the owner of some property claims on a party
guilty of misappropriation in whose hands the misappropriated
property has been destroyed, the latter has not right to claim
on another party who may have misappropriated the property,
but if the owner claims on someone guilty of misappropriation
who however was not the person who destroyed the property, the
latter may claim on another party guilty of misappropriation in
whose charge the property was when destroyed or (he may claim)
on any persons who subsequently misappropriated the p1·operty,
until the claim eventually falls on the guilty party who held the
property when it was destroyed: generally speaking responsibility
rests with the party who had the property misappropriated by
him when it was destroyed.
9
http://www.rezabastani.ir,. ,. '\
Article 319.
If the owner of some property regains the whole or part
of some misappropriated property, he has no right to claim · in
respect of the amount regained, from any other person who has
been guilty of misappropriation.
Article 320.
In respect of profits derived from misappropriated property,
each party guilty of misappropriation is responsible to the amount
of profit accruing during the time that he has held the misappr-
opriated property or the time that it has been held by persons
subsequently guilty of misappropriation, even if he derived no
benefit therefrom.
When however a party guilty of misappropriation has had
to pay profit that accrued while the property was held by others
who misappropriated it later, then he may claim on each of these
other persons in proportion to the period that they held the pro-
perty.
Article 321.
If the owner of a property excuses a party who has been
guilty of misappropriation from returning the equivalent or the
value of the property, he shall have no right to claim on others
who have been similarly guilty. If however (the owner) he dele-
gates his right to one of (guilty) persons by some means, this latter
person will become the representative of the owner and will enjoy
the same right that the owner had.
Article 322.
Excusing one of those guilty of misappropiation from pay-
ing profits accrued to the property while it was in his charge will
not entail the release of others from their share of such prifits,
but if he (the owner) releases one of the persons guilty of mis-
appropriation in respect of actual profits, he will have no right to
claim on persons who were later so guilty.
10
http://www.rezabastani.irArticle 323.
If anyone buys some property from a party who has mis-
appropriated it, the former is also responsible and the owner can,
in accordance with the provisions laid down above, refer to both
the seller and the buyer and claim the original property or, if it
has been lost, its equivalent or its value and also any profits
accrued thereto.
Article 324,
If a buyer knows that the property in question has been
misappropriated, then in respect of property taken back by the
owner the rights of claim between the seller and the buyer are
similar to those between two parties guilty of misappropriation
and will be subject to the above provisions.
Article 325.
If anyone buys in good faith some misappropriated pro-
peirty and if the owner claims it from him, he (the buyer) can in
his tum make a claim on the man who sold it to him for its value
and any damages, even if the property was destroyed while in his
(the buyer) charge, but if the owner claims on the seller for the
equivalent or the price of the property, the latter will have no right
to claim on the buyer.
Article 326.
When anyone has bought property knowing that it had
been misappropriated and then loses it and has deliver equivalent
property to the original owner, this buyer cannot claim from the
seller for the amount by which this equivalent may exceed the
original property in value, but only for the amount of the (actual)
value.
Article 327.
If misappropriated property has passed from hand to hand
otherwise than by sale, the regulations already given regarding
the sale of misappropriated property will be applicable.
11
http://www.rezabastani.irTT!
SUB-SECTION (2),
REGARDING DELIBERATE DESTRUCTION
Article 328.
If anyone destroys the property of another person, he will
be held responsible and must either produce its equivalent or its
value, whether or not the property was destroyed intentionally
and whether it was the actual property or profits thereon that
were destroyed; if he causes defect or damage to such property,
he is responsible for the depreciation in price.
Article 329.
If anyone pulls down the building or house of some other
party he must rebuild it as before and if this cannot be done, he
must pay the price of the building.
Article 330,
In case a man kills an animal belonging to someone else,
without the owner's consent, he must pay the difference in price
between a live and a dead animal; if the dead animal is worthless,
he must pay the full value of the (living) animal. If however he
kills the animal or damages it in self defence he will not be held
responsible.
SUB-SECTION (3) REGARDING INDIRECT DESTRUCTION
Article 331.
Anyone who causes some property to be destroyed must
give back its equivalent or its value, and if he causes a defect or
damage to it he will be held responsible for any depreciation in
value.
Article 332.
If anyone arranges for the destruction of some property
and someone else doses the deed, the actual perpetrator will :oe
12
http://www.rezabastani.irheld, responsible and not the party who caused the deed, unless
the latter is the stronger party in such a way that according to
custom and usage the destruction could be attributed to him.
Article 333.
The owner of a wall, house or factory is responsible for
losses entailed by its collapse provided that he was aware of the
defect which caused it (the collapse) or if it was due to his negli-
gence.
Article 334,
The owner or custodian of an animal is not responsible
for losses caused by it unless he has failed to exercise control; but
if an animal is made to cause damages the person who made it do
so will be held responsible for losses incurred.
Article 335.
If a collision occurs between two ships, trains, motors or
other vehicles responsibility will lie with the person whose inten-
tional act or carelessness caused the collision, and if two parties
were so responsible for a collision the responsibility will attach to
both of them.
SUB-SECTION (4)
REGARDING TAKING ADVANTAGE
Article 336.
If a man does an act at the order of another and if accord-
ing to custom and usage a wage is payable for such an act; or if
the man who has acted is accustomed and disposed to undertake
such work, then he can claim pay for his work, unless it is shown
that he acted gratuitously.
Article 337.
If anyone benefits from another's property when permiss-
ion has been clearly expressed or understood, the owner of the
13
http://www.rezabastani.irproperty will be entitled to the reasonable equivalent of any such
profit, unlesi lt is clear that permission was given without (any
question of) .,ayment.
CHAPTER 3. SPECIAL TYPES OF CONTRACTS
CHAPTER 3. SECTION 1. REGARDING SALES
SUB-SECTION (1). REGULATIONS GOVERNING SALES
Article 338.
A sale consists of the giving possession of specified goods
in return for a known consideration.
Article 339.
After mutual agreement between the seller and the buyer
in respect of the object of the bargain and its price, the sale is
concluded by offer and acceptance. A sale can also be effected
by exchange.
Article 340.
\v'hen offering and accepting a sale the wording and terms
used must clearly indicate an act of sale.
Article 341.
A sale may be made with or without any conditions and
also a term may be set for the delivery of the whole or part of the
object of a bargain or of the total or partial payment of its price.
Article 342.
The quantity, type and nature of the object of the sale
must be known and the fixing of the quantity by weight, measure,
number, length, area or by inspection is made in accordance with
the local custom and usage.
Article 343.
If the object is sold by quantity the sale is effected even
before it has counted or measured in volume or length.
14
http://www.rezabastani.irTYI
Article 344.
If in the terms of a sale contract no conditions are laid
down or no time limit has been fixed for delivery of its object or
for payment of the price, the bargain is considered definite and
the price should be paid at once, unless in accordance with esta-
blished rules and local usage or commercial rules and practice
certain conditions or time limit exist for commercial transactions
even though they have not been stipulated in the contract of sale.
SUB-SECTION (2) REGARDING THE TWO PARTIES TO A
CONTRACT
Article 345.
Besides being legally competent the seller and the buyer
must be entitled to take possession of the property or its value.
Article 346.
A contract of sale should be entered into by mutual con-
sent; a forced contract is not binding.
Article 347.
A blind person can sell or buy so long as be becomes aware
of the nature of the object by some means other than seeing it
or through the help of another person, even if that person is the
seller.
15
http://www.rezabastani.irhttp://www.rezabastani.ir
VVA
(V) ..s )Cail~ .:,t,;.I .jJ.A .:,~ti
17
llranian Civil Code
SUB-SECTION (3) REGARDING THE OBJECT SOLD
Article 348.
The sale of something of which the sale or purchase is by
law forbidden, or which is not (describable as) property or which
can bring no reasonable profit or which is not within the seller's
power to deliver is null and void unless the purchaser himself is
able to take possession of it.
Article 349.
The sale of property that is a religious endowment is not
valid unless there is a dispute among the beneficiaries in such a
way that endowed property and except in the cases provided for
in the chapter relating to Endowed Property.
Article 350,
Property can be sold in divided or undivided shares: or
if the property consists of goods that can be divided they can be
sold in parts, or they can be sold according to sample for delivery
after a period.
Article 351 .
When goods are of a general nature, i.e. when they can be
specified from numerous units, their sale is only valid when their
quantity, quality and description is given.
Article 352.
An unauthorised sale is not binding unless permission has
been given by the owner, as has already been stipulated in connec-
tion with unauthorised contracts.
Article 353.
If it is found that specified goods sold are not according
5http://www.rezabastani.ir
YVV
to specification, the sale is void and if a part of the goods sold are
not up to quality then that part of the sale is void and the pur-
chaser also has the right to cancel the remainder of the deal.
Article 354.
When a sale is arranged by means of samples, all the goods
sold must be similar to the sample; otherwise the purchaser has
the right to cancel the contract.
Article 355.
If property is sold as being of a certain area and it is found
that it is less than the stipulated size, the purchaser may cancel
the deal. Also if it is found that the area exceeds that laid down,
the seller may call of the deal. In both cases, however, the two
parties may come to a mutual agreement in regard to the shortage
or the excess.
Article 356.
Anything which is according to common usage and practise
should form part of the object sold or is considered as an attach-
ment to it or which is indicated .to be a part of this object forms
part of the sale and belongs to the purchaser, even if this has not
been ,clearly stated in the contract of sale and even if the two
parties to the contract were not aware of the common usage.
Article 357.
Any,thing that according to common usage does not form
part of the object sold will not be affected by the sale unless the
contrary has been clearly stipulated in the contract.
Article 358.
Under the above two articles if a garden or house is sold
the trees of the garden and the passage and water channel and
whatever is attached to the building in such a manner that it
cannot be detached without damage belong to the buyer. On the
contrary crops on land, fruit on trees and young of pregnant
animals do not belong to the buyer unless this h8.l! been stipulated
6http://www.rezabastani.ir
in the contract of sale or is considered as part of the object sold
according to common usage. In any case, however, the parties
can come to some other agreement.
Article 359.
If there is some doubt whether something is included in
the sale according to common usage, then the contract of sale will
not cover that thing unless some stipulation is made to that effect.
Article 360.
Anything that can be sold independently can also be ex-
cluded from the sale.
Article 361.
If after a contract has been made for the sale of some
specified object and it is found that this object does not exist, then
the sale is null and void.
SUB-SECTION (4) REGARDING CONSEQUENCES OF A SALE
Article 362.
The consequences of a regularly conducted sale are as
follows:
(1) The buyer becomes the owner of the object sold and
the .seller of its price as soon as a sale is effected.
(2) a contract of sale makes the seller responsible for de-
fects in the object of the sale and the buyer for defects in its price.
(3) a contract of sale makes the seller responsible for de-
livery of the object sold.
(4) a contract of sale makes the buyer responsible for pay-
ment of the price.
ITEM (1) REGARDING OWNERSHIP OF THE OBJECT
SOLD AND ITS VALUE
Article 363.
If in a contract of sale there is an option of cancellation
or if a period of grace is fixed for the delivery of the object sold
7http://www.rezabastani.ir
or for the payment of its price, this will not prevent transfer (of
ownership) .
Thus if the object of the sale is specified or the price fixed
and before they are handed over one of the two parties becoms
bankrupt, then other party will have a right of claim.
Article 364.
In the case of a conditional sale the ownership becomes
binding from the date of the contract and not from the date on
which any option expires. In the case of a sale in which delivery
is a condition, such as a sale of coins against other coins, the owner-
ship passes from the date of delivery and not from that of the
contract,
Article 365.
An invalid sale does not in any way cause ownership to pass.
Article 366.
Anyone who, following a sale that has been invalidated,
takes delivery of any object, must return it to the owner. Other-
wise, he will remain responsible for the object itself and any pro-
fits thereon in case they are lost or damaged.
ITEM (2) REGARDING DELIVERY
Article 367.
Delivery consists in the object sold being placed at the dis-
posal of the buyer so that he has control of it and can benefit
from it in any way he likes. Taking delivery is effected when the
buyer assumes control of the object bought.
Article 368.
The delivery takes place when the object sold is placed at
the disposal of the buyer even if the latter has not actually taken
possession.
Article 369.
Delivery is operative in various ways according to the vary-
ing nature of the object sold. It must be done in a way that is
accepted as valid according to common usage.
8http://www.rezabastani.ir
TV t
Article 370.
If parties to a contract fix a time for delivery of the object
of sale, the ability of the seller to deliver the object need not exist
till this object has to be delivered; the ability to deliver .need not
exist at the time of sale.
Article 371.
In sales which are dependent an the permission of the owner
of the object in question, it is sufficient if the seller can deliver
whenever the permision is given.
Article 372.
If the seller can only deliver a part of the goods sold, then
the sale is valid .for that part but not for the remainder.
Article 373.
When the goods are already in the buyer's possession, a
fresh delivery is not necessary; the same applies to the sale price.
Article 374.
For taking possession of the goods, no authorisation is
necessary. The buyer can take possession of goods he has bought
without any authorisation.
Article 375.
Delivery should be made at the place where the contract
was concluded, unless another place is required by common usage
or unless by a provision in the contract of sale a special place has
been fixed for the delivery.
Article 376.
In case of delay in delivery of the goods sold or of their
price, the party in defaul will be forced to make delivery.
Article 377.
Either the· seller or the buyer can retain the goods sold or
their price until the other party is prepared to deliver his part,
9http://www.rezabastani.ir
f V ,-
unless a special time has been fixed for the delivery of the goods
sold or the payment of their price, in which case the price or the
goods respectively should be handed over at once.
Article 378.
The seller who has voluntarily delivered the goods sold
before receiving their price cannot· reclaim them, except in the
case of the cancella.tion of the transaction, assuming that he has
the option to do so.
Article 379.
If the buyer undertakes to give security or a pledge for the
sale price and fails to carry out this obligation, the seller will have
the right to cancel the contract. If the seller promises to.provide
security against any defect in title and fails to provide it. the buyer
will have the right to cancel the contract.
Article 380.
In the case of the bankruptcy of the buyer, if he has retain-
ed in his possession the actual object of the sale. the seller can
reclaim it and he can keep the object sold if it has not yet been
handed over.
Article 381.
Costs of delivery, such as transport to the place of delivery
and also the expenses of checking, weighing and so on are at the
charge of the seller, but those connected with the payment of the
price are to be paid by the buyer.
Article 382.
If in regard to the expenses of the transaction or the place
of delivery, common usage lays down some rules contrary to those
detailed above or if in the contract some stipulations to the con-
trary are made, the common usage or these stipulaions shall be
followed.
The seller and the buyer can also modify the above rules by
mutual consent.
10http://www.rezabastani.ir
YVY
Article 383.
The delivery comprises also the things which are considered
as parts and accessories of the object sold.
Article· 384.
If under a contract the object sold is fixed in quantity and .
if on delivery less than this quantity is handed over, the buyer will
have the choice of cancelling the contract or of taking the quan-
tity available on payment of the right proportion of the price. If
the object sold exceeds in quantity the amount fixed in the con-
tract, the excess belongs to the seller.
Article 385.
If an object sold is one that cannot be divided without
damage, such as a house or a carpet, and if it is sold as being of
a fixed size but on delivery it is smaller or larger in size, then the
buyer in the former case and the seller in the latter can cancel
the contract.
Article 386.
If in the cases described in the above two articles the deal
is cancelled, the seller must refund, over and above the price, any
costs of the contract and reasonable expenses incurred by the
buyer.
Article 387.
If the object sold perishes before delivery, even without
fault or neglect of the seller, the sale will be cancelled and thie
price restored unless the seller has already applied to magistrate
or his substitute for the enforcement of the delivery, in which case
the loss will be borne by the buyer only.
Article 388.
If before delivery a thing sold deteriorates the buyer can
cancel the sale.
Article 389.
If under the circumstances described in the above tw1:>
articles the loss of the object or its deterioration in value is due tc,
an act of the buyer, he will have no claim on the seller and must
pay the price.
11http://www.rezabastani.ir
y \I I
ITEM (3) ON SECURITY AGAINST FAULTS IN TITLE
Article 390.
If, after acceptance of the price of the object sold, third-
party rights are discovered in respect of the whole or of a part,
the seller is a guarantor, even though he were not specifically
declared to be such.
Article 391.
. If third-party rights are discovered in respect of the whole
or of a part of the object sold, the seller must return the price of
the object sold; and if the purchaser be ignorant of the existence
of the defect in title, the seller must also take responsibility for
the losses suffered by the purchaser.
Article 392.
In the case mentioned in the previous article, the seller
must be responsible for the whole., of the price which he has recei-
ved in relation to the whole or part of the object sold, even though
after the conclusion of the sale for any reason whatever there
should be a reduction in price.
Article 393.
In respect of the excess which may have accrued to the
object sold owing to the acts of the purchaser, the provisions of
Article 312 shall apply.
ITEM (4) ON PAYMENT OF PRICE.
Article 394.
The purchaser must pay the price at the agreed time, and
at the place and in accordance with the conditions which are laid
down in the deed of sale.
Article 395,
If the purchaser does not pay the price at the agreed time,
the seller will have the right to cancel the transaction in accordance
with the arrangements concerning the option of delaying the pay-
ment of the price; or, he will have the right to demand that the
judge shall compel the purchaser to pay the price.
12http://www.rezabastani.ir
Too
----~ -------
-
--~----~------------
- - - --~
(A) ~~f ~/ .:if;tl ~i..u ~,Hi
(sJ Irania11
Civil Code
SUB-SECTION (5)
ON OPTIONS, AND ORDERS CONCERNING THEM
ITEM
(1)
ON OPTIONS
Article 393.
Options ar of the following kinds:-
(1) The option of Meeting-place
(2) The option of Animals
(3) The option of Conditions
(4) The option of Delayed Payment of the price
(5) The option of Inspection and Incorrect Description
(6) The option of Deception
(7) The option of Defect
(8) The option of Trickery
(9) The option of Sales unfulfilled in part
(10) The opt.ion of Unfulfilled Conditions
First Option
On the option of Meeting-place.
Article 397.
Each party to the transaction, subsequently to the con-
clusion of the sale, while in the place of meeting and before the
parties have separated, has the option of rescinding the sale.
Second Option
On the Option of Animals.
Article 398,
If the thing sold be an animal, the purchaser has the option
10http://www.rezabastani.ir
~I~ .:,lj.1
J.JA .:,.,Ill
Tot
----------
of rescinding the sale until three days after the conclusion of the
sale.
Third Option
On the Option of Conditions
Article 399.
It is possible that ,the sale may be concluded subject to the
condition that either the seller, or the purchaser, or both of them,
or some other person, should have right of cancelling the transac-
tion within a specified period.
Arlicle 400.
If the moment of commencement of the specified period be
not mentioned, the commencement will be reckoned as from the
date of the transaction; otherwise the period will be as laid down
in the agre~ment of sale.
Artkle 401.
If no period be specified for the option of Condition, both the
condition of option and the sc.le are null and void.
Fourth Option
On the option of Delayed Payment of the Price.
Arth:le 402.
If the thing sold is a concrete object, or is of that nature,
and if no period is specified by the two parties for the payment of
the price or the surrender of the thing sold, the seller has the op-
tion of rescinding the sale when three days have elapsed since the
date of the transaction and neither the seller has delivered the
thing sold to the purchaser nor the purchaser has paid the whole
price to the seller.
Article 403.
If the seller should, in any way whatever, apply for the
purchase money, and if it appears frmn the evidence that his inten-
11http://www.rezabastani.ir
tion was to oblige the purchaser to complete the sale, his option
will disappear.
Article 404.
Should the seller, within three days from the date of the sale.
deliver the whole of the thing sold to the purchaser, or should the
purchaser pay the whole of the price, the seller will no longer have
any right to rescind the contract, even though it should happen, in
any way whatever, that the thing sold returns the s,eller or the price
paid to the purchaser.
Article 405.
If the purchaser proffers the price and the seller refuses
to accept it, he loses his right to cancel the contract.
Article 406.
The option of Dels.y is purely for the seller; the purchaser
does not enjoy this right of option owing to a delay in the delivery
of the thing sold.
Article 407.
The payment of part of the price, or the delivery of same to
a person who is not authorised to receive it, does not avoid the op-
tion of the seller.
Article 408.
If the purchaser gives surety for the price, or if the seller
draws a bill for the price and the hill is honoured, the Option of
Delay is void.
Article 409.
If the thing sold is one of those things which spoils or de-
teriorates before the expiration of three days, the commencement
of the option is from the time that the thing sold is about to spoil
or to deteriorate.
12http://www.rezabastani.ir
---~-----= -·- -=~ ---~~-----
~
- - - - - - -~~- --------.--~- - - - - -
Fifth Option
On the option of Inspection and Incorrect description,
Article 410.
If 1J person should buy a thing fro1n its description only
without having seen it, and should then find on inspection that it
does no possess the description which had been made, he has the
option of either cancelling the sale or of accepting the object as it is.
Article 411.
If the seller has not seen the thing, whereas the purchaser
has seen H, and the thing sold possesses qualities which are other
than those described, the seller only shall have the right of can-
cellation.
Article 412.
If the purchaser has seen a portion of the thing sold, but
has only bought the rest from description or by way of samples, and
finds that that portion is not in accordance with the description or
with the samples, he can either reject all the thing sold, or accept it
all.
Article 413.
If one of the parties to the sale has previously seen the goods
and makes the tranacstion on the basis of his previous inspection
and if it appears, after inspection, that the said goods do not possess
the qualities which they previously had, he shall have the option
of recinding the transaction.
Arti.:le 414.
In a sale of merchandise of a general descripttion there is
no Option of Inspection, and the seller n1ust deliver goods which are
in accordance with the descriptions laid down by the two parties,
Article 415.
The option of inspection and incorrect description is effected
immediately after inspection.
13http://www.rezabastani.ir
Sixth Option
On the option of deception.
Article 416.
Either of the parties to a transaction if he has suffered an
evident deception, may, after b.eing apprised of the deception, cancel
the transaction.
Article 417.
An evident deception is one which amounts to one fifth
of the price or mor,e; if the deception is less than this in amount,
it is still "evident" if in accordance with common usage it is not
susceptible of being overlooked.
Article 418.
If the deceived party knows, at th.e time of the transaction,
the proper price of the thing sold, he will have no right of cancella-
tion.
Article 419.
In the determination of the extent of the deception, the con-
ditions of sale must be taken in consideration,
Article 420.
The option of deception is effective immediately after the
detection of 'the deception.
Article 421 ,
If a person who has deceived the other party to the transac-
tion delivers :the difference in price, the Option of Deception does
not disappear unless the decived party agrees of receive the di-
fference in price.
Seventh Option
On the option of defect.
14http://www.rezabastani.ir
yO •
Article 422.
If tt appears, after the transaction, that the thing sold was
defective, the purch~er has the option either to accept the defective
thing together with compensation for its defect, or to cancel the
transaction.
Article 423.
The Option of Defect attaches to the purchaser when the
defect was hidden, but existed at the time of the transaction.
Article 424.
A hidden defect is one which the purchaser, at the time of
the transaction, was not cognisant of its existence, whether this
ignorance arose from the fact that the defect was really concealed,
or whether the defect was evident but the purchaser did not realise
that fact.
Article 425.
A defect which· occurs in the thing sold after the sale but
before delivery Is to be regarded in the same way as a previous defect.
Article 426.
The detennina:tdon of a defect shall take pla~e in accordance
with "Urf" (common usage) and custom, and therefore may vary
with time and place.
Article 427.
If, in connection with the appearance of the defect, the pur-
chaser should exercise his option of receiving compensation therefor,
the difference in price which must be given to him will be decided
in the following way;-
The true price of the thing sold, in undamaged condition,
and the true price of the thing in its damaged state, will be deter-
mined by experts.
If the price of the thing, undamag,ed, be equal to the price
of the thing as fixed by the parties to the transactions at the time
1,http://www.rezabastani.ir
of the sale, the difference between 'this price and the price of the
thing in its damaged state will be the amount of compensation,
And if the price of the thing sold in the undamaged state
is less or greater than the price of the transaction, the proportion
which the price of the thing in the damaged state bears to the price
undamaged will be calculated, and the s,eller will retain that propor-
tion of the price fixed on in the transaction, and will give back the
rest to the purchaser by way of compensation.
Article 428.
Should the experts disagree, the average of their price will
be the authoritative price.
Article 429.
In the following circumstances the purchaser cannot cancel
the sale; he may only take compensation;-
!. If the thing sold is destroyed when the purchaser; or if
the thing be transferred to someone else.
2. If the thing sold is subjected to change, whether the
change is due to the action of the purchaser or not.
3. If after delivery of the thing sold, another defect should
take place in it: unless it should have taken place during the the
purchaser has his special option; in that case no impediment exists
to cancellation, and to the return of the object.
1
Article 430.
If the defect which takes place after dlivery arises as the
result of a former defect, the purchaser will also have the right to
return the thing sold.
Article 431,
Should thei::e be several things sold as part of the same
kansaction, in such a way that the price of each several thing is
not separately fixed, if certain of them are found to be damaged,
the purchaser must .either return all of them and receive back the
price, or keep all of them and take compensation, no discrimination
may take place except with the consent of the seller.
16http://www.rezabastani.ir
\' t A
Article 432.
Should the seller in a transaction be a single person, while
there are many purchasers, if a defect appears in the thing sold, one
of the purchasers may not singly return his portion while someone
else retains his, except with the consent of the seller; and so, if they
do not all agree in returning the thing sold, the only right which
remains to each of them is he right of clain1ing compensaion.
Article 433.
If in one transaction the sellers are more than one in
number, the purchaser may return the portion of one of them while
he retains the portion of another and claims compensation.
Article 434.
If it appears that the defective thing has in actual fact no
proprietary worth and no price, the sale is void; and if a part of the
thing sold has no valu.e, the sale in respect of that part is void and
the purchaser has, in respect of the remainder, a right of cancella-
tion in consideration of the Option of Sales Unfulfilled in part.
Article 435.
The option of defect, after it becomes known, comes im-
mediately into operaUon.
Article 436.
If the seller accepts no responsibility for the defect in such
a way that he can establish the fact that he was not responsible
therefor, or if he sells the object with all its defects, the purchaser
will have no right of recourse against the seller when a defect ap-
pears; and if the seller makes reservations against one particular
defect, he will be relieved of liability only in respect of that par-
ticular defect.
Article 437.
In respect of rules relating to defects, the price paid for a
thing if that price be something not money, follows the same rules
as those applying to definite goods sold.
17http://www.rezabastani.ir
yA •
(~) ~I~ .:,lj..1 .j.>.11 ~,Hi
9
( l
Iranian Civil Code
Eighth Option
On the Option of Trickery.
Article 438.
Trickery denotes conduct which causes the other party to
the transaction to be misled.
Article 439.
If the seller practices trickery, the purchaser will have the
right to cancel the sale, and similarly with the price paid by the
purchaser, if the latter practices trickery.
Article 440.
The option of trickery, after it becomes known, comes
immediately into operation.
Ninth option
On the Option of Sales Unfulfilled in part.
Article 441 .
The Option of sales unfulfilled in part arises when the
transaction, in respect o! a part of the thing sold, is void for any
reason; in that case the purchaser will have the right to cancel the
transaction, or else to accept that part of the thing in respect of
which the transaction was valid, while returning the price of that
part in respect of which the transaction was void.
Article 442.
When the Option of sales unfulfilled in part comes into
3http://www.rezabastani.ir
force, the portion of the price which must be returned to the
purchaser is calculated as follows:-
That part of the thing sold which becomes the property
of the purchaser will be valued alone; the seller will then keep that
portion of the price which bears to the whole purchase price the
same ratio as the value of the portion mentioned above bears to
the value of the whole thing sold in its entirety; and the seller must
return the rest to the purchaser.
Article 443.
The option of sales unfulfilled in part arises when the pur-
chaser, at the time of the transaction, did not know that the sale
was unfulfilled in part; but in any case the price will be divided.
Tenth option
On the option of unfulfilled Conditions.
Article 444.
The option of Unfulfilled Conditions arises in the circums-
tances recorded in Article 234 to 245.
Item (2)
On the Rules
Concerning Options in General.
Article 445.
All options descend after death to the heir of the deceased.
Article 446.
(But) it is possible that, an option of conditions may arise
expressly as being concerned solely with the person mentioned in
the condition; in that case it will not descend to the heir.
Article 447.
If the condition of option arises for a person who is not
4http://www.rezabastani.ir
rv;..
one of the parties to the contract, it will not be transferable by
inheritance.
Article 448.
It is possible to provide, in the deed of sale, for the avoidance
of all or any of the options.
Article 449,
Cancellation arises whenever any word is said or any deed
done which indicates cancellation.
Article 450,
Any possessory acts which are by their nature an indication
of satisfaction with the transaction amount in practice to accep-
tance; for instance, if the purchaser who has an option, and who
knows that he has an option, sells the object or pawns it.
Article 451.
Any possessory acts which are by their nature an indication
that the contract is cancelled, amount in practice to a cancellation.
Article 452.
If both of the parties to a contract have an option, and one
of them accepts while the other cancels, the transaction is cancelled.
Article 453.
In regard to Options of Meeting-place, of Animals and of
Conditions, if the thing sold, after delivry but during the existence
of the option of the seller or of the two parties, is destroyed or be-
comes defective, the purchaser is responsible; and if the option is
confined to the purchaser, the destruction of the defect incurs the
responsibility of the seller.
Article 454.
If the purchaser lets out the thing sold on hire, and the
5rvv
http://www.rezabastani.ir
---------~--- - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
sale is the cancelled, the hire is not void unless it has be-=n ex-
pressly or impliedly agreed that the purchaser is to have no right
of transference of the thing sold either in respect of itself or its
profits; in which case the hire is void.
Article 455.
If after the conclusion of the Contract, the purchaser con-
verts to another's use either the whole or a part of the thing sold,
as for instance if he mortgages it to S01ne person, the cancellation
of the transaction will not affect the rights of the said person
unless a condition has been broken.
Article 456.
Every species of option can exist in all binding transactions,
except the options of Meeting, of Animals, and of Delayed Payment,
which are confined to sales.
Article 457.
Every sale is binding unless one of the options are established
in regard to it.
CHAPTER Ill, SECTION 2
ON CONDITIONAL SALES
Article 458.
In the contract of sale the transacting parties may make
a condition that if ever the seller, within a specified period, gives
back to the purchaser the whole of the equivalent of the price, he
may exercise an option of cancellation of the transaction in regard
to the whole of the thing sold, similarly they may make a condition
that if ever he gives back a portion of the equivalent of the price,
he may have the option of cancelling the transaction in regard to
all of or part of the thing sold; in any case, the right of option
depends on the contract made by the two parties. And if there is
no special mention of whether the whole or whether a part of the
price has to be returned, the option will not be established unless
the whole of the price is returned.
6http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 459.
In a conditional sale, immediately on completion of the
transaction the thing sold becomes the property of the purchaser,
subject to the option held by the seller. Therefore if the seller
does not abide by the conditions fixed between him and the pur-
chaser regarding the return of the thing sold, the sale will become
unconditional, and the purchaser will become the unconditional
proprietor of the thing sold; and if on the contrary, the seller acts
in accordance with the above-mentioned conditions, and asks for
the return of the thing sold, it will become the property of the
seller from the moment of cancellation; but the accretions and
profits accruing from the thing sold from the time of the transac-
tion until the time of the cancellation belong to the purchaser.
Article 460.
In a conditional sale, the purchaser may not perform any
proprietary act in regard to the thing sold which conflicts with the
option, such as for instance transference of aleniation.
Article 461 .
If the purchaser, at the time of the option, refuses to accept
the price, the seller may hand over the price to the judge or his
deputy and may cancel the transaction.
Article 462.
If the thing sold by way of conditional sale becomes trans-
ferred to the heirs of the purchaser by reason of the latter's death,
the right of cancellation by the seller remains unchanged, in regard
to the heirs.
Article 463,
If in a conditional sale, it becomes apparent that the object
of the seller was in reality not a sale, the rules as to sales will not
be applied to it.
7http://www.rezabastani.ir
---------·-
CHAPTER Ill. * SECTION 3
ON BARTER
Article 464.
Barter is a transaction whereby one of the parties to the
transaction gives ~ thing in exchange for another thing received
from the other party to the transaction, without any stipulation
that one of the things exchanged should be a thing sold and the
other a price.
Article 465.
In barter the special rules relating to sales do not apply.
8http://www.rezabastani.ir
'
101
Iranian Civil Code
CHAPTER Ill • SECTION 4
ON HIRE
l.riicle 466.
Hire is a contract whereby the hirer becomes the owner of
the profits resulting from the thing hired. The person who lets out
on hire is called the "Mujir" (lessor) ; the person who hires is called
the "musta' jir" (lessee) and the thing which forms the subject
of the hire is called "ain-i-inusta' jareh" (the thing hired).
Article 467.
lllm:-.iate things, animals, or persons may all be the subject
of hple.
SUBS:i!CTICN I. • ON THE HIRE OF INANIMATE THINGS
Article 468.
In the hire of inaminate things the period of hire must
be specified, or else the hire is void.
Article 469.
The period of hire begins from the day arranged between
the two parties; and if in the deed of hire there is no mention of
any t1rne for commencement, the period will begin from the moment
of the transaction.
Article 470.
It is an essential condition of a contract of hire that the
lessor is able to deliver the thing hired.http://www.rezabastani.ir
I•A
Article 471.
In order that the contract of hire may be valid, it must be
possible that the thing hired may be capable of engendering profits
while remaining in its original state.
Article 472.
The thing hired must be a specified thing, and the hire
of a thing which is imperfectly known or which is uncertain
is void.
Article 473.
It is not necessary that the lessor should be the proprietor
of the thing hired, but the proprietor, if he wishes to let the
property, must be the proprietor of the profits arising from the
thing hired.
Artide 474.
The lessee may let the thing hired to another person, unless
in the lease there is a stipulation that he should not do so.
Article 475.
The hire of thing held in undivided shares is allowed,· but
the delivery of the thing hired depends on the permission of the
partner.
Article 476.
The lessor must deliver the thing hired to the hirer; if he
refuses to do so the lessor will be compelled; and if it proves im-
possible to compel him, the lessee will have the option of cancella-
tion.
Article 477.
The lessor must deliver the thing hired in such a condition
that the lessee is able to make use of the thing hired in the way
desired.http://www.rezabastani.ir
I • V
Article 478.
If it is established that the thing hired was, at the time
of hiring, defective, the lessee may cancel the lease, or he may
accept to hire it for the whole rent in the same state that it was
in; but if the lessor removes the defect in such a way that no less
results to the lessee, the latter will have no right of cancellation.
Article 479.
In order that a defect shall entitle the hirer to cancel the
lease, it is necessary that it should be a defect which causes a pre-
judice to the profits or makes them more difficult.
Article 480.
A defect which occurs after the contract of lease and before
any profit has been realised from the thing hired gives rise to an
option; and if a defect occurs during the course of the lease, the
option is established for the remainder of the period of hire.
Article 481 .
If the thing hired, in consequence of a defect, is no longer
capable of realising profits, and the defect cannot be removed,
the lease is void.
Article 482.
If the thing whi.ch forms the subject of hire is one of a
species of a general nature, and one unit of the same which was
delivered by the lessor is defective, the lessee has no right of can-
cellation, but he can compel the lessor to change the defective
unit; and if it is impossible to change it, he will have the right of
cancellation.
Article 483.
If during the course of the lease, the thing hired is destroyed,
in part or as a whole, the lease, from the time of the destruction, is
cancelled in relation to the proportion of the thing which has
been destroyed; and if part of it has been destroyed, the lessee hashttp://www.rezabastani.ir
I • •,
the right of cancellation of the lease in regard to the remainder
of the thing hired, or else to claim only a proportionate reduction
in the rent.
Article 484.
The lessor may not, during the period of the lease, in-
troduce changes in the thing hired, in snch a way that the changes
prejudice the lessee's purpose in hiring.
Article 485.
If during the course of the lease, repairs become necessary
in the thing hired, so that if they are delayed, loss will result to
the lessor, the lessee may not prevent the repairs, even though
during the whole or part of the time occupied by the repairs he is
unable to make use of the whole or part of the thing hired; in
that case he will have the right to cancel the lease.
Article 486.
The repairs, and the whole of the expenditure which is
necessary in order to maintain the thing hired in a state in which
it is able to earn profits, are the responsibility of the proprietor,
unless other conditions have been agreed upon, or unless the custo-
mary law of the place provides the contrary; similar rules hold for
the instruments and appliances which are necessary for the main-
tenance of the thing hired in a state in which it can earn profits.
Article 487.
If the lessee exceeds his powers or abuses the thing hired and
the lessor is unable to prevent that, the lessor has the right of
cancellation.
Article 488.
If a third person, without claiming any right, should interfere
with the lessee in 1·espect of the thing hired or the profits thereof,
and if this takes place before the lessee enters into possession, he
has the right of cancelling the lease; and if he does not cancel the
lease, he has recourse against the interferer in respect of thehttp://www.rezabastani.ir
cessation of the interference and of the payment of a reasonable
equivalent for the part in which he interfered; while if the inter-
ference takes place after the hirer has entered into possession,
he has no right of cancellation, and can only have recourse against
the interferer.
Article 489.
If the person who interferes claims any right relating to the
things hired or to the profits thereof, the interferer may not seize
the thing hired from the possession of the hire1·, unless he first
proves his right in a suit to which both lessor and lessee are parties.
Article 490.
The hirer must: -
treat the thing hired in a normal way and not use. it
excessively or abuse it.
(2) use the thing hired for the purpose which was agreed
upon in the leas, or if no purpose was specified, for
the purpose of profit in the way i.ndicated by the cir-
cumstances and conditions of the lease.
(3) pay the rent on the terms agreed upon, or if no terms
we::e agreed upon, in ca.sh.
(1)
Article 491.
If the kind of exploitation which is mentioned in the lease
does not ·2nvis"'ge exclusively the kind of exploitation intended, the
hirer can use the thing in such a way that it suffers a loss equal
to or less than the loss which it would have suffered if it had been
used in the wa•, indicated in the lease.
"
Article 492.
If the hirer uses the thing hired in a manner other than
that mentioned in the lease, or than tr.at which can be assumed
from circumstu!'l.ces and conditions of the lease, and it is not possible
to prevent that, the lessor will have the right to cancel the leas.http://www.rezabastani.ir
lot
Artiele 493.
The hirer is not a guarantor in respect of the thing hired,
in this sense, that if the thing· hired, without having been over-used
or abused by him, should be destroyeu, he will not be responsible,
but if the hirer over-uses or abuse the things, he is a guarantor,
even o! the prejudice suffered. is not the result of his having abused
or over-used it.
Article 494.
The contract of lease finishes immediately its period expires;
and if the hirer retains the thing hired after the expiry of the lease
in his possession without the permission of the proprietor, the latter
will be entitled to a reasonable compensation for the period of
retention, even if the hirer has drawn no profit therefrom; and if
he retains possession with the permission of the proprietor, he
must continue the payment of the rent only if he draws profits
therefrom, unless the proprietor has allowed him to retain the
thing gratis.
Article 495.
If a guarantor has been given in relation to the payement
of the rent, the guarantor will not be liable for the reasonable
compensation mentioned in the foregoing article.
Article 496.
The contract of lease will, on the destruction of the thing
hired, be void as fron1 the date on which the thing is destroyed;
and in regard to any departure from the conditions agreed upon
between the lessor and the hirer, the option of cancellation will
become established fron1 the date of such departure.
Article 497,
The contract of lease will not become void owing to the
death of the lessor or hirer; but if the lessor is the owner of the
thing hired only for the duration of his own life, the lease is void
on the death of the lessor, and if one of the conditions of the leasehttp://www.rezabastani.ir
has been that thehirer shall himself take charge of the thing hired,
the lease is void on the death of the hirer.
Article 498.
If the thing hired be transferred to another, the lease re-
mains in force, unless the lessor has made a condition that he shall
have the right of cancellation if the thing is transferred.
Article 499.
If a trustee of an endowed property, in pursuance of the
objects of the endowment, should let the thing endowed, the lease
will not be void on the death of the trustee.
Article 500.
In a cond:tional sale, the purchaser may let the thing sold
for the period during which the seller has no right of option, And
if the lease is incompatible with the option of the seller, he must
safeguard the rights of the seller by n1eans of making an option
or the equivalent thereof; otherwise the lease, in so far as it is
incompatible with the rights of the seller, will be void.
Article 501.
Ii in the lease the period is not specified clearly, ar..d if
the rent is specified as a certain sum per day, per month or per
year, a lease for one day, one month or one year will be valid; and
if the hirer retains the thing hired in his possession for priods
longer than those mentioned, and the lessor does not request him
to evacuate, the lessor will be entituled to the rent at the rate
agreed upon according to the time which has elapsed, in virtue
of their 1nutual Rgreement.
Article 502.
If the hirer carries out repairs in the thing hired without
the permission of the proprietor he will not have the right to claim
the price of those repairs.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 503.
If the hirer, without the permissicm of the proprietor, erects
buildings or plants trees in the house or the land which he has
hired, both the lessor and the hirer will have the right, whenever
he likes, to pull down the building or pull up the trees; in that
case, if the thing hired suffers any damage, the hirer is responsible.
Article 504.
If in accordance with the lease, the hirer is permitted to
erect building sor plant trees, the proprietor cannot compel the
hirer to pull down those buildings or pull up those trees; and if
after the expiry of the period a building or trees remain in the
possessio nof the hirer, the proprietor will have the right to claim
reasonable rent for the land; and if they are i nthe possession of
the proprietor, the ihrer will have the right to claim reasonable
rent from the proprietor.
Article 505.
Instalments of rent which, by reason of the fact that the
time for their payment ha snot arrived, have not become a liability ·
of the hirer, shall not become immediately payable by reason of
hi sdeath.
Article 506.
In leases of cultivable land, any kind of pests which attack
cultivated plants are the responsibility of the hirer, unless other
arrangements have been agreed upon in the lease.http://www.rezabastani.ir
(, \) ..r;. ICH1 ~ 1j.,f j J.r. .:., ~Hi
(11) Iranian Civil
(~ode
SUBSECTION 2. ON THE HIRE OF ANIMALS
Article 507.
In the hiring of animals, the specification of the profit de-
pends on either the specification of the period of hire, or the descrip-
tion of the distance and the place to which the rider or the goods
have to be transported.
Article 508.
In cases where the profit becomes known through the des-
cription of the period of hire, the specification of the rider or the
load is not necessary; but the hirer cannot transport more than the
customary quantity: and if the profits should be specified in the
description of the distance and the place, the specification of the
rider or the load is necessary.
Article 509.
In the hire of animals it is possible to make a condition that
if the proprietor does not transport the load to its destination in a
specified time, a specified sum shall be d,iducted from the hire.
Article 510.
In the hire of animals it is not necessary that the thing hired
should be a particular animal; the specil'ication of the species of
animal will be sufficient.
Article 511.
An animal which is the subject of hire must be used for the
definite purpose which the two parties intended; therefore an
animal which was hired for cannot be used for the transport of
loads.http://www.rezabastani.ir
- - - - =··"--=~~- ----~----~-
--~-.~----~
-
SUBSECTION 3. ON THE HIRE OF PERSONS
Article 512.
In the hire of persons, the person who hires is called
"musta'jir" (hirer) and the person who becomes the subject of the
hire is called "ajir" (hireling); and the price of hire is called "ujrat"
(wages,.
Article 513.
The principal divisions of contracts of hire of persons are
the following;-
1- The hiring of servants and workers of all kinds.
2- Contracts for the employment of persons who contract
for the carriage of goods, whether by land or sea or air.
(1) On the hiring of servants and workers ..
Article S14.
A servant or a worker may not become a wage-earner (ajir)
except tor a specified period or for the execution of a certain matter.
Article 515.
If a person becomes a wage-earner without the specification
of the termination of the period, the period of hire will be limited to
the period in accordance with which the hire is specified; therefore,
if the hire of the wage-earner is laid down as a certain sum per day,
per week, per month, or per year, the period of hire will be limited
to one day or one week, or one month or one year, and after the
expiry of the said period the hire will cease to have effect; but if the
· wage-earner after the expiry of the period of his hire, continues to
work and the proprietor keeps him, the wage earner, in view of the
mutual engagen1ent, is entitled to hire at the same rate as that
which was laid down during the time of the hire between him and
the proprietor.
(2) On contracts of carriage.
Article 516.
Contracts for carriage whether by land or sea or air, involve
the same engagements in regard to the protection and the care ofhttp://www.rezabastani.ir
Il •
the things entrusted to the carrier as those laid down for contracts
of bailment; therefore, if excessive usage or abuse takes place,
(that person) shall be responsible for the destruction or the
damage to the thing who received the thing for transporting; and
this responsibility shall attach to hi?n from the date of delvery of
the things.
Article 517.
The dispositions of Article 509 shall also be applicable to
carriers of goods.
CHAPTER Ill.
SECTION 5
ON CONTRACTS FOR AGRICULTURAL AND HARVESTING PURPOSES
SUBSECTION 1.
ON CONTRACTS FOR AGRICULTURAL PURPOSES
(MUZARA'EH)
Article 518.
A muzcira'eh is a contract in virtue of which one of the two
parties gives to the other a piece of land for a specified time so that
he shall cultivate it and divide the proceeds.
Article 519.
In a contract of muzcira'eh the share of each one of the
cultivators and agents must be specified by way of undivided shares,
as for instance a quarter, or a third, or a half, etc., and if the share
is specified in any other way the rules to a muzcira'eh shall not
apply.
Article 520.
In a muzcira'eh it is lawful to make a condition that one of
the two parties should give to the other party some other thing in
addition to the shar from the produce.
Article 521.
In a contract of muzcira'eh it is possible that each one
of the agents of production and the seed should belong to the cultihttp://www.rezabastani.ir
't'
vator or to the agent; in that case the undivided shares of each of
the two parties shall be determined in accordance with an agree-
ment or with local custom.
Article 522.
In a contract of m.uzara'eh it is not necessary that the pos-
sessor of the land should be the proprietor; but it is necessary that
he should be the proprietor of the profits of the land, or that 1n
some other manner, such as by way of guardianship (vilayat) etc.,
he has the right of possession of the land ..
Article 523.
The land which is the subject of muzara'eh must be capable
of being cultivated in the way desired, although it may need working
or water; and if the cultivation of the lands demands operations
which at the time of the contract the agent was ignorant of, such
as the construction of a water-channel, or of a well etc., he will have
the right of cancellation of the transaction.
Article 524.
The kind of cultivation must be specified in the contract of
musara'eh, unless it is known from local custom, or unless the con-
tract ·was for cultivation in a general sense; in the latter case, the
ag·ent will be entitled to choose the kind of cultivation which he
prefers.
Article 525.
The contract of muzdra'eh is a binding (lazim) contract.
Article 526.
Either the agents or the possessor may, in case of deceit,
cancel the contratc.
Article 527.
If, owing to the loss of water or other causes of this nature,
the land becomes unworthy of cultivation and it is impossible to
remove the cause of this defect, the contract of muzara'eh is can-
celled.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 528.
If a third person, before the land which is the subject of a
muzdra'eh is delivered to the agent, seizes the land, the agent has
an option of cancellation: but if he seizes the land after delivery
he has no right of cancellation.
Article 529.
A contract of 1nuzdra'eh will not be void owing to the death
of the parties or of one of them, unless a condition has been made
that the agent should supervise the work himself; in that case the
contract is cancelled when he dies.
Article 530.
If a person has a life interest in the profits of a property
and has given that property for development under a muzdra'eh,
the contract of muzdra'eh will be cancelled by his death.
Article 531.
After the appearance of the harvest resulting from the cul-
tivation, the agent becomes the owner of his share from that
harvest.
Article 532.
If, in the contract of muzdra'eh it is laid down that the
whole of the harvest shall belong to the cultivator alone or t.o the
agent alone, the contract is void.
Article 533.
If a contract of muzdra'eh for some reason becomes void,
the whole of the harvest becomes the property of the owner of the
seed, and the other party, who was the owner of the land or of the
water or of the labour, is entitled to a reasonable compensation in
proportion to that which he owned.
If the seed was shared between the cultivator and the agent,
the harvest and the compensation will also be divided among them
in the same proportions as the seed was owned.http://www.rezabastani.ir
I ti'
Article 534.
If the agent, during the course of the work, or at the beginn-
ing, abandons it, and if there is no one to carry out the work in his
place, the judge, at the demand of the possessor, compels the agent
to fulfil the work, or else continues the work at the expense of the
agent; and if this is impossible the possessor has the right of can-
cellation.
Article 535.
If the agent does not cultivate, and the period comes to an
end, the possessor is entitled to a reasonable compensation.
Article 536.
If the agent does not use proper care in cultivation, and the
harvest becomes less owing to this fact, or any other loss results
for the possessor, the agent will become the guarantor for the dif-
ference.
Article 537.
If, in the contract of muzcira'eh, it is laid down that a par-
ticular thing has to be cultivated, and the agent cultivates someth-
ing else, the muzdra'eh is void and the provisions of Article 533 shall
be applied.
Article 538.
If the muzcira'eh is cancelled during the period previous to
. the appearance of the harvest belongs to the owner of the seed, and
the other party will be entitled to a reasonable compensation.
Article 539.
If the muzara'eh is cancelled after the appearance of the
harvest, both the possessor and the agent share the harvest in pro-
portion to the arrangement between them; but from the date of the
cancellation, up to the gathering of the harvest, each of them will
be entitled to a reasonable compensation for the land, the work, and
the implements belonging to him, payable from the proportional
share of the other party.http://www.rezabastani.ir
\t I
Article 540.
If the period of the muzdra'eh comes to an end and it hap-
pens that the harvest is not ripe the possessor has the right to des-
troy the harvest, or to let it be, after receiving a reasonable com-
pensation.
Article 541.
The agent may take a wage-earner for the cultivation, or
take a partner; but the consent of the possessor is necessary for
transferring the responsibility of the transaction or the surrender
of the land to another person,
Article 542.
The land tax (kharaj) is the responsibility of the proprietor,
unless the contrary is stipulated in the agreement; the rest of the
expenses of the land depend upon the agreement of the two parties,
or on custom.http://www.rezabastani.ir
( 1 ,. ) u-~.S:i
(t
2
4 IJ I.I\! I J ..4.., IJ_,; Ii
I1·aniun ('.ivil c:ode
SUl!SECTION 2
ON CONTRACTS FOR HARVESTING AGAINST A SHARE
IN THE PR10DUCE (MUSAQAT)
Article 543
By a contract for irrigational purposes (musaqat1 is meant
a transaction which takes place between an owner of trees and
similar things and an agent, in return for a specified undivided
share of the produce; the word 'produce' includes fruit. leaves,
flowers, etc.
Article 544
In a case where the contract of rnusdqdt is void or is can-
celled, the whole of the produce is thi? property of the owner, and
the agent will have the right to a reasonable compensation.
A.rticle 545
The dispositions relating to muzdra'eh mentioned in the
previous subsection will also apply to contracts of musaqd.t except
that the agent cannot, without the permission of the owner, hand
over the transaction to someone else or enter into partnership with
some one else.
SECTION VI
ON BAILMEINiS (MUZARABEH)
Article 546
A bailn1ent (muzcirabe11.) is a contract in virtue of which
one of the contracting parties gives over some capitai with the
stipulation that the other party employs it in c01nn1erc.e, «tld shares
t.he profits arising therefrom. The owne1· oI the capital is called
the proprietor (malik) and his agent is the bailee (1nuzal'ib).http://www.rezabastani.ir
\
.
~
Article 547
The capital must be a sum i:n. cash.
Article 548
The share of each of the parties, proprietor and bailee, in
the profits must be an aliquot part o:: the whole, such as a quarter
or a third, etc.
Article 549
The shares mentioned in the previous article must be speci-
fied in the contract of bailment, unless in accordance with custom
they are separately known, and the fact that they are not mentioned
in the contract arises from that reason.
Article 550
A contract of bailment is a permissive one (i.e. it can be
rescinded at any time).
Article 551
A contract of bailmen'c may be cancelled owing to any of
the following reasons: -
1. In case of the death, luna,~y or mental incapacity of one
of the parties.
2. In case the proprietor bec,::imes destitute.
3. In case the whole of the capital and its profits disappear.
4. In case the trade which the parties envisaged becomes
impossible.
Article ~i52
If in a contract of bailment a definite period be laid down
for trading, the specifying of the period does not 1nake the contract
binding (lazim), but after the expiry of the period the bailee may
not make any transaction except with the renewed consent of
the proprietor.
Article !;53
Ir the contract of bailment is a general one, i.e. no special
fonn of trade is laid down, the bailee can perform any transactionhttp://www.rezabastani.ir
,vhich may seem to hin1 appropriate; but common practice must be
observed in respect of the kind of trark.
Artide 554
The bailee may not n1ake a contract of bailment with the
same capital, or transfer it to another, witl1out the permission 01'
the proprietor.
Artic:le 555
The bailee must perform acts which, in respect of that kind
of trade, are in conformity with common practice and the ci..:.stom
of the place and the time; but if he hilnself performs acts which
must, according to common practice, be performed by wage-earners,
he will not be entitled to a wag·e for them.
Artic:le 556
The bailee is in the position of the receiver of a deposit, not
of a guarantor of the sum given to him; c~xcept in cases of excessive
use or waste.
Artide 557
If a person gives a posse.;sion for the purposes of trade, and
makes a condition that the whole of the profits belong to the owner,
the transaction shall not be accounted a 1nuzci.rabeh (bailment);
and the agent shall be entitled to a reasonable compensation. unless
it is proved that the agent has executed the work gratuitously.
Article 558
If a condition has been raade that the bailee is the guaran-
tor of the capital, or that losses resulting from the trade are not
to be bol'ne by the owner, the transaction is void, unless a binding
condition has been made that the, bailee shall hand over gratuitously
to the owner from his own property the amount of loss or destruc-
tion suffered.
Article 559
In current accounts or deposit accounts it is possible that
the rules of bailments should apply, regard being paid to the
condition mentioned in the last part of the previous article; and
interest on the bailn1ent may be entered in these accounts.http://www.rezabastani.ir
\ ~y
Article ~i60
Except as provided before above, bailments are subject to
the conditions and arrangements laid down by the two parties in
their contract.
•CHAPTE~! Ill
SECTION 7
ON RE\VARDS (Jl'ALA)
Article 1;61
A ji'dla or contract of reward is defined as the engagen1ent
of person to pay a known recompense, in return for an act, whether
the other party is specified or not.
Article 1;62
In a contract of ji"dla the person who engages himself is
called the
(rewarder) the other party who does the act is
called the 'a.mil (agent) and the :reward paid is called the jd'Z
(reward).
Article :563
In a ji'dla the specification of the reward in all particulars
is not necessary; therefore, if a person engages himself to give to
whoever finds an article of his which he has lost a specified un-
divided share in it, the ji'dla is in proper form.
Article 564
In a ji'dla in addition to the fact that it is not necessary
to specify the agent, it is also pos:iible that the act shall also be
unspecified and the circumstances of the act not known.
Article 565
A ji'dla is a permissive eng::i.gement, and untill the act has
not been finished, each of the tw() parties can withdraw; but if
the rewarder withdraws during the course of the act, he must pay
to the agent a reasonable compensation for his act.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 566
If, in a ji'cilct the act has several parts, each one of which
was intended from the outset by the rewarder, and the ji'dla is
cancelled, the agent will be entitled to the price agreed upon in
proportion to the acts which he has done, whether the cancellation
shall come from the side of the rewarder or from that of the agent
himself.
Arti'cle 567
The agent will become entitled to the reward when he hands
over the thing which was th9 subject of the ji'ala orwhen he
executes the service in question.
Article 568
If more than one agent perforn1 the act in partnership,
each one of them, in proportion to the work he has done, will be
entitled to a share of the reward.
Article 569
A thing which has become the subject of a ji'dla is an
article of trust in the hand of the agent from the time that he
takes charge of it until the time that the agent gives it back to the
to the rewarder.
Article 570
A ji'dla relating to ::.n unlawful o.ct, or to an act which is
not in consonance with reason is void.
CHA.PTER Ill
SEC:ilON 8. SIJBSECTION ON!:
ON THE RULES APPERlAINING TO PARTNERSHIPS
Artil:le 571
A partnership is defined as the combination of the rights of
several proprietors in one single thing by way of undivided chai·es.http://www.rezabastani.ir
\
.
~
Article 572
A partnership is either voluntary or compulsory.
Article 573
A voluntary partnership arises either from any form of
contract or from the acts of the partners, such as when they com-
bine together voluntarily, or when they accept a property in undivi-
ded shares as the result of the acts of certain persons, and in
similar ways.
Article 574
A compulsory partnership is the combination of the rights
of proprietors arising out of their association with one another, or
from inheritance.
Article 575
Each one of the partners, in proportion to his share, shares
in the profits and losses, except where one or more persons, in
consideration of their services, are allotted greater shares.
Article 576
The method of administration of the joint property will
depend upon the conditions laid down between the partners.
Article 577
A partner who in the contract of partnership is permitted
to ad1ninister the property of the partnership is entitled to perform
any act which is necessary for the administration, and will in no
case be responsible for losses suffered as the result of his actions.
Article 578
The partners may always withdraw their permission unless
their permission has been given under an obligatory contract; in
that case, as long as the partnership lasts they have no right of
withdrawal.
Article 579
If the administration of the partnership is the duty of seve-http://www.rezabastani.ir
I
. .<
•
ral partners, in such a way that each one of them is independently
permitted to act. each one of them may singly perfonrt the acts
which are necessary for administration of the partnership.
Article 580
If it has been agreed among the partners that one of the
directors may not act without another, the director who acts alone
and has no written authorisation from the other partners, will be a
guarantor in relation to the partners, even if it is at that moment
impossible for other partners to intervene in the administration.
Article 581
The operations of each of the partners who act outside their
authority or without authority are ji'ala (voidable) and come
under the provisions relating to voidable fa·ansactions.
Article 582
A partner who without authority or outside the limits of
his authority operates in connexion with property of the· partner-
ship is a guarantor.
Article 583
Each one of the partners may, without the consent of the
other partners, transfer to a third person the whole or a part of
his share.
Ai'tide 584
A partner wl1o has possession of property belong1n§; .to the
partnership is in the positim1 of a truswe (amin) and 'Nill not be
a guarantor in respect of the destruction or damage of tl~at pro-
perty, except in cases of waste or excessive use.
Article 585
A partner who acts vtithout authority is responsible to the
persons with whon1 he has traded, and claimants have the l'ight to
refer to him only.
Article 586
If no period i~ ::;pecified for the partnership in th,2 text 0£http://www.rezabastani.ir
a contract of obligation, any one of the partners may withdraw
whenever he wishes.
Article 587
The partnership will be dissolved in one of the following
ways:-
1. On a share-out.
2. If the whole of the property of the partnership is
destryecl.
Article 588
In the following cases the partners are not authorised to
·
operate with the jointly owned property:-
1. On the expiry of the period of authority, or on withdrawal
if that is possible.
2. On the death of one of the partners, or when one of the
partners becomes subject to restraint.http://www.rezabastani.ir
( 1 ,-)u-~~~ wl,)111
3
(t l
J.1.., !JJ,ils
Iranian Civil ('.ode
SUBSECTION 2
ON TME DIVISION OF THE PROPERTY
OF THE PARTNERSHIP
Article 589.
Each one of tl:e partners can, when,,ver he wishes, demand
the division of the jointly-owned property, unless a division . in ~,c-
cordance with this law, is forbidden, or tbe partners have bound
the1nselves, in an irrevocable manner, not to divide the property.
Artic:!e 590.
If the partners are more than two in number, it is possible
that a division may be 1nade in respect of the shares of one or more
of the partners, and the shares of the rest n1ay be left undivided.
Article 591.
If the partners consent to a division of the property, the
division will take place according to the agreement of the partners,
and if the partners canno~ come to an agreement the judge· will
compel them to divide the property, provided that the division will
not result in any loss; if it does result too loss compulsion is not
permissible and the division must take place according to mutual
agreement.
Article 592,
If the division is to the disadvatage of some of the partners,
and not to the disadvantage of others, if the demand for a division
comes from a partner who suffers a disadvantage, the other party
will be compelled to agree; if the contrary, i.e. if the demand comes
from one who has not suffered loss, the other party is not compelled.
to accept a division.http://www.rezabastani.ir
\ ,\ ~
Article 593.
A loss is considered to be an impediment to division when it
represents an evident depreciation, to such a degree that, in accor-
dance with eo1nmon practice, it is not negligible.
Article 594.
11' a jdntly-owned qanat, or a similar thing, beco1nes defec-
tive· and need:i to be cleaned or repaired, and one or more of the
partners, to the loss of one or more other partners refuses to take
part in the cleaaing or repairs, the partner or partners who suffer
loss may refer tG the judge: in that case, if teh property is not
divisible, the ; J.dge may, in order to extirpate the source of dispute
&.nd to prevent loss, compel the partner who refuses, according to
the situation., to participate in the cleaning or the repairs, or to
hire or sell his share.
Article 595.
If a division will involve the disappearance, as a property,
of the whole or a part of the joint property or of the shares of one
er rnore of the partners, a division is forbidden, even if the partners
agree thereto.
Article 596,
If the jointly-owned property consists of several units, a
compulsory division of some of those units does not necessarily in-
volve the division of the rest of the property.
Article 597.
The separation of a private property from an endowed pro-
perty is permissible, but the division of an endowed property among
the beneficiaries is not permissible.
Article 598.
The arrangements for division are as follows:
If the joint
property is such that it must be divided itself, it will be divided up
01:. proportion to the shares of the partners; and if it be such that
1t can be valued, it will be apportioned according to its price; and
after the division or the valuation, if the pa,rties cannot come to
an agree:nent as to theh· particular shares, the matter will be de-
cided by lot.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 599.
The division, afte1· it has taken place in proper form, is
obligatoi·y, and none of the partners can dissociate himself from it
without the consent o:f the others.
Article 600.
If, in the portion of one or more cf the partners, a defect
may appear of which he or they did not 1-:now at the time of the
division, the partner or partners concerned have the right to set
aside the division.
Article 601.
If, after the division, it becomes apparent that the division
has taken place under a mistake, the division is void.
Article 602.
If, after the di.vision, it becomes apparent that a (iefinite
quantity of the property divided belonged to some one else, the
division is valid if, after the division, the property belonging to
another exists in each of the divided shares in the same proportion;
otherwise it is void.
Article 603.
A path or a watercoures belonging to any portion belongs.,
after the division, to that same portion.
Article 604.
A person who has rights over the property of another cannot
prevent a division of that property: but his rights will remain the
same after the division as they were before.
Article 605.
If the portion of one of the partni11·s is a waterchannel or
a path over the portion of another partner, the right of passage of
water or the use of th 1~ path shall not dis:;.ppear after the division,
unless such a disappears.nee shall have been agreed upc1n; and
other rights over the property of another follow the sam.e rule.http://www.rezabastani.ir
\AV
Article 606.
If the estate of a deceased person be divided up before the
payment of his debts, c,r if after the division it becomes apparent
that the deceased was liable for a debt, the creditor must refer to
each of the heir:s in proportion to his portion; and if one or more of
the heirs are unable to pay, the creditor may refer to the other
heirs for the settlement of the portions of the destitute heir or heirs.
CHAPTER 3
SECTION 9. ON DEPOSIT
SUBSECTION 1
ON GENERAL PRINCIPLES
Article 607.
By Depoist is meant a contract whereby one person entrusts
a thing belonging to hin1 to another in order that the latter should
:·etain it for him free of charge. The perosn who deposits is called
the ":nudi' " (depositor) and the person who receives the deposit
·.s called the ":nustandi'" or the "amin" (trustee).
Article 608.
In a Deposit the acceptance of the Trustee is necessary,
though it may be Shown by an act.
Article 609.
perosn may depost a tlling who is the owner or the
repre:ientativ2 of the owner; or who is, on behalf of the owner, ex-
plicitly or in1plic!tly authorised by the owner.
A
Article 61 O.
In a Deposit the two parties 1nust have capacity for a trans-
action, and if a person accepts a thing on deposit from another
person who has no capacity for a transaction, he 1nust return the
thing to the legal guardian of that person, and if the thing
depreciates or disappears in his possession he is a guarantor.http://www.rezabastani.ir
' i\ ~ . -
Article 611,
A Deposit is revocable contract
ON THE ENGAGENIENTS OF THE TRUSTl:E
Article 612.
The trustee n1ust preserve the deposited thing in the way
that the depositor laid down; and if there was no specific stipulation
for the manner in which the thing is to be preserved, he must
keep it in the way which is usual for that thing: otherwLo,e he is
a guarantor.
Article 613.
If the owner has laid down a way for the preserrati.0:-1 c,f the
thing deposited, and. the truste:e considers it necessary that way
should be changed in order to preserve t:ie thign he may chang it,
unless the owner has specifically forbidden any change; in that
case he is a guarantor,
Articl~ 614.
A trustee is not a guarantor in respect of the destruction or
the depreciation of the thing deposited with him, unless in case of
waste or excessive use.
Article 615.
A trustee in his position as a protector is not responsible
in respect of events the prevent.ion of which is beyond h:ls power ..
Article 616.
If the return of ti1e thing depo~i.ted be requested, :i.nd the
trustee refuses to return it, tlw rules a:, to trustees will (:ease to
apply to him from the date of his refu:,al, and he will become a
guarantor in respect of any defect or depreciation ,vhich ~upervenes
in the thing deposite:.~ even though that defect or depreciati.on does
not arise from any act of his.http://www.rezabastani.ir
'
\.
. · - -.~----. ---- - - - - - · -
- - - - - - - - - -- - - " ~ - - - ·----~ =~-- -·· - ---
Article 617.
The trustee cannot exercise any possessory rights over the
thing deposited except such as arise in protecting it; nor can rn:
in any way make a profit i·rom it, except with the express or in1plied
le:we of the ct,3positor; otherwise he is a guarantor.
Article 618.
If th 0 thing deposited is entruted to the trustee in a cloRed
bcx or a sealed letter, he has no right to open it; otherwise he is a
guarantot.
Article 619.
Th,: trustee must hand back exactly the same thing as he
reGeived.
Article 620.
Tile trustee must give back the thing clepoitsed in the same
states a.s the thing was at the time of giving it back; and he is not
a guar,1,ntor in re$pect cf the defects which may have accrued
th·~rE:in
Article 621 .
If the thing deposited is talcen by force from the trustee
and if l1e has received a payment or something else in its place, he
must give to the depositor that which he received in exchange; but
th,! depositor ls not obliged to accept it and he has the right to
th,: per:,Oll who took the thing away by force.
Article 622.
If the heil' of the trustee destroys the thing deposited he
ls :e;pon:;.lble ror supplying the equivalent or the price of the same,
evcm if hi: did not know that the thing was a deposit.
Article 623.
The profits resultL1g from a thing deposited belong to ~-;1e
owner.
Article 624.
The trustee must return the thing deposited only to thehttp://www.rezabastani.ir
-- .· ----.~---
-----~-~-~=~----
'.
---------·--=-~---=a--------- • -- ---·._,·-·--~-
person from whom he received it, or to bis legal representative, or
to a person who has authority to receive it; and if he wishes, from
force of circumstance, to give it back but has no means of app1\)ai:h
to a person entitled to receive it, he must give it back to D. judge.
Article 625.
If it is proved that the thing deposited belongs to s.nc,ther
person other than the depositor, the trustee must return it tc, the
true owner, and if the owner is unknown, the rul(!S ri::la :ing to
things of unknown ownership w:lll apply.
Article 626.
If a person deposits a thing, the d·?posit will become void :tt
the death of the depositor, and the tr1.1stee cannot return ,t to
anyone except to the heirs.
Article 627.
If there be more than one heir, s.nd if they do not agr,:e
among themselves about the thing, the thing deposited mtEl he
returned to the judge.
Artid,e 628.
If a change takes place in the sf,uatio:1 01 :;he r:.epositc,r,
such as for instance if he beco1nes a ward, the contl·act or depo~it
is cancelled, and the thing deposited cannot be returned except
to the person who has the right to administer the effects of thi, ward.
Article 629.
If a thing belonging to a person ·who has become a wal'd is .
deposited that thing rnust be given back to him when he ii: no
longer a ward.
Arllde 630
If a person n,ake:, s.. depoist of a t.11ing la his capa1·it;; i,s
guardian or tuteur, that thing after he ceases to posse,s thnt
capacity, must be returned to its owner. unless the ovr'.ler continues
to be a ward; in that case the ihing is returned to the subsequent
guardian or tuteur.http://www.rezabastani.ir
\ A\"
Article 631.
If a person is in possession of a thing in a capacity other
thEm tha1; of a trustee, and the provisions of this law render his
pot;ition, in respect of that thing, equivalent to that of a trustee, he
is ·;he same as a trustee; therefore, a tenant, in relation to the
thing hired, or a guardian or tuteur in relation to the n1inor's
property or to their ward, and the like, are not guarantors, unless
in cases of waste or excessive use; and if the owner is entitled to
have the thing returned to him, th possessor, fron1 the moment of
the owner's application and the possessor's refusal to return
although he could have done so, will be responsible in case of
clestr'-lction of tl1e thing or of any kind of da1nage or defect, even
though it be not the consequi,mce of his own a.ct.
Article 632.
Garavansarai propdetors, hotel keepers, bath keepers and
sin1ilru: p1~rsons are responsibl3 in respect of :.:.1e effects and goods
and clothes of persons who enter those pla.ces only if those effects
and gocds and clothes are deposited with them, or if in accordance
with local custom those effects are in the position of being on
deposit.http://www.rezabastani.ir
( t t ) ~""'t,I.(; ~ iJ IJi! I ,j .>., 1JJi
(
141
u
Iranian C:ivil Code
SUBSECTION 3
ON THE ENGAGl:MENT C)F THE DEPOSITOR
Article 633.
The depositor inust give to the trustee the expenses which
he has incurred in the pres11rvation of the thing deposited.
t~rticle 634.
If the return of the thing deposited necessitates any ex-
penditure, the depositor must pay.
section 10
ON LOAN
Article 63 5.
A loan is a contract whereby one of the parties gives the
other party permission to derive profit, gratis, from a thing belong-
ing to the former. The person who gives is called the loaner (mu'ir)
and the person who receive:s is called the borrower (inusta'ir).
,~rticle 636.
The loaner, in addition to having capacity, must be the
owner of the profits of the things which he gives on loan, even
though he be not the owner of the thing itself.
Article 637.
Any thing which is capable of yielding a profit while con-
tinuing its own existence unchanged is capable of being loaned.http://www.rezabastani.ir
l ,. \
The profit which is envisaged in a loan is profit which is
lawful and :reasonable.
Article 63EI.
A loan is revocable contract, and is cancelled by the death
of either of the parties.
Article 639.
If the thing loaned possesses defects which cause loss to
the borrower, the loaner will not be responsible for the losses
incurred unless he is regarded as the causer of the defect by local
custom:
The same rule also applies in the case of depositor or a
lessor, etc.
Article 640.
The borrower is not a guarantor as to the destruction or
the depreciation of the thing loaned, unless in case of waste or
excessive use.
Article 641 .
The borrower is not responsibl,e for a defect arising from
using the thing loaned, unless he has used the thing in a way not
permitted; or, if the loan was unconditional, if he has used it in a
way not in accordance with common usage.
Article 642,
If a condition of guaranty has been imposed on the borrower,
he will be responsible :for any loss or defect, even though
that loss or defect be not related to any act of his.
Article 643.
If the borrower has also had to furnish guaranty for defects
resulting frorn usage in general, he will be a guarantor for these
defects too.http://www.rezabastani.ir
\ I" •
Article 644.
In a loan of gold or silver, whether coined or not, the
borrower is a guarantor even if he has not been subjected to a
guaranty, and even if there has been no waste or excessive use.
Article 645.
In the return of the thing loaned the provisions of Articles
624 and 626 up to 630 must be observed.
Article 646.
The expenditure necessary for deriving a profit from the
thing loaned is the responsibility of the borrower, and the expenses
of up keep of the thing follow the rules of common usage and
custom, except as provided in special agreements.
Article 647.
The borrower cannot in any circumstances has over the
thing loaned to the possession of another, except with the per-
mission of the lender.
SECTION 11
,ON LOANS
Article 648.
A loan (qarz) signifies a contract whereby one of the two
parties surrenders to the ownership of the other party a difinite
portion of his property, so that the other party may return to him
what is equivalent thereto i:n. respect of quantity, kind, and descrip-
tion, and if that party declines to give back the equivalent, he gives
the price of the same on the day of payment.
Article 649.
If a thing which is the subject of a loan, after being handed
over, is destroyed or becomes defective, the loss is to be n1ade good
from the property of the borrower.http://www.rezabastani.ir
\ T~
Article 650
1
•
The debtor must return a thing similar to the thing he
has received, even thought it inay have appreciated or depreciated.
Article 651 .
If a specified period be appointed for the payment of the
debt, in binding form, the lender cannot claim the settlement of
his loan before the expiry of the term.
Article 652.
At the time of the lender's cl.aim for payment, a judge
arranges for a delay or for payment by instalments on behalf of the
debtor, according to the circumstances,
Article 653.
The debtor can give a power oJ: attorney to the lender, in
binding form, providing that during the time that the debt is
incumbent upon him, the lender may transfer to himself, from
the property of the debtor, a specified quantity of things gratis
every month or every year.
SECTION 12
ON GAMBLING AND BETTING
Article 654.
Gambling and betting are void transactions and no action
based on them will lie. The same rule applies to all engagements
which arise out of illegal transactions.
Article 655.
Betting is permitted in races of riding animals, in shooting
matches and in fencing, the provisions of the foreg·oing article
do not apply to them.http://www.rezabastani.ir
' r"
Sl:CTION 13
OIIIJ AGENCY
SUIBSECTION 1
ON GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS
A.rticle 656.
An agency is a contract whereby one of the parties appoints
the other as his representative for the accomplishment of some
matter.
An agency does not enter in to force until the agent accepts
the agency .
.4,rticle 6~,8.
An agency comes into being, whether by way of proposal
or acceptance, by any word or act which indicates an agency.
"1rticle 659.
An agency may be either gratis or in return for a wage.
Article 660.
An agency canan be a general nature, and for the whole of
the affairs of the principal, or conditional, or for a certain matter
or matters.
Article 661 .
If the agency is a general one, it will be concerned only
with the administration of the property of the principal.
t~rticle 662.
An agency must no·~ be given except for a matter which
the principal himself is entitled to engage in; and the agent must
be a person who has the capacity to execute that matter.http://www.rezabastani.ir
\ TV
Article 663,
An agent cannot execute a matter which is outside the
limits of his authority.
Article 664.
An agent in a trial (i.e. an attorney) is not an agent
empowered to receive what is due, unless he is proved to be so;
similarly an agent appointed to collect something to which his
principal is entitled will not be an attorney in a dispute.
Article 665,
An agent in a sale is not an agent for the receipt of the
purchase-price, unless there is indisputable proof thereof.
SUBSECTION 2
ON THE ENGAGEMENTS C)F THE AGENT
Article 666,
If the principal suffers loss owing to the fault of the agent,
and if the agent is by common law considered to be the cause of
loss, he will be responsible.
Article 667.
The agent must, in his negotiations and investigations, bear
in mind the interests of his principal, and must not exceed the limits
of the authority which the principal has explicitly given him, nor
the authority which is given hirn by custom and usage 1n accordance
with precedent.
Article 668.
The a.gent must give to his principal an account of the time
of his agency, and must give up to him that which he has received
for his principal.http://www.rezabastani.ir
whatever, unless he expressly or im.pliedly permits the 1rregular
actions of agent.
Article 675.
The principal must pay the whole of the expenditure in-
curred by the agent in the execution of his agency, and also the
remuneration of the agent, unless other arrangements have been
made in the contract of agency.
Article 676.
The agency fee of the agent will be in accordance with the
agreement between the two parties; a.nd if there has been no agree-
ment relating to the agency fee or its size, it will be in accordance
with local law and custom; if there is no recognised custom, the
agent is entitled to a resonable compensation.
J,rticle 677.
If it is not expressly stated in the contract of agency whether
the agency is gratis or for a fee, the presumption is that it was for
a fee.
SUBSECTION 4
ON THE VARIOUS Y.rAYS OF ENDING AN AGENCY
Article 678.
An agency can be dissolved in the following ways;-
1. By dismissal by the principal.
2. By resignation of the agent.
3. By the death or insanity of the principal or the agent.
Article 679.
The principal can, whenever he desires, dismiss the agent,
unless a condition has been made in the course of an obligatory
contract as the agency of the agent or the impossibility of his
dismissal.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 669 .
If two or more agents are appointed for the execution of
one matter, no one of these agents may participate in that matter
witht out the other or others; unless each of them has an indepen-
dent agency; in that case each one of them can singly do the work.
Article 670,
If two persons are agents in association with one another,
and one of them dies, the agency of the other becomes void.
Article 671 ,
An agency for a certain matter involves an agency for the
preliminaries and essential preparations for that matter, unless it
be expressly stated that the agency does not apply to them.
Article 672.
An agent in a matter rnay not give an agency to any one
else in that rnatter, unless he is expressly or impliedly an agent
entitled to select a sub-agent.
Article 673.
If an agent who is not entitled to appoint a sub-agent hands
over to a third person the execution o:f the matter for which he
has the agency, both the agent and the third person will be respon-
sible to the principal for the losses which they are considered to
have caused.
SUBSECTION 3
ON THE ENGAGEMENTS OF THE PRINCIPAL
Article 674.
The principal must execute all the engagements which the
agent, within the limits of his powers, has undertaken.
In respect of that wich has been done outside the limits of
the powers of the agent, the principal will be under no obligationhttp://www.rezabastani.ir
,l'l~rticle 680.
Everything which the agent has done before the news of
his dismissal reaches him, in the limi.ts of his powers, is valid.
)~rticle 681.
After the agent has resinged, he may continue to take steps
in pursuance of the agency as long as it is evident that the principal
continues to give his permission.
Article 682.
The fact that the principal becomes a ward annuls the
agency except in respect of things in which wardship does not
impede there being an agency; similarly, the wardship of the agent
annuls the agency, except where wardship does not imped the
steps necessary for the agency.
,~rticle 6a3.
If the substance of the agency disappears, or the principal
performs himself that he assigned to the agent to do, or in a general
way does that which is contrary to the agency of the agent, as for
example if he sells himself that for which he gave an agency for
agent to sell, the agency is void.http://www.rezabastani.ir
( I o) ~·•oel,(ilf ~ IJll I J J.. ~Jl lf
5
(' )
Iranian Civil Code
SECTION XIV
ON GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS
SUBSECTION I
ON CONTRACTS OF GUARANTEE
Article 684.
A contrat of guarantee is defined as such that a person
takes upon himself the responsibility of a property which forms an
obligation upon another person.
The person who accept the obligation is called the Zamin
guarantor); the other person is termed Mazmunun lah (he to whom
the guarantee is given, i.e. the creditor), and the third third person
is termed the Mazmunun anh (he from whom the guarantee 1s
given) or the original detor.
Article 685.
In contract of guarantee the consent of the original debtor
1s not an essential condition.
Article 686.
The guarantor must have capacity to transact.
Article 687.
It 1s permissible to be a guarantor of a person under ward-
ship or dead.
Article 688.
It ls possible for the guarantor to furnish a guarantee.http://www.rezabastani.ir
IA\
Article 689.
If more than one person become guarantors for a man, the
guarantee of the person whom the creditor accepts is the valid
guarantee.
Article 690,
In a contract of guarantee it is not essential that the guar-
antor should be the possessor of property; but if the person to
whom the guarantee is given is ignorant, at the time of guarantee,
of the lack of means of the guarantor, he can cancel the contract;
but if the guarantor, after the contract becomes destitute, the
person for horn the guarantee is given has no option.
Article 691,
A guarantee in respect of a debt the cause of which has not
yet arisen is void.
Article 692.
In a present debt it is possible for the guarantor to specify
a period for the payment; and similarly for a debt due at a future
time he can engage to pay it immediately.
Article 693.
The person to whom the guarantee is given can in a contract
of guarantee require a pledge from the guarantor, even though no
securtty as taken in the original debt.
Article 694.
It is not essential for the guarantor to know the amount,
the details, and the conditions of the debt which he guarantees;
hence, if a person becomes the guarantor of a debt of a person
without knowing what the amount of it was, the contract of
guarantee is valid; but a gurantee of one of several debts, such
that there is a doubt which one is meant, is void.
Article 695.
It ls not necessary for the guarantor to know personally
the person to whom the guarantee is given or the original debtor.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 696.
It is possible to guarantee any debt, even if there is a
mention of a cancellation as a condition therein.
Article 697.
A contract of guarantee is permissible from the purchaser or
seller in respect of a defect in the thing sold or of its whenever either
the thing or its value attaches to a third person.
SUBSECTION 2
On the effect of a guarantee on the guarantor
and the person to whom a guarantee is given
(i, e. on the creditor)
Article 698.
After the guarantee is validly made, the obligation of the
original debtor is discharged and the obligation of the guarantor
towards the original creditor comes in to force.
Article 699.
A suppositional guarantee, as for instance if the guarantor
says if the debtor does not pay I will be the guarantor is void; but it
is possible to make conditions in respect of an obligation to pay.
Article 700.
A guarantee which lays down conditions concerning the
existence there (i.e. existence of a debt), as for instance if the
guarantor undertakes that if the person guaranteed is in debt the
guarantor will guarantee him, is not void.
Article 701.
A guarantee is a binding contract, and the guarantor or the
person to whom the guarantee is given cannot cancel it, unless in
case the guarantor becomes indigent as laid down in Article 690;
or 1f there be a right of cancellation in respect of the debt which is
guaranteed; or 1f the conditions of the contract are not adhered to.http://www.rezabastani.ir
\AV
Article 702,
If the guarantee specifies a period, the person guaranteed
cannot claim his due from the guarantor before the expiry of the
period, even if the debt be repayable at sight.
Article 703.
In a sight guarantee the person guaranteed has the right to
claim his due, even though the debt may be payable after a certain
term.
Article 704.
A general guarantee is a sight guarantee, unless it becomes
evident, from proofs, that it relates to a period.
Article 705,
A delayed guarantee becomes a sight guarantee on the death
of the guarantor.
Article 706.
If the debt is payable after a certain period, but the guaran-
tee is at sight the person to whom the guarantee is given has the
right to claim from the guarantor, after the guarantee.
Article 707.
If the claimant releases the guranteed person from his
obligation, the guarantor will not be relea.sed, unless the object of
the claimant is to abolish the debt altogether.
Article 708.
A person who is a guarantor for a defect in a thing sold is
released on the contract of sale for reasons of non-fulfllment of con-
tract or of an option.http://www.rezabastani.ir
I A'I
SUBSECTION 3
On the effects of a guarantee as between the
guarantor and the guaranteed debtor
Article 709.
The guarantor has no right of recourse against the guaran-
teed debtor except after the payment of the debt; but he can have
recourse if the guaranteed debtor has engaged to obtain a release
for him within a specified time, and that time has elapsed.
Article 710.
It the guarantor, with the consent of the creditor, assigns
the payment of the debt to another, and if that person agrees to
pay it, it is as though he (the guarantor) has the debt, and he has
a right of recourse to the guaranteed debtor; the same holds when
the debt is assigned by the claimant to the guarantor.
Article 711.
If rhe guarantor pas the debt, and the guaranteed debtor
pays it again, the guarantor will not have recourse against the
creditor, but must refer to the guaranteed debtor; and latter can
take back from the creditor what he paid him.
Article 712.
It the creditor dies, and guarantor becomes his heir, he has
heir, he has a right of recourse to the debtor.
Article 713,
If the guarantor gives to the creditor less than the debt, he
cannot claim from the debtor more than he has given, even if he
has given, even if he has compromised for less than the amount
of the debt.
Article 714.
If the guarantor gives to the creditor more than the debt,
the debt, he has no right to claim more, unless he has given it with
the permission of the debtor.http://www.rezabastani.ir
l AO
Article 715,
If the debt is payable at the end of a term, and the guaran-
tor pays it before the due date, he cannot claim from the debtor as
long a the period of the debt is still unexpired.
Article 716.
If the debt is payable at sight, whenever the guarantor pays
it, he can refer to the debtor, even though the guarantee was for a
period which had not then elapsed, unless the debtor has given
permission for a deferred guarantee.
Article 717.
If the debtor pays the debt, the guarantor is released, eve~
though the guarantor may not have given the debtor permission
to pay.
Article 718,
If the creditor releases the guarantor from the debt, the
guarantor and the debtor are both released.
Article 719,
If the creditor releases the guarantor, or if another pays the
debt gratuitously, the guarantor has no right of recourse to the
debtor.
Article 720,
A guarantor who guarantees with the object of doing a
spontaneously benevolent act has no right of recours to the debtor.
SUBSECTION 4
On the effect of a guarantee on more than one guarantor
Article 721.
If several persons give a guarantee to a person in respect of
a debt by way of shares, the guaranteed creditor has the right of
recurse to each one of them to the extent of his share only; and if
one of the guarantors pays the whole of the debt he can refer to
each one of the guarantors who agreed to the payment, to the ex-
tent of his share.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 722.
A guarantor of a guarantor has no right of recourse to the
original debtor, but must refer to his own creditor; and in the same
manner every guarantor has recourse to his creditor, and so on up
to the original debtor.
Article 723.
It 1s possible that a person renders himself responsible for
the payment of the another in the course of a binding contract;
in that case the fact the obligation 1s conditional does not render
it void, as for instance when a person incurs an obligation to pay
the debt of a debtor on condition that the debtor fails to pay.
.,http://www.rezabastani.ir
( I ., ) ~ ~ C:.,l,J!! I
(tbl
JJ., C:.,Ji lJ
Iranian Civil Code
SECTION 15
ON THE TRANSFER OF OBLIGATIONS (HAVALEH)
Article 724.
By 'havaleh' is meant a contract in virtue of which the claim
of a person from a debtor is transferred to a third person for
settlement.
The debtor is called 'muhil', the claimant is called' 'muhtaZ',
and the third person 'muhalun alaih'.
Article 725.
A transfer of this kind does not become definite except with
the consent of the claimant and the third person.
Article 726.
If, in regard to a transfer (havdleh), the 'debtor' (muhil)
is not indebted to the claimant (muhtal), the provisions applicable
to a 'havaleh' will not apply.
Article 727.
It is not necessary, for the propriety of the transfer, that
the third person should be indebted to the debtor; in that case, the
third person, after accepting, in the position of a guarantor.
Article 728.
The solvency of the third person is not a necessary condition
of the propriety of the transfer.
www.noormags.irhttp://www.rezabastani.ir
,.,.
Article 729,
If, at the time of the transfer, the third person is indigent,
and the claimant is ignorant of his indigence, the claimant can
cancel the transfer and have recourse to the debtor.
Article 730.
After the transfer is definite, the obligation which was
incumbent upon the debtor in respect of the transferred debt is
discharged, and the obligation attaches to the third person.
Article 731,
If the third person was not indebted to the debtor, he may,
after paying the sum transferred, have recourse to the debtor for
the same sum.
Article 732.
A transfer is a binding contract, and neither the debtor,
nor the claimant, nor the third person can cancel it, except in
accordance with Article 729, or when the condition has been made
that an option of cancellation should exist.
Article 733.
If, in a sale, the seller makes a transfer providing that the
purchaser should pay the price to some person, or if the purchaser
makes a transfer empowering the seller to receive the price from
someone, and the nullity of the sale is established, the transfer is
null; and if the claimant has recived the price he must give it back;
but if the sale becomes cancelled in consequence of a cancellation or
deceit, the transfer is not nul, but the third person is discharged,
and the seller or the purchaser can have recourse the one to the
other.
The provisions of this article will apply to other contracts
also.http://www.rezabastani.ir
I•y
SECTION 16
ON PERSONAL SURETY (KIFALAT}
Article 734.
A 'kifalat' is a contract by virtue of which one of two parties
engages, with the other party, to produce the presence of a third
person.
The person who engages is called a'kafil'; the third person
is called a'makful' and the other party is called 'makfulun lah'.
Article 735.
A 'kifalat' takes place with the consent of the 'kafil' and of the
'makfulun lah'.
Article 736.
It is not necessery, for the validity of the 'kifalat', for the
'kafil' to know that there exists a lawful claim incumbent, upon the
'makul'; the existence of a claim to a right on the side of the
'makfulun lah' is sufficient, even if the' 'makful' denies it.
Article 737.
A 'kifalat' may be permanent or temporary; if it is tem-
porary, its period must be specified.
Article 738,
It is possible for another person to beccome the kaftz' of a
'kafil'.
Article 739,
In a permanent 'kifalat', the 'makfulun lah' may, whenever
he desires, request that the 'makful' be produced; but in a tempor-
ary 'kifalat' he has no right of claim before the end of the term.http://www.rezabastani.ir
I•I
Article 740,
The 'kafil' must produce the'makful' at the time and the
place which he has promised; or else he must incur the respon-
sibllity for the right which is proved to be incumbent on the
'makful'.
'Article 741.
If the 'kafil' has engaged to surrender property if the
'makful' does not appear, he must act in accordance with his
engagement.
Article 742.
If in the 'kifalat' on place has been specified for the surren-
der of the 'makful', the 'kafil' must hand over the 'makful' in the
place where the contract was made, unless the contract envisages
another place,
Article 743,
If the 'makful' is absent, a delay will be accorded to the
'kafiZ' sufficient to enable him to produce the 'makful'.
Article 744.
If the 'kafil' hands over the 'makful' at a time or in a place
other than that which was laid down, or contrary to the conditions
which he made, it is not incumbent upon the 'makfulun lah' to
accept this: but if he agrees, the 'kafil' is discharged; similarly, if
the 'makfulun lah' requests the surrender of the 'makful' in a way
contrary to that which was laid down by the two parties, the 'kafil' . .
is not obliged to accept.
Article 745.
Any person who abducts a person from the control of the
one entitled to control him, or his lawful deputy, without his con-
sent, 1s in the position of a 'kaflt' and must produce that person; if
not, he must take responsibility for the due which are proved to
attach to him.http://www.rezabastani.ir
\ 0 •
Article 746.
the 'kafil' will be discharged in the following cirsumtances:-
1. If he produces the 'makful' in the manner agreed upon.
2. If the 'makful' himself appears at the appointed time.
3. If the obligation of the 'makful' is discharged in any way
from that which the 'makfulun lah' claimed.
4. If the 'makfulunlah' gives a discharge to the 'kafil'
5. If the claim of the 'makfun lah' becomes in any way
transferred to another person,
6. If the 'makful' dies.
Article 747.
If the 'kafil' produces the 'makful' in accordance with the
conditions agreed upon and the 'makfulun lah' refuses to take
delivery of him, the kafil will be discharged after reference to
witnesses or to the judge.
Article 748.
The death of the 'makfulun lun will not involve the dischar-
ge of the 'kafik'.
Article 749.
If one person becomes a 'kafil' for a person in relation to
several persons, be will not be discharged as far as the others are
concerned by the delivery of the person to one of them.
Article 750,
If a person be the 'kafil' of a 'kiafl' and another person be
his 'kafil' ,and so one each'kafil' must produce the 'makful' pertain-
ing to him; whoever of them produces the original 'makful' is dis-
charged together with all the others; and whoever of them becomes
discharged by reason of any of the reasons mentioned in Article
746, the 'kafils' who come after him are discharged too.
Article 751.
If the 'kifalat' is with the permission of the 'makful', and the
'!cafil', not being able to produce the 'makful', pays whatever penaltyhttp://www.rezabastani.ir
attaches to him, or if he pays a penalty with his permission, he can
have recourse to the 'makfuZ' and receve back what he has paid;
but if neither was with the consent of the 'makfu'Z, he will have no
right of recourse.
SECTION 17
ON SETILEMENTS OF ACCOUNT
Article 752.
A settlement of account is possible either in the case of the
adjustment of an existing dispute, or for the avoidance of possible
dispute, or in the case of a transaction etc.
Article 753.
In order that the settlement of account may be in proper
form the two parties must have capacity for the transaction and
must have an interest in the subject of the settlement of account.
Article 754.
Every settlement of account is effective, except that which
relates to an unlawful matter.
Article 755.
A settlement of account is also possible even when the claim
is denied, therefore, a request for a settlement is not to be regarded
as a confession of indebtedness.
Article 756.
Civil claims which have arisen as the result of a crime may
also become the subject of a settlement of account.
Article 757.
A settlement of account without recompense is also lawful.
Article 758.
A settlement made in respect of a transaction, though it
provides the final result of the transactions which it replaces, does
not include the soecial conditions an attributes of the transaction.http://www.rezabastani.ir
ltA
Therefore, if the subject of the settlement of account is a
definite object given in return for a consideration, its result will
be the result of a sale, without the execution of the special condi-
tions and rules appertaining to a sale.
Article 759.
A settlement of account does not involve a right of pre-emp-
tion, even though it takes the place of sale.
Article 760.
A settlement of account is a binding contract, even though
it takes the place of contracts which are not binding; and it does
not lose validity except in circumstances of cancellation through
the exercise of an option or through deceit.
Article 761.
A settlement of account which arises from a dispute or is
base on reciprocal agreement is final as the tow parties are concer-
ned, and neither of them can cancel it, even if there be a claim of
fraud: except in a case of non-compliance with a condition, or when
an option of cancellation has been included as a condition,
Article 762.
If a mistake has occurred in the circumstances attendant
upon a compromise, or in connexion with a settlement of account,
the settlement of account is void.
Article 763,
A settlement of account under circumstances of reluctance
is not enforceable.
Article 764.
Trickery in a settlement of account is a justification for an
option of cancellation.
Article 765.
A settlement of account in a claim based on a void transac-http://www.rezabastani.ir
ItV
tion is void; but a settlement of account in a claim arising out of
the voidness of a transaction is good.
Article 766.
If the two parties bring to an end, in a general settlement,
the whole of their mutual claims whether existing or potentisl, in
the form of a settlement of account, all the claims are accounted as
being included in that settlement, even if the cause of claim was
unknown when the settlement was made, unless the settlement of
account did not include that claim, in accordance with evidence.
Article 767.
If, after the settlement of account, it becomes known that
the subject of the settlement of account did not exist, the settlement
of account is void.
Article 768.
In a contract of settlement of account it is possible that one
of the parties, in return for the share which he receives, should
engage himself to pay certain specified profits for a specified period
each year or each month. This engagement may involve profit for
the other party to the settlement of account ot to a third party
or parties.
Article 769.
In an engagement such as that specified in the previous
Article, whoever derives profit from the settlement, there may be
a condition that after the death of the beneficiary the profits may
go to his heirs.
Article 770.
A settlement of account which takes place in accordance
with the previous Articles ls not cancelled by the bankruptcy or the
indigence of the person who undertook the engagement, unless there
was a condition to ·~hat effect.http://www.rezabastani.ir
(I") ~ I I C:,lji I Ii~ C:,Jill
(t?)
Irania11 Civil Code
SECTION 18
ON PLEDGES
Article 771.
A pledge is a contract whereby a debtor gives a property to
the creditor as a security.
The person who gives the pledge is called the "rahin", and
the other party the "murtahin".
Article 772.
The property which is pledged must be transferred to the
possession of the creditor, or to that of a person agreed upon by the
two parties; but it is not a necessary condition for the validity of
the transaction that the property should remain in that possession.
Article 773,
No property which is incapable of being alienated or trans-
ferred legally may be the subject of a pledge.
Article 774.
A pledged thing must be a definite object, and the pledging
of a debt or a profit is void.
Article 775.
A pledge may be given for any property which is owed, even
though a contract which gives rise to the debt be subject to cancel-
lation.http://www.rezabastani.ir
II I
Article 776,
It is possible for one person to give a thing in pledge in
respect of two or more debts which he owes to two or more persons.
In that case the creditors must agree among themselves as
to who shall have possession of the thing; similarly it is possible
for two persons to pledge a thing to one person in return for a claim
which he has on them.
Article 777.
In the course of a contract of pledge, or in accorddance with
a separate contract, it is possible for the debtor to make the creditor
his "vakil" (representative) empowering him to ensure that if, at
the time appointed, the debtor does not pay his debt, the creditor
will recover from the object pledged or from its price the amount
of his claim; and it is also possible that he should arrange that the
"vakatat" (representation) mentioned above should continue after
the death of the creditor, vesting in his heirs: and finally it is
possible that a "vakalat" should be given to a third person.
Article 778,
If it is laid down as a condition that the creditor has no
right to sell the thing pledged, it (i,e. the condition) is void.
Article 779,
If the creditor has no "vakalat" for the sale of the thing
pledged, and the debtor also is not ready to sell it or to pay the debt,
the creditor refers to the judge who will compel a sale or oblige the
debtor to pay the debt in another way.
Article 780.
The creditor who holds the pledge has preference over every
other claimant in the settlement of his claim from the price of the
pledged thing.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 781.
If the thing pledged be sold at a price greater than the claim.
of the creditor, the excess belonges to the owner thereof: and if, on
the contrary, the proceeds of the sale are less, the creditor must
have recourse to the debtor for the balance.
Article 782.
In the circumstances of the last part of the foregoing article,
if the debtor has become indigent, the creditor shares with the
creditors of the bankruptcy.
Article 783.
If the debtor pays a part of the debt, he has no right to
claim the restitution of part of the thing pledged, and the creditor
may retain the whole of it until the whole of the debt is paid, unless
another arrangement has been agreed upon between the debtor
and the creditor.
Article 784.
It is permissible to change the thing pledged for something
else, with the agreement of the two parties.
Article 785.
Everything which in a contract of sale is reckoned as apper-
taining to the thing sold without any special mention thereof, enters
also into the thing pledged.
Article 786,
The earnings of the thing pledged and the profits which
may accrue to it, will fonn part of the thing pledged if they are
joined to it; if they are not joined, they belong to the debtor, unless
another arrangement has been agreed upon by the two parties.http://www.rezabastani.ir
\or
Article 787.
A contract of pledge is binding as far as the debtor is concer-
ned, but it is optional on the creditor; therefore, the creditor may,
whenever he desires, cancel the contract, but the pledger cannot
take back his pledge before he has paid his, debt or before he has,
in some legal manner, become discharged of his debt.
Article 788.
A pledge does not become cancelled by the death of the
pledger or of the creditor; but 1f the creditor dies the debtor may
request that the pledge may be given to the possession of a third
person appointed with the consent of the heirs and of him.
If the parties concerned do not come to an agreement, the
aforesaid person will be appointed by the judge.
Article 789,
The pledge is regarded as an "amanat" (article on trust)
when in the hands of the creditor; therefore, the creditor will not
be responsible for its decay or for its deterioration, unless he is at
fault.
Article 790.
When the debtor has cleared himself from his debt, the
pledge is an "amanat" in the hands of the creditor; but if, on being
asked to return it, he refuses to do so, he will become a guarantor
for it, even if he is not at fault.
Article 791.
If the thing pledged becomes destroyed in consequence of
the act of the pledger himself or of some other person, the person
who destroys it must give the equivalent of the pledge, and said
equivalent will then become the pledge.
Article 792.
The "vakalat" (representation) mentioned in Article 777http://www.rezabastani.ir
will not apply to the equivalent pledge mentioned in the foregoing
article.
Article 793,
The pledger cannot enter into possession of the pledge in
such a way as to be contrary to the rights of the creditor, except
with the latter's permission.
Article 794,
The debtor may make changes in the pledge, or perform
other proprietory rights on the pledge which are of advantage to it
and which do not impinge on the rights of the creditor, without
there being any right for the creditor to prevent such action; if the
judge may give permission.
SECTIION 19
ON GIFTS
Article 795.
A gift is a contract in virtue of which a person gives over
to another gratis the proprietory rights in a thing.
the person who gives is called "wahib"; the other party is
called "muttahab'' and the thing which is the subject of the gift
is called "ain-mohubeh".
Article 796.
The giver must have capacity to ontract and to possess his
thing.
Article 797.
The giver must be the owner of the thing which he gives.
Article 798.
A gift does not take place except with the acceptance of the
receiver and with his taking possession of it, whether the receiverhttp://www.rezabastani.ir
I•I
himself takes over the gift or whether his "vakil" (representative)
does so: and taking possession of the thing without the permission
of the giver is of no effect.
Article 799.
In a gift to a minor, or to a ward, or to a person of unsound
mind, the taking possession of the "vali" (legal representative or
guardian) is lawful.
Article 800.
If the thing given is in the hands receiver there is no need
for him to take it over.
Article 801.
A gift may be reciprocal. Hence, the giver may make a
condition that the receiver should give him a thing, or perform
gratis a lawful service.
Article 802.
If, before possession has been taken, the giver or the receiver
dies, the gift becomes void.
Article 803.
After possession has been taken, also, the giver may take
back his gift, provided it still exists, except in the following circums-
tances:-
(1) When the receiver is the father, the mother, or the children
of the giver.
(2) When the gift has been reciprocated and the reciprocated
gift has been handed over.
(3) When the thing given has passed out of the possession of
the receiver, or has become the object of the rights of
another, whether by way of compulsion, as where the
receiver has become a ward in consequence of indigence,
or by way of choice, as when the thing given has been given
as a pledge.
(4) When a change has been made in the thing given.http://www.rezabastani.ir
I o•
Article 804.
If the giver revokes his gift, the fruits of the thing given
belong to the giver if they are attached to the thing, and to the
receiver if they are separate.
Article 805,
No revocation can be made after the death of giver or the
receiver.
Article 806.
If a creditor agrees to surrender his claim upon the debtor,
he has no right of revocation.
Article 807.
If a person gives a thing to another by way of a benefaction
(or alms), he has no right of revocation.http://www.rezabastani.ir
(IA)~~ Ul,.lil JJ... C:,jllJ
(ts)
Iranian Civil Code
PART 3
ON THE EXERCISE OF THE RIGHT OF PRE-EMPTION (SHUF'EH)
Article 808.
When real property, capable of being divided, is held jointly
by two persons, and one of them transfers his share to a third person
with the object of selling it, the other joint owner has the right to
give to the purchaser the price which he has paid for it, and to take
possession of the portion sold.
This right is known as the right of pre-emption (shuf'eh),
and the person who exercises tha.t right is known as a. (shafi).
Article 809,
When a building and trees are sold without the land, there
is no right of pre-emption.
Article 810.
If the property of two persons is in a highway or a water-
way held jointly, and one of them sells his rights together with the
right of passage on the road or wa.ter, the other one has the right
of pre-emption, even though he be not a joint holder in divided
shares in the property itself;· but if one of the parties sells the
property apart from the right of passage, the other has no right
of pre-emption.
Article 811.
If the share of the two partners is a (waqf) (religious
endowment), neither the trustee nor the beneficiary of the (waqf)
has any right of pre-emption.
Article 812.
If the thing sold consists of several units, and some of them
are subject to pre-emption and the rest are not, it is possible to exe-http://www.rezabastani.ir
I I' I
cute a right of pre-emption in respect of .the part which is capable
. of pre-emption, in proportion to its share of the price.
Article 813,
There is no right of pre-emption in an illegal sale.
Article 814.
The fact that the sale is subject to an option is not an
obstacle to the exercise of the right of pre-emption.
Article 815.
A right of pre-emption must not be exercised only in respect
of one part of the thing sold; the person entitled to the above men-
tioned right must either refrain from it altogether or perform it
in respect of the whole of the thing sold.
Article 816,
The exercise of a right of pre-emption renders void any
transaction which the purchaser may have performed before tha.t
and after the contract of sale, in respect of the subject of the right
of pre-emption.
Article 817.
In respect of a partner who exercises his right of pre-emp-
tion, the purchaser is a guarantor for a.ny defect, not the seller,
But if, at the time of the exercise of the right of pre-emption
the subject of the right is not yet ha.nded over to the possession
of the purchaser, the pre-emptor will not have any right of recourse
against the purchaser.
Article 818.
The purchaser is not a guarantor respecting any defect or
fault or decay which has taken place while the thing has been in
his ha.nds before the exercise of the right of pre-emption. The same
applies after the exercise of the right of pre-emption and after the
thing has been cla.imed, provided that he has not used it excessively
or been guilty of waste.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 819,
Profits which may have accrued to the thing sold before
the exercise of the right of pre-emption belong to the purchaser
if they are separate, and to the pre-emptor if they are inseparable;
but the purchaser may uproot or destroy any building which he has
made or any tree which he has planted.
Article 820.
It is apparent that at the time of the sale the thing sold was
defective and the purchaser has therefore been granted a reduction
of price, the pre-emptor is entitled to deduct a corresponding
amount from the price at the time when he exercises his option.
The rights of the purchaser in relation to the seller with regard to
a defect in the thing sold are the same as those which apply in the
course of a contract of sale.
Article 821.
The right of pre-emption is an immediate one.
Article 822.
A right of pre-emption may be waived; and the fact that it
is waived may be inferred from anything which points towards the
fact that the above-mentioned right is renounced.
Article 823.
The right of pre-emption is transferred to the heir or heirs
of the pre-emption after his death.
Article 824.
If one or more of the heirs waive their right, the remaining
heirs cannot exercise their right only in relation to heir own por-
tion; they must either waive their right entirely, or enforce it in
relation to the whole of the thing sold.http://www.rezabastani.ir
PART 4
ON WILLS AND INHERITANCE
CHAPTER ONE
ON WILLS
SECTION ONE
ON GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS
Article 825.
Wills are divided into two categories: possessory and con-
tractual.
Article 826.
A possessory will occurs when a person bestows on another
person, without charge, the property in a thing or a benefit belong-
ing to him, to take effect from the date of his death.
Acontractual will occurs when a person appoints one or more
other persons to carry out an affair, or affairs, or to perform other
possessory acts.
The person making the will is called the 'muvassi',· the per-
son in whose favour a possessory will is made is termed the
'muvassi'; the thing which is the subject matter of.the will is called
the 'muvassa'; and the person who, in virtue of a contractual will
is appointed either as a trustee for an endowment, "literally (cf.
Art 843 below.) a trust of one-third of a property" or a trustee for
a minor, is called a 'vasi'.
Article 827,
A right of property resulting from a will does not become
definite except with the agreement of the beneficiary after the
death of the testator.
Article 828.
If the beneficiaries be not limited in number, as for instance
if the will is in favour of the poor or for a work of public benevolence,
there is no need to accept.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 829,
The acceptance of the beneficiary before the death of the
testator is of no effect, and the testator may revoke his legacy,
even if the beneficiary may have taken possession of the legacy.
Article 830.
In relation to the beneficiary, the rejection or the aceptance
of the legacy after the death of the testator is valid. Therefore,
if the beneficiary rejects the legacy before the death of the testator,
he may accept it after the death; and if after his death he accepts
it and takes possession of the legacy, he may not reject it afterwards;
but if he has accepted the legacy before the death, a second ac-
ceptance after the death is not necessary.
Article 831,
· If the beneficiary is a minor or insane, the guardian will
have to accept or reject the legacy.
Article 832.
The beneficiary may accept the legacy in relation to a por-
tion of the legacy; in that case the will, in relation to the portion
which has been accepted, is valid; in relation to the rest it is void.
Article 833.
The heirs of the testator cannot take possession of the
legacy, as long as the beneficiary has not communicated to the
heirs whether he rejects or accepts it.
If delay in this notification results in a loss to the heirs,
the judge will compel the beneficiary to take a decision.
Article 834.
In a contractual will acceptance is not a necessary condi-
tion; but the 'vast• may refuse the duty referred to him during the
lifetime of the testtor; and if he has not refused it before the
death of the testator, he will have no subsequent right of refusal,
even if he was ignorant of the trust.http://www.rezabastani.ir
I YV
SECTION TWO
ON THE TESTATOR
Article 835.
The testator must be competent to possess the thing which
is the subject of the will.
Article 836,
If a person wounds or poisons himself with the inten Hon
of commiting suicide, or if he is guilty of similar counduct which
causes death, and if after that act he makes a will, that will is
void if he dies; but if, by chance, he does not die, the will is good.
Article 837.
If a person, by a will, deprives one or more of his heirs of
their inheritance, that disposition is not valid.
Article 838.
The testator can revoke his will.
Article 839.
If the testator makes a second will in contradiction of the
first, the second will is good.
SECTION THREE
ON THE LEGACY
Article 840,
A will providing for the employment of a thing in a way
contrary to law is void.
Article 841.
The legacy must be the property of the testator; and a will
which disposes of the property of another, even though it is with
the permission of the owner, is void.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 842.
.tt is possible to dispose in a will of property which is not
yet in e:zistence.
Article 843.
The testamentary disposition of more than one-third of
the estate is not validi, except with the permission of the heirs; and
Ji •mne of the heirs agree, the disposition applies only to the share of
thosehtUS.
Artic1e 844.
If the legacy is a definite thing, that thing is to be valued.
If its price is more than one-third of the estate, the exces belongs
to the heirs, unless they allow otherwise.
Article 845.
The measurement of the third of the estate is fixed in
relation to the testator's property at his death, not arat the time .of
his making the will.
Article 846.
If the legacy consists of the profits of a property, either for
a specified time or permanently, the portion of one-third shall be
separated as follows:-
In the former case, the wholie property, with its profits, will
be valued. Then the said property will be valued, having regard to
the loss of profits during the period of the legacy; and the difference
between the two· prices will be reckoned towards the third part.
In the second case, i.e. shold the legacy be the permanent
profits of the property, and for this reason the property itself has no
value, the price of the property, having regard to the profits, will be
reckoned towards the third part.
Article 847.
If the legacy consist of things of a standardised nature,
not of particular units, the determination of the units thereof is
the duty of the heirs, unless other arrangements have been laid
down in the will.http://www.rezabastani.ir
IT•
Article 848,
If the legacy be undivided share of the estate, such as a
quarter or a third thereof, the beneficiary will become a partner
in undivided shares with the heirs in that same proportion of the
estate.
Article 849,
It the testator leaves as a legacy, in a specified manner,
more than one-third of his estate, and the heirs do not conscent to
more than one-third, the portion will be separated from the estate
in the same manner as laid down the will, up to the amount of
one-third, and the excess will be void and 1f the legacy rela.tes to
several objects without specifying how much goes to each, a deduc-
tion will be made from all those objects.http://www.rezabastani.ir
. i{°:L :,1 I ·.1.. :, 'li
(t" )~
• ... Ji .I
,.IJ'
(is)
lra11ian Civil Code
SECTION FOUR
ON THE BENEFICIARY UNDER A WILL
Article 850.
The benificiary must be alive, and must be able to be the
proprietor of the thing which is left to him in the will.
Article 851 ,
A legacy in favour of an unborn child is valid, but proprie-
tary rights only pass if the child is born alive.
Article 852.
If an untimely birth is procured as the result of a crime,
the legacy goes to his heirs, unless the crime prevents their
inheriting.
Article 853.
If the beneficiaries are more than one in number, but are
limited in number, the legacy is divided equally among them,
unless the testator arranged differently in the will.
SECTION FIVE
ON THE 'VASI' (THE PERSON AFFECTED BY A CONTRACTUAL
WILL, OR EXECUTOR)
Article 854.
The testator can appoint one or more persons as 'vasl' if
they are more than one, the persons appointed must carry out the
duty together, unless each one of them has been declared inde-
pendent.
·http://www.rezabastani.ir
1oT
Article 855.
The testator may appoint several persons in succession to
be 'vasi', in this way, that if the first dies, the second becomes the
'vasi', and if the second dies, the third, ect.
Article 856.
It is possible to appoint a minor as a 'vasi', together with a
person of full age. In that case, the person of full age will execute
the duty until the minor arrives at full age.
Article 857.
The testator may appoint one person to superintend the
operations of the •vasi'. The limits of the authority of the superin-
tendent will be as stipulated by the testator, or else will be deter-
mined by analogy.
Article 858.
The 'vasi' is in the position of a trustee (amin) for the pro-
perty which is in his possession in accordance with the will, but
he is not a guarantor, except in case there is excessive use or waste.
Article 859.
The 'vasi' must act in accordance with the will of the tes-
tator, or else he will be dismissed.
Article 860.
No one except the father or the father's father may appoint
a 'vasi' for a minor.http://www.rezabastani.ir
\ I \
CHAPTER TWO
ON INHERITANCE
SECTION ONE
ON THE CAUSES OF INHERITANCE AND THE VARIOUS
DEGREES OF HEIRSHIP
Article 861.
Two things give rise to inheritance; relationship and con-
nexion by marriage.
Article 862.
Persons who take inheritance by relationship are of three
categories:-
(l) Father, mother, childern, and children's childem.
(2) Grandparents, brothers, sisters, and their childern.
(3) Paternal uncles and paternal aunts, maternal uncles
and manternal aunts, and their children.
Article 863.
Heirs of the lower categories taken an inheritance when no
person of a higher category exists.
Article 864.
The survivor of two married persons is one of the persons
who taken an inherirance by way of connexion by marriage.
Article 865.
If several causes of inheritance are united in the same
person, he takes inheritance from all the causes, unless some those
causes exclude others, in which case he takes inheritance only from
those causes which exclude others.http://www.rezabastani.ir
\ 0 '
Article 866.
If there is no heir, the judge will make dispositions con-
cerning the estate.
SECTION TWO
ON THE TRUE COMMENCEMENT OF THE INHERITANCE
Article 867,
The inheritance becomes definite on the real or the supposed
death of the testator.
Article 868.
The rights of possession of the heirs, in relation to the estate
the deceased, do not become established except after the payment of
thedoes and the debts attaching to the estate of the deceased.
Article 869.
The dues and debts which attach to the estate of the decea-
sed and must be paid before it is divided up are as follows: -
(1) The price of the winding-sheet of corpse, and the dues
which attach to the property of the estate, such as a
thing which is subject to pledge.
(2) The debts and the proprietary charges which were in
cumbent on the deceased.
(3) The legacies of the deceased, if without the permission
of the heirs up to one third of the estate;
If with their permission, more than one third.
Article 870.
The dues mentioned in the foregoing article must be paid
in the order down in that article: and the remainder, if any, must
be divided up among the heirs.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 871.
If the heirs perform transactions relating to the capital
(a'yan) of the deceased, those transactions are of on effect as long
as the debts of the deceased are not paid; and the creditors can
cancel them.
Article 872.
The goods of a person who is lost and of whom no trace can
be found will not be distributed except proof of his death, or after
the expiration of the period which such a person might normally
be expected to live.
Article 873.
If the date of the death of persons who take inheritance
from one another is not known, and the priority of one over the
other is not ascertained, those persons will not takes place as the
result of drowing or an accidental burial, in which case they will
take inheritance from one another.
Article 874.
If persons who are entitled to inherit one from another die,
and the date of the death of one of them is known, and it is not
known whether the death of the other was before or after that
date, the person whose date of death is unknown will take an
inheritance from the other, and ont vice verse.
SECTION THREE
ON THE CONDITIONS AND ALL THE IMPEDIMENTS TO
INHERITANCE.
Article 875.
It is a condition of inheritance that the heir should be
alive at the moment of the death of the person from whom the in-
heritance issues; and if it is a question of an unborn child, it takes
an inheritance only if it was conceived at· the moment of death and
if it was born alive, even if it dies immediatley after birth.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 876.
·If there be a doubt whether the infant was alive at the
moment of birth, no inheritance passes.
Article 877.
If there be a dispute as to the moment of conception, the
provisions of the law relating to the indications furnishing a pre-
sumption of paternity will be applied.
Article 878.
When at the time of death, there is an infant conceived
which, if born and capable of inheriting, will prevent the succession
of all or a part of the other heirs, the inheritance will not be divided
up till such time as the state of the infant be determined; and if
the infant conceived will not stand in the way of the inheritance
of any of the others heirs, and the latter desire the estate to be div-
ided up, a portion must be set aside for the conceived infant equal
to the portion of two sons of two sons of that degree of relationship;
and the portion of each of the heirs is provisional until the state of
of the infant conceived is determined.
Article 879.
If there be a lost or untraceable person among the heirs,
his portion will be set aside untill his state is determined.
If it be established that he died before the source of the in
heritance, his portion returns to the other heirs; otherwise, it goes
him or to his heirs.
Article 880.
Murder is an obstacle to succession; hence, a person whe
intentionally kills the deceased is prevented from taking any in-
heritance from him, whether he were the perpetrator, or whether
he wre the instigator, or whether he were acting singly as the accom-
plice of others.http://www.rezabastani.ir
ItV
Article 881 .
If the killing of the deceased was unintrntional, or by pro-
cess of law, or in self-defence, the provisions of the previous article
de not apply.
Article 882.
After a solemn malediction (li'an) husband and wife will
not take inheritance From one another; similarly a child who, owing
to a denial of paternity, has been the cause of a solemn malediction,
does not take inheritance from the father nor the father from him;
but said child takes inheritance from the mother and his maternal
relations, and vice versa.
Article 883.
If a father, after pronouncing a solemn malediction,
withdraws it, the son takes inheritance from him; but he takes no
inheritance from the paternal relations, relations, nor does the
father nor the paternal relations take inheritance from the son.
Article 884.
An illegitimae cihld does not take inheritance from the
father, the mother, or their relations; but if the illegitimacy of the
relationship of which the child is the result is established in rela-
tion to one of the parties, while it is not established for the other
party by reason of violence or error, the child takes inheritance
only from the latter side, and vice versa.
Article 885.
The children and relations of the persons who are deprived
of inheritance in accordance with Article 880 are not deprived of
inheritance; hence, the offspring of a person who has killed his
own father takes inheritance from his murdered grandfather, if
nearar relatives de not come between.http://www.rezabastani.ir
(' • ) ~ ~ i:Jl.)11' J.>... i:J.,tl li
(20l
lranian Civil Code
SECTION FOUR
NO EXCLUSION FROM INHERITANCE (HUJB)
Article 886.
Exclusion from Inheritance (hujb) is the name given to
the state of an heir who is completely or partially excluded from
taking an inheritance owing to the existence of another heir.
Article 887.
Exclusion from inheritance consists of two parts:-
Fh'st, when the heir is deprived of the inheritance totally,
e.g. a brother's son is deprived of the inheritance owing to the ex-
istence of a brother or a sister of the deceased: or, a half-bro.ther of
the father's side is deprived of an inheritance owing to the existence
of brothers of the full blood.
Second, when the portion of an heir is lessened; as for in-
stance when the share of a husband is lessened from a half to a
quarter when ever there are children from his wife; and similarly
when the share of the woman is reduced from a quarter to an eighth
whenever there are children from her husband.
Article 888.
The determining factor in total exclusion from inheritacne
is the nearness of relationship to the deceased; hence, each degree
of heirs deprive the next degree of taking any inheritance,
except in the case mentioned in Aricle 936 and in case where the
more remote heir is able to take inheritance by way of representa-
tion of another, in which case both take an inheritance.http://www.rezabastani.ir
I, o
Article 889.
As between the heirs of the first degree, if there be no
children of the deceased, the children's children, to whatever extent
they go down, are the representatives of their father or their
mother, and take an inheritance with remaining parent but, as
between the children, the nearest to the deceas~d deprives the
farther ones from inheritance.
Article 890,
As between the heirs of the second degree, if ther care no
brothers or sisters of the deceased, the children of his brothers or
sisters, however far down they go, are the representatives of their
father or mother, and take an inheritance with whichever of the
ancestors of the deceased has survived; but, as between the ances-
tors or the brother's or sister's cihldren, the nearer to the deceased
deprives the remoter from an inheritance.
The provisions of this Article will also be applied in the case
of the heirs of the heirs of the third degree.
Article 891,
The following heirs are not subject to exclusion from an
inheritance:-
Father, mother son, daughter, husband, and wife.
Article 892.
Partial exclusion from inheritance of a share occurs in the
following cases:-
(1). Whenever the deceased has children or grandchildren.
In that case the parents of the deceased may not take more than
one-third of the estate, except in accordance with Article 908 and
909, in which case it is possible for either of the parents to take, by
way of relationship or remainder, more than one-sixth; and simi-
. larly the husband is restrained from taking more than one- quarter,
and the wife from taking more than one-eighth. ·http://www.rezabastani.ir
(2). Whenever the deceased had brothers or sisters. In
that case the mother of the deceased is restrained from taking more
than one-sixth, provided that:
(a). There be at least two brothers, or one brother with two
sisters, or four sisters.
(b). Their father be still alive.
(c). She be under no incapacity for inheriting, except for reasons
of murder: and
(d). The brothers and sisters of the deceased be of the full-blood
or on the father's side, not mother's.
SECTION 5
ON 'SHARES' OF INHERITANCE AND THOSE
ENTITLED TO THE SAME
Article 893.
The heirs take their inheritance sometimes by 'shares' and
sometimes by 'relationship', and somtimes by both 'shares' and by
'relationship'.
Article 894.
Persons who take 'shares' are those whose portions of the
estate are fixed; and persons who take by 'relationship' are those
Whose Protions are not fixed.
Article 895.
The fixed portions which are termed 'shares' are defined as
a half, a quarter, an eighth, two-third, and onesixth of the estate.
Article 896.
The persons who take inheritance by 'share' consist of the
mother, the husband, and the wife.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 897.
The persons who take partly by 'share' and partly by 'rela-
tionship' consist of the father, tthe dughter or the dughter or the
daughters, and the sister or sisters on the father's sid or of the full
blood, and cousins (Kalaleh) on the mother's side.
Article 898,
All other heirs, other than those mentioned in the two
preceding articles, take their inheritance only by 'relationship'.
Article 899.
Three categories of heirs are entitled to a 'share' of one half
of the estate:-
(1). The husband, on condition that there be no children from
the deceased wife, whether from that husband of from
another husband:
(2). A daughter, if she be the sole off spring.
(3). A sister of full blood or half blood on the father's side, pro-
vided that she be the only one.
Article 900,
Two categories of heirs are entitled to take one-quater of
the estate as their 'share':-
(1).
(2) .
The husband, if the woman dies having children.
The wife or wives, provided that the husband has died
without offspring.
Article 901.
A 'share' of one-eighth belongs to the wife or wives, provided
the husband has died having children.
Article 902.
A two-thirds 'share' of the estate blongs to two categories
of heirs:-http://www.rezabastani.ir
I 'I y
(1). Two daughters or more, provided there are no male offspring.
(2). Two or more sisters of the full or the half blood on the
father's side, if there are no brothers.
Article 903.
Two categories of heirs take a one-third 'share':-
(1). The mother of the deceased, provided that the deceased has
no offspring or brothers or sisters.
(2). The mother's relations (Kalaleh), provided that they are
more than one in number.
Article 904.
Three categories of heirs take a one-sixth 'share':-
the father, the mother, and the mother's relation (Kalaleh)
if only one.
Article 905.
Each of the persons entitled to a 'share' takes his portion
from the estate of the deceased; and then rest rems.ins for those
entitled by 'relationship'; and if the person entitled to take
by 'relationship' be not equal in that category to the rank of the
person who takes by a 'share', the rest is returned to the person
entitled by a 'share', except in the case of a husband or a wife, to
whom it will not be returned; nevertheless, if there be no heir to
the deceased except the husband, the balance of the estate remain-
ing after abstraction of the 'share' is returned to him.
SECTION 6
ON THE PORTIONS OF INHERITANCE OF THE VARIOUS DEGREES
OF HEIRS SUB-SECTION I
ON THE PORTIONS OF INHERITANCE OF THE FIRST DEGREE
Article 906.
If the deceased has left no living children, and no living
children's children of whatever degree, either of the parents, ifhttp://www.rezabastani.ir
I '\ I
alone, takes the whole estate; and if the father and mother of the
deceased are both alive, the mother takes one-third and the father
two-thirds. But if the mother comes after someone else, one-sixth
of the estate belongs to the mother and the rest to the father.
Article 907.
If the deceased leaves no parents, but has one or more
children, the estate will be divided as follows:-
If the offspring consists of only one, whether son or
daughter, the whole of the estate belongs to that child.
If there are several children, ( but all are sons or all daugh-
ters, the estate will be divided equally among them.
If there are several children, some being sons and some
daughters, each son takes twice as much as each daughter.
Article 908,
If the father or the mother of the deceased, or both parents,
are alive, together with one daughter, the 'share' of each one of
the father and the mother will be one-sixth of the estate; and the
'share' of the daughter will be one halfthereof.
The remainder must be divided among all the rest of the
heirs in proportion to the 'share' of each; unless the mother comes
after someone else, in which case the mother takes no portion of the
remainder.
Article 909,
If the father or the mother, or both the parents of the
decased are alive, together with several daughters, the 'share' of
the whole of the daughters will be two-thirds of the estate, which is
to be divided equally among them,; and the 'share' of each one of
the father and the mother will be one-sixth. And if there be a
remainder it will be divided among all the heirs in proporation to
their 'shares' unless the mother comes after someone else, in which
case she will not take any portion of the remainder.
.-~ ..
--.-http://www.rezabastani.ir
I 'I •
Article 910.
If the deceased has sons or daughters, even if only one
person, his grandchildren do not inherit.
Article 911.
If the deceased leaves no sons or daughters, his grandchil-
dren are the legal representatives of his sons or daughters, and in
this way are rechoned as belonging to the first degree of descen-
dants, and take inheritance with each one of the parents who are
alive.
The division of the inheritance among the grandchildren
will take place in accordance with their sex; that is to say, each
individual will take the portion of the person through whiom he
claims descent from the deceased; hence, the children of a son take
twice as much as the children of a daughter.
In the division among individuals of each sex, a boy takes
twice as much as a girl.
Article 912.
Children's children, to whatever generation they extend,
take inheritance in the way recorded in the previous article, subject
to this, and those nearer to the deceased exclude those more remote
from him.
Article 913,
In all the conditions mentioned in this subsection, whichever
of the married pair is the survior takes his or her 'share' and this
'share' means one half of the estate for the surving husband and
one quarter for the surviving wife, provided that the deceased left
no children or grandchildren; and it means one quarter of the
estate for the husband and one eight for the wife if the deceaed
left children or children's children. And the remainder of the
estate is to be divided among the other heirs in accordance with
the preceding Articles.http://www.rezabastani.ir
I•\
Article 914.
If, owing to the existance of several persons entitled to
'shares', the estate of the deceased be not sufficient to satisfy all of
them, the deficiency falls on the daughter or tetwho daughter;
and if, after deduction of the portion of those entitled to 'shares'
there still remains something, and there be no heirs entitled
to take the remainder by way of relationship, this remainder will
be divided among the persons entitled to 'share' in accordli.ce with
the provisions of the preceding Articles; but the husband and the
wife in all cases, and the mother if she comes after someone else,
will take no part of the remainder.
Article 915,
The ring which the deceased used to wear, and also the
'qur'an' and the personal clothes and the sword of the deceased go
to the eldest son, without being reckoned as part of his portion,
unless the estate of the deceased consists of nothing else.http://www.rezabastani.ir
(lt)
Iranian Civil Code
Subsection 2
ON THE PORTIONS OF INHERITANCE OF THE SECOND DEGREE
Article 916.
If the deceased leaves no heirs of the first degree, his estate
goes to the heirs of the second degree.
Article 917.
Each one of the heirs of the second degree if the only one
takes the whole of the estate; and if there are more than one, the
estate will be divided among them in accordance with the following
Articles:-
Article 918.
If the deceased leaves full brothers or sisters, halfbrothers
or sisters do not inherit.
If there is no full brothers or sisters, helf-brothers and half-
sisters on the father's side take their portion of the inheritance.
Neither full brothers and sisters nor half-brothers and
half-sisters deprive the mother's brothers and sisters from the in-
heritance.
Article 919.
If the heirs of the deceased consist of several full brothers,
or of several half-brothers on the father's side, or several full siSters,
,ir ('If i::evrral half-sisters on the father's side, the e.sia.te will be
·0ng them equally.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 920.
If the heirs of the deceased consist of several full brothers
and sistres, or of several half-brothers and half-sisters on the
father's side, the share of a male will be twic that of a female.
Article 921.
If the heirs consist of several brothers on the mother's side,
or of several sisters of the mother's side, or of several brothers and
sisters on the mother's side, the estate will be divided among them
equally.
Article 922.
If there be full brothers and sisters, and also brothers and
sisters from the monther's side, the division will be performed 1n
the following way:-
If the brother or the sister on the mother's side be one
peron only, he or she takes one-sixth of the estate, and the rest
belongs to the brothers and sisters of the full or half blood on the
father's side, who will divide up the rest 1n the manner laid down
above.
If there are several brothers and sisters on the mother's
side (Kaldleh), one third of the estate belongs to them and ill divided
among them equally, and the rest belongs to the brothers and
sisters of the full or the half blood on the father's side and is divided
among them 1n accordance with the dispositions laid down above.
Article 923.
If the heirs consist of grandfathers or grandmothers the
estate will be divided among them 1n the following manner:-
If there be a sole grandfather or grandmother, whether
paternal or maternal, he or she takes the whole of the estate,
If there be more than one granfa.ther and grandmother,
and if both be paternal, males take twice as much as females, and
if they be both on the maternal side, the estate is divided among
them equally.
If there be both grandfather or grandmother on the father's
side and grand father or grandmother on the mother's slde, onehttp://www.rezabastani.ir
third of the estate goes to the granthfather or grandmother on the
mother's side, that third part will be divided equally among them
all; and the remaining two-thirds will go to the grandfather or
grandmother on the mother's side; and if there be more than one
such ancestor, the portion of a male in that two-thirds part will
be twice the portion of a female.
Article 924.
If the deceased leaves ancestors and brothers and sisters
(Kalaleh), two-third of the estate goes to the heirs which have
relationship on the side of the father; and in dividing up this portion
the males take twice the portion of the females: and one-third goes
to the heirs which have relationship on the mother's side, and is
divided among them equally; nevertheless, if the relations on the
mother's side consist of only one brother or one sister on the
mother's side, he or she will only be entitled to one-sixth of the
estate.
Article 925.
In all the cases dealt with in the foregoing articles, if the
deceased leave neither brothers nephews and nieces are their legal
representatives, and take inheritance with the ancestors; in that
case, the division of the inheritance in regard to the nephews and
nieces will take place by way of their sex, that is to say, each sex
takes the portion of that person through whom he or she claims
relationship with the deceased, hence, the children of full or half
brothers and sisters will take the portion of the full or half brothers
and sisters on the father's side, only, and the children of brothers
and sisters on the mother's side take the inheritance of the brothers
and sisters on the mother's side,
In dividing the inheritance among the individuals of one
sex, if the children of the full or the half blood on the father's
side be alone, the males take twice the portion of the females; and
if they descend from brothers and sisters on the mother's side, the
portion will be shared equally.
Article 926.
If there be in existence both brothers and sisters of the full
· Mnnd. and those of the half blood on the father's side, and thesehttp://www.rezabastani.ir
\ '\ \
of the half blood on the mother's side, the brothers and sisters of
the half blood on the father's side, the brothers and sisters of the
half blood on the father's side will be excluded from the inheritance.
Article 927.
In all the cases mentioned in this subsection, which ever
one of the married pair remens takes his or her 'share' from the
original estate; and this 'share' signifies the half of the original
estate for the husband, and a quarter thereof for the wife.
The 'shares' of the relations of the mother, whether ances-
tors or descendants (Kalaleh), are taken from the original estate.
If, owing to the Intervention of the husband or the wife,
there be a deficiency in the available inheritance, this deficiency
will be borne by the brothers and sisters of the full blood or of the
half blood on the father's side or by the paternal ancestors.
SUBSECTION THREE
ON THE PORTIONS OF INHERITANCE OF THE HEIRS
OF THE THIRD DEGREE
Article 928.
If there be no heir of the second degree left by the deceased,
his estate goes to the heirs of the third degree.
Article 929.
Each one of the heirs of the third degree, if he is the person
ofthe description, takes the whole of the inheritanc; and if there be
more than one such person, the estate will be divided among them
in accordance with the following articles.
Article 930.
If the deceased leaves uncles or aunts related through both
father and mother the uncles and aunts related through only one
parent de not inherit.
If there be no uncles or aunts relates through both fatherhttp://www.rezabastani.ir
I' •
and mother, the uncles and annts related through the father take
their portion.
Article 931.
If the heirs of the deceased consist of several paternal uncles
or of several paternal aunt.s, the estate will be divided among them
equally, provided that they are all related through father and
mother, or all through the father, or all through the mother.
If there be paternal uncles and paternal aunts, all of them
being from one mother, they will divide the estate equally; but if
all of them are from the same father and mother, or from the same
father only, the portion of the males will be twice that of the
females.
Article 932.
If there be paternal uncles of the same mother, and also
paternal uncles of the same mother and father and of the same
father only, the paternal uncle or aunt of the same mother, lf alone,
takes one-sixth of the inheritance; if theybe several, they take
one-third of the estate and divide this third equally among themsel-
ves; and the rest of the estate goes to the uncles of the same father
and mother, or of the same father, and in the sharing males take
twice the portion of the females.
Article 933.
If the heirs of the deceased consist of several maternal
uncles or of several maternal aunts, or of several maternal uncles
and maternal aunt.s together the estate is divided among them
equally, whether all are of the same father and mother, or all of
the same father, or all of the same mother,
Article 934.
If the heirs of the deceased consist of a maternal uncle and
aunt from the same father, or from the same father and mother,
together with a maternal uncle and aunt from the same mother,
if the relation of the same mother be one only he or she takes one-
:,; :-:th of the estate; if there be more than one, they take one-third
of it ancl ui •• :, it equally among themseleves, and the remainderhttp://www.rezabastani.ir
\ 0 ..
belongs to the maternal uncles and aunts of the same father a.nd
mother, or of the same father, who also divide it among themselves
in equal shares.
Article 935,
If the deceased leaves one or more paternal uncles or aunts
together with one or more maternal uncles or aunts, one-third of
the estate goes to the maternal uncles a.nd aunts, a.nd two-thirs
to the paternal uncles a.nd aunts.
The division of the third among the maternal uncles a.nd
auntswill be in equal portions, but if, among the maternal uncles
and aunts, there be one related only through the mother, one-sixth
of the portion of the maternal uncles and aunts goes to the person;
if there be several related only through the mother, one-third of
that portion will be given to them, and in that case there will be
an equal division among them.
In the division of the two-thirds part among the paternal
uncles and aunts, the portion of the males willbe twice that of the
females; but if there be one person of the paternal uncles and aunts
who is related throungh the mother only, one-sixth of the portion
of the paternal uncles a.nd aunts goes to him; and if there be more
than one such person related through the mother only, one-third of
that portion will go to them; in that case they will divide that third
portion equally.
In the division of the five-sixths or the two-thirds which
remains after deducting the portion of the paternal uncles and
aunts, it will be divided among the paternal uncles and aunts
related by father and mother or those related by the father only,
in such a way that the portion of each male is twic that of each
female.
Article 936,
If there be living paternal uncles or aunts or maternal
uncles or aunts, their childern do not inherit, except when the heirs
are confined to one nephew from a paternal uncled by father and
mother, together with one paternal uncle related only on the side
of the father; in that case only, the nephew deprives the uncle of an
irlheritance: but, if, in addition to the nephew from a paternal
uncle related by father and mother, there be a maternal uncle orhttp://www.rezabastani.ir
I oA
aunts or several paternal uncles or aunts even if related through
the father alone the nephew will take no inheritance.
Article 937,
If the deceased has left neither paternal uncles or aunts
nor maternal uncles or aunts, their children take inheritance 1n
their stead; and the portion of each stock will be the portion of that
person through whom the stock claims descent from the deceased.
Article 938,
In all the cases recorded in this subsection, the surviving
spouse take his or her 'share' from the original estate, and this
'share' means one half of the original estate for the deceased's
husband and one-Quarter for the deceased's Wife.
A perso nrelated throu gh the mother takes his portion from
the original estate, and the remainder belongs to the persons related
through the father; and if there be a deficiency, it will be borne by
the persons related through the father.
Article 939,
In all the cases mentioned in this su'bsection and the two
previous subsections, if the heir be a hermaphrodite and be one of
a group of heirs which are such that the males take twice the por-
tion of the females, his portion will be determined as follows:-
If the indications of masculinity are the greater, he takes
the portion of one boy of his degree; if the indications of femininity
are the greater, the hermaphrodite takes the portion of one girl of
that degree; and if neither the masculine nor the feminine indica-
tions be preponderant, the hermaphrodite will take one half of
the sum of the portions of one boy and one girl ofhis degree.http://www.rezabastani.ir
•
IJ" ~' Ci ~ .:, tj.1 j .v, .:,
Ji li
(22)lRANIAN CIVIL CODE
SUB • SECTION 4
ON THE INHERITANCE OF HUSBAND AND WIFE
Article 940, A married pair, married permanently, and not restrained
from inheriting, take inheritance one from the other.
Article 941. The portions of inheritance of a husband and a wife
follow the provisions of Articles 913, 927 and 938,
Article 942. If there be more than one wife, the fourth or eighth
part, wich belongs to the wife, will be divided equally
among them.
Article 913, If the husband has divorced his wife in such a way that
the divorce is revocable, either one of them who dies
before the expiry of the " Uddah ,, period will inherit
from the other; but if the death of one of them takes
place after the expiry of the " Uddah ,, period, or if
the divorce was irrevocable, they will not inherit from
one anotber.
Article 944, If the husband divorces his wife when he is ill, and
dies of that same disease within a year from the div-
orce' the wife takes inheritance from him, even if the
divorce were irrevocaple; provided that the wife has
not taken another husband.
Article 945. If a man marries a woman when he is ill, and dies
of that disease before consummation of the marriage,
the wife does not toke inhr.ritanr.e from him; but if ho
-WO-http://www.rezabastani.ir
dies after consummation, or after recovery from that
disease, the wife takes inheritance from him.
Article 946, The husband takes inheritance from the whole of the
effects of the wife; but the wife takes only from the
following effects :
(n)
From the movable property, of whatever kind.
(b) From buildings and trees.
Article 947, The wife takes inheritance from the price of the buil -
dings and trees, and not from those things themselves;
and the method of valuation is this, that the buildings
and trees are valued on the supposition of their being
worthy to remain in the ground, but without allowance
for earnings.
Article 948, If, the circumstances of the previous article, the heirs
refuse to pay the price of the buildings and the trees,
the woman may realise her right on those things from
the things themselves.
Article 949, If there be no other heir apart from the husband or
wife, the huRband takes the whole of the estate of his
late wife; but the wi:e takes only her portion, and the
rest of the estate of the husband is considered as the
estate of a man without irny heir, and will be dealt
with in accordance with article 866,
Article 950, " Replaneable things " ( Misli ) mentioned in this law
mean things which are such that similar things are well
known and exist in great quantities such as seeds; and
pricec1ble things ( quimi ) are the counterpart of (misli)
things. Nevertheless, the determination of this theory
depends upon custom.
Article 951. Excessive use ( ta'addi ) consists of conduct surpassing
the limits of permission or ordinary usage, in relation
to a thing or a right belonging to another.
Article 952. Waste ( tafrit) consists of not doing something which,
in virtue of an agreement or by ordinary usagn, is
necessary for the pI"otection of another's property.
-259-http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 953. Fault includes excessive use and waste.
Article 95t All optional contracts ( jaiz ) are canelled by the death
of one of the parties; similarly they are cancelled by
imbecility, in matters where adolescence is a necessary
condition.
Article 955, The provisions of this law are validly applicable to all
circumstance which took place before this law.
VOLUME 2. DEALING WITH INDIVIDUALS
BOOK 1. GENERAL TERMS
( KULLIAT )
Article 956. The capacity to possess right with the birth of a human
being and ends with his
d1.rnth.
Article 957. A child in the womb will enjoy civil rights provided
that it comes in to the world alive.
Article 958. Every human being is entitled to civil rights but nobody
can utilise and employ these rh:hts unless he possess
legal capacity for so doing.
Article 959. Nobody can alienate himself entirely from the enjoyment
or use of the whole or part of his civil rights.
Article 960, Nobody can dispossess himself of bis liberty or forego
the enjoyment of his liberty so long as it is within the
limits of rlecency and his action is not contrary to the
law.
Article 961. Foreign nationals are also entitled to the enjoyment ot
civil rights with tho following exceptions:
In respect of rights which are recognised by law as
being explicitly and exclusively for Iranian subiects or
explicitly denied to foreign nationals.
2.
In respect of rights concerning personal status which
are not accepted by the law of the Government of the
foreign nutional.
3,
In respect of special rights created solely from the point
of view of the porsion people.
Article 962 Determination of tho capacity of any person to contract
is to be in accordance with law of his own country;
1.
-:?58-I
http://www.rezabastani.ir
nevertheless, in the case of a foreign national who
carried out a civil contract in Iran for which, according
to the law of his own country, he did not possess cap-
acity or possess only 11 partial capacity, and if, apart
from his foreign nationality, he can be recognised acco-
rding to Iranian law as possessing the capacity to make
that contract, he will in fact be recognised as having
capahity in respect of that contract.
The foregoing recognition will not include civil contracts
concerning family rights, rights of inheritance or the
transfer of real estate situated outside Iran,
Article 963. If husband and wife are not nationals of the same
country, their personal and financial relations with one
another will be subject to the laws of the country of
the husband.
Article 964. Relations between parents and their children are Stl.bject
to the Jaw of the country of the father unless the only
certain parentage of the child is that of its mother, in
which case the relations betwoen the two follow the
laws of the country of the mother.
Article 965, Legal guardianship and the appointmPnt of a guardian
for minor children will be in accordance with the laws
of the country of the ward (the person on whose behalf
the guardianship or the executorship or the must be
exercised - translator).
-:?57-http://www.rezabastani.ir
~~~ Jf;tf j.JA JJili
(23)
IRANIAN CIVIL CODE
SUB • SECTION 4
ON THE INHERITANCE OF HUSBAND AND WIFE ( 2)
Article 966.Possession, ownership and other rights exercised over
movable or immovable property follow the laws of the
country where the things exist or are situated ;
nevertheless, the transfer of moveable property from
one country to another cannot affect or limit the rights
which persons may have acquired over those things in
accordance with the laws of the country in which the
things were first situated.
Article 967.The movable or immovable property of deceased for-
eign nationals in Persia will be dealt with under the
laws of the country of the deceased person only in the
case of essential laws such as the laws concerning
the nomination of the heirs, the determination of the
extent of their respective shares in the inheritance and
of the proportion of the assets which the deceased
person could have disposed of by virtue of a will.
Liabilities arising out of transactions (Aqd) are subject
to the laws of the place of the performance of the
transaction (Aqd) except in cases where the parties
to the transaction are both foreing nationals and
have explicitly or by implication declared the transaction
to be subject to the laws of another country.
Article 968.
• 2515 •Article 969.The method http://www.rezabastani.ir
of drawing up a document follows the
laws of the place where that document is drawn up.
Article 970.Foreign diplomatic or consular officers in Iran can
carry out marriage formalihes only in cases where the
parties to the marriage are both nationals of their
country and also where the laws of that country allow
them to do so. The marriage must in any case be
registered at the Civil Status Office.
Article 971.Claims and Law-suits follow, in matters of competency
of the courts and of Jaws of procedure, the laws of
the place where they are preferred. The fact that the
same case or claim is already being decided by a
foreign court cannot nullify the competency of the
Iranian court.
Article 972.Effect cannot be given in Iran to Judgements issued
by foreign courts and official documents recognised
as being enforceable by law in a foreign country
unless an order to do so is issued in accordance with
Iranian Laws.
If, in accordance withe Article 7 of Volume I of this
law or the foregoing Articles, the law of the foreign
country which is to be enforced has transferred the
enforcement to another law, the court (meaning the
Iramnan court-translator) is not bound to observe. this
transfer of jurisdicttion unless the transfer was orig-
inally made in favour of Iranian Jurisdiction.
The stipulation of Article 7 and of Article 962 to 964
of this law will only be inforced insofar as the enf -
orcement is not incompatible withe the international
treaties signed by the Iranian Government or withe
the provisions of special laws.
Article 973.
Article 974.
Article 975.
The court cannot enforce foreign laws or private agr-
eements which my be considered by virtue of injur_
ing the feelings of society or for other reasons, as
contrary to public order, notwitstanding the fact that
- 264 -http://www.rezabastani.ir
the enforcement of such laws
principle.
is permissible in
BOOK 2 CONCERNING NATIONALITY
Article 976.
I.
2
3.
4,
5.
6.
7.
The following persons are considered to be Iranian
subjects:
All persons residing in Iran except those whose for-
eign nationality is established: the foreign nationality
of such persons is considered to be established if
their documents of nationality have not been objected
to by the Iranian government.
Those born in Iran or outside whose fathers are
Iranian.
Those born in Iran of Unknown parentage.
Persons born in Iran of foreign parents, one of whom
was also born in Iran.
Persons born in Iran of a father of foreign nationality
who have resided at least one more year in Iran
immediately after reaching the full age of 18; in other
casses their naturalisation as Iranian subjects will be
subject to the stipulations for Iranian naturalisation
laid down by the law,
Every woman of foreign nationality who marries an
Iranian husband.
Every foreign national who has obtained Iranian
nationality.
Note:-Children born of foreign diplomatic and consular
reprsentatives are not affected by items 4 and 5 this
Article,
Article 977Persons mentioned in items 4 and 5 of the foregoing
Article have the right, till one year after reaching the
full age of 18, to accept the nationality of their fat-
hers provided that, during the period above mentio -
ned, they submit a written declaration to the Ministry
of Foreign Affairs to which they should annex a cer-
. 263-http://www.rezabastani.ir
tificate issued by the government of their fathers to
the effect that they would be recognised eventually
as nationals of that government.
Article 978.Reciprocal treatment will be observed in the case of
children born in Iran of nationals of countries \Vhere
children born of Iranian subjects are considered as
nationals of that country and the return of such chi-
ldren to Iranian nationality is made dependent on
permission.
Article 979.Persons can obtain Iranian nationality if they:
1.
2.
3,
4.
Have reached the full age of 18;
Have resided five years, whether continuously or int-
ermittently, in Iran;
Are not deserters from military service;
Have not been convicted in any country of non pol-
itical misdemeanours or crimes of importance.
In the case of category 2 of this Article, the period
of restdence in foreign countries in the service of the
Iranian government will be considered as residence in
Iran.
Article 980.Those opting for Iranian natonality who have rendered
services or notable assistance to public interest in
Iran, or who have Iranian wives by whom children,
or who have attained high intellectual distinction or
who have specialised in affairs of public interest, can
be accepted as Iranian nationals without the observ_
ance of the requirement of residence, subiect to the
sanction of the Council Ministers and provided that
government considers their naturalisation to Iranian
nationality to be advisable.
Article 981.If within a period of five years from the date of is-
sue of the document of nationality, it is found out
that the person naturalised as an Iranian national has
been a deserter from military service and also if,
before the expiry of the period fixed by Iranian laws
• 262 -http://www.rezabastani.ir
for the prescripiton of prosecution in the case of off-
ences or of imposition of consequent punishments, it is
found that the person accepted as an Iranian natio-
nal was previously convicted of important offences or
public crimes, the Council of Ministers will issue a
decision debarring that person from Iranian nationality
Note,
Foreign nationals accepted as Iranian nationals who
reside in forei~n countries and who commit the foll-
owing offences will be excluded by decision of the
Council of Ministers from Iranian nationality besides
being subjected to the punishments laid down by
laws:
(a). Those who commit acts against the internal and ext-
ernal security of Iran or who oppose or work agai-
nst the national constitutional regime and the liberty
of the country;
(b). Those who do not fulfil the obligattons of conscrip-
tion according to Iranian Law.
Article 982.
1.
2.
3.
Article 983.
1.
Those who have obtained or who obtain Iranian nat-
ionality will enjoy all rights recognised for Iranians
withe the exception of the right to attain to the pos-
ition of cabinet rank or of acting Minister or any
kind of diplomatic position abroad.
They cannot, however, attain the following position
until ten years after the document of nationality:-
Membership of Legislative Assemblies;
Membership of provincial or District Councils or Mun-
icipal councils;
Entry into the service of the Ministry of Foreign
Affairs.
An application for naturalisation must be submitted
to the Ministry of Foreign Affairs direct or through
the governoes or goveners General, and be accomp_
anied by the following documents,
Certified copy of the identity papers of the applic-
- Z61 -http://www.rezabastani.ir
2.
Article 984.
ant, his wife and children;
Certificate from the police stating the period of res-
idence in Iran of the applicant, his. freedom from
evil records, possession of sufficient property or of
employment which ensures a livelihood The Minist -
ry of Foreign Affairs will complete. if neessary,
the particulars concerning the applicant and will send
the papers to the Council of for an appropriate dec-
ision rejecting or acceting the application, If the app·
ropriate is accepted a document of nationality will
be delivered to the applicant.
The wife and minor children of those who obtain
Iranian nationality in accordance withe this law wil
be recognised as Iranian nationals; but the wife can
submit, within one year of the date of issue of nat-
ionality papers to her husband. and the minor chil-
dren can submit, within one year after reaching the
full age of 18, a written declaration to the Ministry
of Foreign Affairs acception the former nationality of
her husband or the father as the case may be' pro-
vided, however, that the certificate mentioned in Art-
icle 977 is attached to the declaration of the children
whether male or female.
Article 985,Adoption of Iranian nationality by the father in no
way affects the nationalita of his children who may
have attained the full age of 18 at the date of his
application for naturalisation.
Article 986.A non-Iranian wife who may have acquired Iranian
nationality by marriage, can revert to her from nati-
onality after divorce or the death of her husband,
provided that she informs the Ministry of Foreign
Affairs in Writing of the fact; but a widow who
has children from her former husband cannot take
advantage of this right so long as her children have
not attaind the full age of 18.
- 260 •http://www.rezabastani.ir
In any case, a woman who may acquire · foreign
nationality accordinf to this Article cannot possess
properties except withing the limits fixed for foreign
nationals. If she posseses landed properties more
than those allowed in the case of foreign nationals,
or if subsequenty she comes into possession by
inheritance of land properties exceeding that limit, she
must transfer by some way or other to Iranian
nationals the surplus amount of landed properties
within one year from the date of her renunciation
of Iranian nationality or within one year frame the
date of her acquiring the inheritad property. Failing
this, the properties in question will be sold under
the supervision of the local public prosecutor and the
proceeds will be paid to her after the deduction of
expenses of sale.
Article 987,An Iranian woman marrying a foreign national will
retain her Iranian nationality unless according to the
law of the husband the letter's nationality is imposed
by marriage upon the wife.
But in any case, after the death of the husband
or after divorce or separation, she will re - acquire
her original nationality together with all rights
and privileges appertaining to it by the mere
submission of an to the Ministry of Foreign Affairs,
to which should be annexed a certificate of the death
of her husband or the document establishing the
separation.
Note:If the Law of nationality
(1).
of the country of the
husband leaves the wife free to preserve her former
nationality or to acquire the nationality of her hus -
band, the Iranian wife who opts to acquire the nat-
ionality of herhusband and who has proper reasons
for doing so can apply inwriting to the Ministry of
Foreign Affairs and the Ministry can accord her request.
- 259 -(2). Iranian woman http://www.rezabastani.ir
who acquire foreign nationality by
marriage have not the right to possess landed prop-
erties except whose which they possessed at the time
of their marriage. This right, however, cannot be
transferred to foreign heirs.
The stipulations of Article 988 so far as they conc-
ern going out of Iran do not apply to the woman
above-mentioned.
Article 988.
1.
2.
3.
4.
Remarks:
ft'anian nationals cannot abandon their nationality
except on the following conditions: -
That they have reached the full age of 25.
That the Council of Ministers has allowed their
renunciation of their Iranian nationality.
That they have previously undertaken to transfer, by
some means or other, to Iranian nationals, within one
year from the date of the renunciation of their Ira-
nian nationality, all the rights that they possuss on
landed properties in Iran or which they may acquire
by inheritance although Iranian laws may have alto_
wed the possession of the same propertie11 in the he
case of foreign nationals. The wife and children of the
person who renounces his nationality according to
this Article do not lose their Iranian nationality, whe-
ther the children are minors or of age, unlees the
permission of the Council of Ministers allows .them
to renounce their nationality:
That they have terminated active military service.
Tose who may venture to apply for the renunciation
of their Iranian nationality according to this article
in favour of a foreign nationality must, besides car-
rying out the stipulations of item 3 of this Atricle,
leave Iran within one year. If they fail to do so, the
proper authorities will issue orders for their expulsion
and the sale of their properties.
Such persons must ootain special perimission from
· 258 ·http://www.rezabastani.ir
the Council of Ministers if they wish to come to
Iran in future and the permission will be only
issued once and for a specified duration of time.
Article 989.
In case any Iranian subject acquired foreign nationa-
lity after the solar year 1280 (1901-1902) without
the observance of legale stipulations, his foreign nat.
ionality will be considered null and void and he will
be regarded as an Iran subject. Nevertheless, all his
landed properties will be sold under the supervision
of the local public prosecutor and tho proceeds will
be paid to him after the deduction of the expenses
of sale, He is, furthermore, debarred from attaining
the position of Cahinet Minister or Assistant Minis-
ter or of membership of the Legislative Assemblies,
Provincial and District Councils and Municipal Coun_
cils, or any other Governmental positions.
Article 990.Iranian subjects who may have personally, or whose
fathers my have, renounced Iranian nationality in
accordance with the legal stipulatios and who may
wish to re-acquire their original nationality can be
reinstated in their Iranian nationality by mere appli-
cation unless the Government may deem the grant of
their application to be inadvisable.
Article 991.Particulars and instruction concerning the enforcem_
ent of the Nationality Law and the exaction of the
•Chancellerie» fees in the case of those who may
apply for naturalistaion as Iranian nationals, or ren-
un,:iation of Iranian or retention of original nationa-
lity, will be specified in regulations which will have
to be sanctioned by the Council of Ministers.
- 257 -http://www.rezabastani.ir
II"'! lei 4 ..:,1 ,;) j..>..o .:,_,j li
<24)
IRANIAN CIVIL CODE
BOOK 3
DOCUMENTS OF IDENTITY ( SIJILL )
Article 992,
Article 993.
(1).
(2),
(3).
Article 994,
Article 995,
Article 996,
Article 997.
The document of identity of every person will be
established by record in books designated for this
matter.
The following events must be notified to the Census
office during the proper period and in the way stipu-
lated by special laws and regulation.
All births and all premature births which may occur
after the 6th month from the date of conception.
Marriages, whether permanant or temporary:
Divorces, whether permanent or revocable or divorce
by way of waiving the remainder of the period of a
temporary marriage.
A verdict of presumptive death of a disappeared person
which is issued according to the stipulations of book
5, Vol. 2 of this law must be registered in the Cen-
sus Books,
Alterations in the entries in the sijill books cannot
be made unless by verdict of court.
If the inaccuracy of the facts declared to the Sijill
Office is proved in a court or the identity of a
person entered in the Sijill books as unknown is
established or the verdict of presumptive death of a
disappeared person is reversed, the facts must - be
entered in the proper Sijill books.
Every person must a family name, The selection of
certain special names which are laid down in regula-
tions of the Sijill Office is forbidden.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 998.
Any person whose family name has been adopted
without right by someone else can sue that person
under the relevant laws and demand that he should
change that family name.
If a person changes, according to relevant regulations
his family name duly registered in ths Sijill Office,
every interested person can protest against this act
during the period, and in the manner stipulated in
the relevant laws and regulations.
Article 999. The document of birth of the persons whose birth.
has been declared within the legal period to tho
S1jill Offices is considered to be an official document.
Article 1000. Other matters concerning Census certificates ( Sijill i
Ahval ) will be dealt with in the special laws and
regulations.
Article 1001. Iranian Consular Officers abroad must fulfil in respect
of Iranian residing within their jurisdiction the duties
which are under the charge of the Sijill Offices acco-
rding to the relevant laws and regulations.
BOOK 4 • ON DOMICIL
Article 1002, The domicile of every person is the place wherein
he lives and where also is the principal centre of hi.s
affairs. If the place of residence of a person is di-
fferent from the principal centre of his affairs, the
latter will be considered as his domicile. Tho domicile
of judicial persons is the center of their activities.
Article 1003. No one can have more than one domicile.
Article 1004. Change of domicile will take place on genuine resi-
dence in another place provided that the principal
center of affairs of the person concerned is also
transferred to that place.
Article 1005. The domicile of a married woman is the same as
that' of her husband. Nevertheless where the husband
has no known domicile and also when the ,vife has
a separate domicile with the consent of her husband
or by sanction of a court, she can have a separate
domicile.
Article 1006, The domicile of a minor child or a ward is the same
as that of the guardian or legal reprsentative,http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 1007, The domicile of government officials is the
place
where they have their permanent post.
Article 1008, The domiciln of military persons who are in a garr -
ison is the place of their garrison.
Article 1009. In case of grown up perrons who ordinarily work
with or for others and who live in the house of
their employers or masters, their domicile is the same
as that of their employers or masters,
Article 1010. If in the courses of a transaction or agrement both
parties or one the parties to it have chosen a domi-
cile other than their for the fufilment of the obliga-
tions involved in that transaction or agreement, the
domicile in respct to all claims concerning that tran-
saction will be the domicile appointed.
The same will apply if a place other than their real
dwelling place is appointed for the service of papers
concerning Law-suits, summonses, and wranings.-
-
------
- '
- _______..._..-
http://www.rezabastani.ir
IRANIAN BAR ASSOCIATION.
§(CillEN1flFil[(C, 1LlEGAJL ANll]) (CJR[1f[[:Ail,
No. 108
21 March - 21 June 1968
(
25
)
Vol.
20
Iranian Civil Code
BOOK Five
Concerning Missing Persons Whose Whereabouts
Are Unknown
Article 1011.
Article 1012.
A missing person whose whereabouts are unknown is
a person who has been absent for a comparatively
long duration of time and no news whatever have
been received from hirn.
If tlie Missing person whose whereabouts are unknown
has left no advice for the administration of his estate
or affairs and there may be no persen legally in a
position to take charge of his affairs, the court will
nominate a trustee for the administration of his estate.
Application for the appointment of the trustee will only
be accepted from the public prosecutor and the pe!'son
interested in the matter.
(1)http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 1013.
The Court can dfllnand from the trustee whom it
,1ppoints to produce a guarantor or to produce other
security.
Article 1014. lf one of the heirs of the missing person gives a
sufficient guarantee, the Court cannot appoint another
trustee and the heir in question will be appointed
in that capacity.
Article !015. The duties and responsibilities of the trustee who is
to be apoointed according to the foregoing articles are
those fixed for a guardian (qayyim).
Article 1016. If both the death and the date of death of the missing
person whose whereabouts are unknown are definitely
established, his estate will be distributed among the
heirs existing at the time of death although one or
several of them may have died subsequent to the date
of the missing person.
Article 1017
If the death of a missing person is established without
possibility of ascertaing the date, the court must
determine the date on which the death became unques-
tionably known and in that case the estate will be
distributed among the heirs who existed at that date.
Article 1018. The stipulations of the above article will also be observed
in the case where a warrant of presumed death of the
missing person is issued.
Article 1019. The warrant of presumed death of a missing person
will be issued in a case where such a duration
of time has elapsed from the date of the last news
received as to his being alive that such a person
would not ordinarily remain alive after that time.
Article 1020 The following cases are of those in whic'1 a missing
person cannot ordinarily be supposed to be alive:
1.
when 10 full years have passed from the date of the
last news re:eived as to the life of the missing person
and at the expiry af the period his age has surpassed 75.
2.
\.Vhen a person was included in an armed force under
any der.omination and disappered during the war and
(2)http://www.rezabastani.ir
till three years after the conclusion of peace no news
are received from him.
If the war is not terminated by the conclusion of a
peace agreement, the period in question must be rec-
koned as five years from the date of conclusion of
the war.
3.
Article 1021.
a.
b.
c.
Article 1022.
When a man engaged in a sea voyage was on bo.ud
of a ship which was wrecked in that voyage ,,nd
three full years have passed from the date of wr,3c-
kage of the ship in question and no news is receved
from him,
In the case of the last item of the above article· if
after the expiry of the following periods of item from
the date of departure of-the ship the latter does not
arrive at its destination, or if it has not returned to
the port of departure in the case where it has set
out without determined destination and there is no
news of its existence, the ship in question will be
considered as destroyed.
For voyages in the Caspian Sea and inside the per_
sian Gulf, one year ;
For voyages in the Sea of Oman, the Indian Ocnan,
the Red Sea, the :Mediterranean Sea, the Black Sea
and the Sea of Azof, two Years .
For voyages in other seas, three years.
If a person meets the danger of death or disappears
m consequence of accidents other than those mentioned
in tims 2 and 3 of Article 1020 or if he has been
in an aeroplane and the latter has disappeare, a
warrrant of his presumed death will only be is:med
when five years have passed from the date when
he met with the danger of death an during that p€riod
no news have been received showing that the man
was still alive.
( 3 )http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 1023.
In cases coming under Articles 1021, and 1022, the
court can only issue the warrant of presumed death
of a missing person when a notice has been published
for three consecutive times each with an interval of
one month from the other on one of the local papers
and onr of the commonly read papers of Tehran
inviting the persons who may have news of the man
to conven their information to the court and when
after the expiry of one year from date of the first
publication of this notice, the fact that the man is
alive in not proved.
Artide 1024.If several persons lose their life in an accident, it
will be presumed that they have all died in one
instant.
The stipulation of this article does not obstruct the
enforcement of Article 873 and 874 of Book one of
this law.
Artic:le 1025.The heirs of a missing person Those whose wherea _
bouts are unknown can apply to the court, before
the issue of the warrant of his presumed death,
asking that this estate may be delivered into their
possession, provided. firstly, that the missing person
has not already appointed a person for the adminis-
tration of his estate and secondly, that two full vears
may have passed from the date that the last news
from the missing man were recived and that during
the period it has not been known whether the man
is still alive or is dead. In respect of this Articles,
the stipulations of Article 1023 concerning the publca-
tion of a notice and the notice of one yearrnust
categorically be observed.
Article 1026.
In the cc:se of the _foregoing article, the heirs should
give guarantee or sufficient security so that in the
event that tl1e_missing man returns or that third parties
( 4)http://www.rezabastani.ir
may have right on the estate they should be respoll-
sible for the estate or for the rights of others in it.
The guarantees will remain valid until the verdict 1)f
presumed death is issued.
Article 1027.
After the issue of the verdict of presumed death Jf
the missing person is found, the persons who ha1e
taken possession of his estate at the tin:e the rnissi:lg
person ts .found, either in original prope'.'ty or tie
equivalent or the income there of.
Article 1028The trustee who is to be appointed for the ad min LS-
tration of the estate of a missing person whose whe-
r,,abouts are unknown must pay of the propel'ty of
the missing person the cost of living ( na!·aguh ) of
the permanent wife or the temporrary wife of the
missing person whose duration or rnBrrisge has not
yet expired and to whom the misabg perscm . l,as
undertaken to pay the cost of living. He should a:so
pay out of the property of the missir:g person i he
cost of living of his children. If any d:lfu·encn ari;es
as to the fixing of ths amount of cost of_ living, ·:he
court must determine the amount.
Article 1029.If a man has been for four full ye,:rs a missing
persons with unknown whereabouts, liis w'.fe can apply
for a divorce The judge will then grant the divorce
subject to the stipulations of Article 'ifl2~'l.
•·
Article 1030.
If the missing person returns after the occarrence of
the divorce and before the expiry of the pf:riod of
(Eddeh) time during which a divorced wife is debarred
from re-marrying according to the Islamic law he has
the right to cancel the divorce (ruju) but if the Ed:leh
period has already, he forfeits the right or ruju.
( 5 )Article 1031.Relationship is of two kinds : Relationship by b!ood
and relation5hip by marriage.
Article 1032.Relationship by blood involves the following order of
precedence First class : Jather, mother, children and
children of children ; Second class; Grandfathers and
grandmothers, brothers and sisters and their children;
Third class: Paternal uncles, paternal aunts, maternal
uncles and maternal aunts and their children.
The degree of relationship by blood in each is deter-
mined by the number of genetations in that class.
For example, in the first class, the relation of the
father and the mother to their children comes first
and the relationship of children between themselves
comes second; in the same way in the second class,
the relation of brother and sister with grand father
alld grandmother comes first and that of the children
of brother and sister with grandfather and father
comes second. And in the third class, the relation of
the uncle and the maternal uncle, and that of the
paternal aunt and the maternal aunt cnme first, and
tbat of their children comes second.
Artide 1033.Every person who is in relation by blood to any
degree and in any lineage with another person will
lwve the :oarne relation by blood in the same degree
and lineage with the husband or ·wife of that person
as the case may be. The father - in - !aw of aman
therefGre, constitute his relations of the first degree
and the brother and the sister of the husband of a
woman constitute her relations by marriage of the
S0"'0Dd
-'oo,·ee
.....
.
... ... ,::.~ .
~
( 6 )http://www.rezabastani.ir
IRANIAN
BAR ASSOCIATION
LAW REVIEW
NO. 109 22. JUNE-21 September 1968 Vol. 20
26
PERSIAN
CIVIL CODE
BOOK 7
ON MARRIAGE AND DIVORCE
SECTION I
ON MARRIAGE
Chapter 1
ON ASKING FOR THE HAND
IN MARRIAGE
Article
1034.
It is lawful to ask for the hand
of a woman to
whose marriage there is no obstacle.
3http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article
l O35.
A promise of marriage does not create the matri-
monial relation even though the whole or same of
the dowry fixed for payment at the time of mar-
riage
between
the
two parties may have
been
paid.
Either the man or the woman, therefore,
can, so
long as the ceremonial act of marriage has not
been pronounced, refuse the marriage and the other
party cannot oblige her or him to contract the mar-
riage or claim compensation for losses merely owing
to the refusal.
Article
1036.
If one of the betrothed parties cancels the proposed
marriage without justifiable reason while the other
party or his or her parents or other persons, being
confident that the marriage would take place, may
have incurred expense and spent money, the party
who has cancelled the marriage must pay compensa-
tion for the losses incurred; but the losses m
question
mean
only
expenses
of
a
reasonable
scale .
Article
1037.
Every one of the betrothed parties, can, if the pro-
posed marriage is cancelled, claim the restitution
of the presents given to
the other party or to the
parents for the marriage in question.
If the presents do not exist in original, the clai-
mant is entitled to ask for their value of the
presents which are ordinarily preserved unless the
same
presents have
been destroyed
without any
fault of the party who was in their possession.
Article
10 38.
The stipulation of the foregoing article does not
apply as far as it concerns the payment of equivalent
value in a case where the proposed marriage does
4http://www.rezabastani.ir
not take place in consequence of the death of one
of the betrothed perso11s.
Article 1039.
The period of prescription for the filling of suits
arising out of the breaking up of a proposed mar-
riage is two years which must be reckoned from
the time when the marriage was actually bro-
ken up.
Article 1040.
Each one of the
parties
concerned
can, with a
view to contracting marriage, ask the other party
to produce a certifcate of a doctor showing the
freedom of the person concerned from senous
contagious diseases such as syphilis, gonorrhoea
and consumption.
Chapter 2
MEDICAL FITNESS FOR MARRIAGE
Article 1041.
Marringe of femal before reaching the full age of
15 and that of males before reaching the full
age of 18 is forbidden. Nevertheless, m cases
where proper reasons justify it, on the proposal
of the public prosecutor and by sanction of the
Court, exemption from age restriction can be ac-
corded, but in any case the exemption cannot be
granted to females below the full age of 13 and
to males below the full age of 15.
Article 1042.
After reaching the full age of 15 even, females
cannot marry without the permission of their
guardian so Jong as
they have
not
reached
the
full age of 18.
Article
1043.
The marriage of a girl who has not married pre-
viously is depenent on the pemissfon of her f.ather
5http://www.rezabastani.ir
or grandfather on her father's side even if she has
reached the full age if 18. If, however, the father
or the grandfather on the father's side withhold
the permission without justifiable reason, the girl
can refer to the
marriage
registry,
giving
full
particulars of the man whom she wants to marry
and also the terms of the marriage and the
dowry money agreed upon. and notify her father
or her grandfather on the father's side through
that registry of the foregoing particulars. The
registry in question can perform the ceremonies
of the marriage act after 15 days from the date
of the notification. The information could be
conveyed to the father or the grandfather through
means other than the marriage Registry but it
must be established that the information was actually
conveyed.
Article
1044. In the case of the foregoing article, it
noted that the permission must be
1s
to be
given by
the
person of the father or the grandfather on the
father's side, and if they are under restraint for
some reason, there is no need for permission from
the guardian.
Chapter 3
ON IMPEDIMENTS TO HARRIAGE
Article I 045.
Marriage with the following relations by blood is
forbidden, even if the
doubt or adultery :
1.
6
relationship
1s
based
Marriage with father or grandfathers,
on
motherhttp://www.rezabastani.ir
or grandmothers, or
whatever generation.
to
their ancestorsto
orto
2.:Marriage with children,
whatever generation.
descenda.nts
3.Marriage with the brother and sister and
their children, or their descendants to what-
ever generation.
4.
Marriag with one's
own paternal aunts and
and those of one's father,
maternal aunts
mother, grandfathers and grandmothers.
Article I 046.
Foster-relationship
is the same as
blood as far as impediments
concerned, provided that:
Firstly :
to
relationship by
marriage
are
The milk of the woman takes its source
from a legitimate conception;
Seconoly:
The milk is sucked directly from the
breast;
Thirdly:The child has at least had full milk
for 24 hours (one night and one day)
or for fifteen consecutives times without
taking in between any other food or
the milk of another woman;
Fourthly:The child has taken the
it has reached the full
milk before
age of two
years ( from i ts birth) ; and
Fifthly:
The milk taken by the
child
IS
from
the same woman with the same hus-
band. If therefore a child takes during·
twentyfour hours some milk from one
woman and some
from
another,
this
7http://www.rezabastani.ir
fact does not debar marriage even if
the two wemen have a
band.
In the same way,
daughter and
if
a
woman
a foster-son whom
common hus-
has
a
foster-
she has milked
each from the milk belonging to a separate hus-
band, that son and daughter comnot be consider-
ed as foster brother and sister and their marriage
1s not prohibited for this reason.
Article IO 4 7.
Marriage between the following
persons
1s
per-
manently forbidden because of reltaionship by mar-
riage:
1.
Marriage between a man and
law or his
grandmother-in-law
whether the relationship is
relationship;
2.
Marriage
by
his mother-in-
of
any
blood
degree,
or foster-
between a man and woman
who
has formerly been the wife of his father or of
one of his grandfathers, or of his son or of one
of his grandchildren even though the relationship
may be of the foster kind;
3.
Between a man with females of descent from
his wife, no matter of what degree, no exception
being made even if the woman is a foster-relation,
provided that the husband and wife have already
consummated the marriage.
Article 1048.
11arriage of two sisters by one man is forbidden
even if the marriage of each one of
them is
of
the 'Mungati' kind (i.e. a. temporary marriage).
Article
8
l 049.
No one can marry
the daughter of his
brother-http://www.rezabastani.ir
in-law or the daughter of his sister-in-law: unless
his wife permits him to do so.
Article 10.50.
Every person who marries a
woman
knowing
of
the existence of marriage ties binding the wife and
of the prohibtion of his own marriage with that
woman, or who marries a woman who has not yet
passed the period of 'Uddeh' of divorce or of
death ( i. e. period during which a woman is not
allowed to marry after a divorce or after the
death of her husband) with knowledge of the exis-
tence of the 'Uddch' and the prohibtion of the
marriage, his marriage will be null and void and
Article 1051.
the woman in questionwilldefinitelyand per-
manently be incapable
that man.ofbecoming thewife of
The stipulation of the foregoing article
will also
be applicable in the case where the marriage was
solemnised with ignorance
of all or some
of the
facts mentioned in the foregoing Article, and the
marriage has
been consummated.
In the case of
ignorance, but where matrimonial relations have
not taken place, the marriage will be null and
void but marriage between the two does not be-
come permanently prohibited.
Article 1052.
Separation caused by a solemnn imprecation (li'an)
involved a permanent bar to the marriage of the
parties concerned.
Article 1053.
A marriage contract will not be valid while the
party concerned is performing the Mecca , pilgri-
mage ceremonies ( Ihram ) . If the party concerned
marries with knowledge of the
fact
that isuch
a
marriage is prohibited, the marriage will pe bar-
red for ever.http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 1054.
Adultery with a married woman or with a woman
who has not yet passed the period of 'raj-yee Ud-
deh' (i. e. the period during which the husband
can re-marry his wife after the
first or second
divorce; during which period the wife is debarred
from re-marrying) will entail a permanent bar to
the marriage of the parties concerned.
Article 1055.
Sexual intercourse of doubtful nature or by adul-
tery if
preceding marriage is tantamount
to the
existence of marrige as far as prohibition of mar-
riage is concerned but cannot cause cancellation
of the former marriage (sic).
Article 1056.
One who perpetrates
a
shameful act on
a
boy
cannot mary his mother, his sister, or daughter.
Article 10 5 7.
A woman
who
has
been the wife of a man for
three cansecutive times and has been divorced
each time will become unlawful a:s wife to that
man unless she is married by permanent marriage
to another man and, after matrimonial
relations
with that man, separation occurs between them by
divorce or cancellation of the marriage or death.
Article 1058.
The wife of a person who has been divorced from
him nine times, six of which were 'Uddi divorce'
(divorce after
which
the
wife must
not marry
another man for a number of months) will be il-
legal as wife to that man for ever.
Article 1059.
Marriage of a female Moslem with a non-Moslem
is not allowed.
Article 1060.
Marriage of an Iranian woman with
national is dependent,
foreign
even in cases where there
is no legal impediment, upon special
of the government.
IO
a
permissionhttp://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 1061
.The government can make the marriage of qertain
government servants and officials and students
supported by the government with a female ~oreign
national dependent upon special permission.·
Chapter 4
CIRCUMSTANCES
NECESSARY
FOR LEGALITY OF MARRIAGE
Arricle 1062.
Marriage takes place by proposal and acceptance
(form of an Islamic marriage contract by which
a Mullah representing one party makes the pro-
posal and another Mullah representing the other
accepts i tl in words which explicitly convey the
intention of marriage.
Article 1063.
The proposal and acceptance may be uttered by
the man and woman themselves or by persons who
are legal! y entitled to perform the act.
Article 1064.
The person who performs the act must be sane 111
mind, of legal age, and capable of forming a de-
cision.
Article 1065.
It is a necessary condition for the validity
of a
marriage that acceptance should follow close upon
proposal, in accordance with custom.
Article 1066.
If one or both of the parties to the marriage are
dumb, the ceremony can be conducted by signs
made by the dumb person or persons provided
that the signs clearly convey the intention of en-
tering upon the contract of marriage.
Article 1067.
It is a necessary condition forthe validity of a mar-
11http://www.rezabastani.ir
riage that the wife and husband should be so de-
clared that
neither party is In doubt as
to the
identity of the other.
Article 1068.
Making conditions 1n the
marriage contract will
render it void.
Article 1069.
A provision
Ill
the
marriage
contract
reserving
the right of cancellation of the contract, if made,
wi 11 be null and void. But in a permanent
mar-
riage, a provision entitling one of the parties to
withhold the dowry (sudaq) is permissible provid-
ed that duration of this right is definitely men-
tioned.
After cancellation of the grant of dowry
( sudaq ) the situation will be as if no dowry is
mentioned in the contract of marriage.
Article 1070.
Consent of
the
marring
parties is the condition
upon which depends the enforcement (nufuz) of the
marriage
contract,
and
if a
party showing at
first reluctance authorises the making of the con-
tract subsequently,
the contract will be
binding
unless the relutance is so acute that the reluctant
person cannot be
considered
as having been
In
possession of any intention.
Chapter 5
DEPUTING A THIRD PARTY
FOR
GIVING CONSENT TO MARRIAGE
Article 10 7 1.
Either the man or woman can depute a third par-
ty with power to contract the marriage.
12http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 10 7 2.If power 1s given without conditions as to the
identity of the husband, the attorney cannot him-
self marry his principal under that power unless
this permission is exp! ici tl y given to him in the
power of attorney.
Article 1073.If the attorney does not observe what hisprinci-
pal has laid down in connection with theperson
or the dowry or other particulars, the authentici-
ty of the marriage will depend upon corrobora-
tion from the principal.
Article 10 7 4.
The provisions of the preceding Article will also
be binding where the power was without any re-
servation and the attorney did not act according
to the best interests of his principal.
Chapter 6
ON TEMPORARY MARRIAGE
Article 1075.
Marriage is called « mungati », (liable to be ter-
minated) when it is for a limited period of time.
Article 10 7 6.
The duration of the temporary marriage must be
definitely determined.
Article 10 7 7.
In the case of temporary marriage, provisions
concerning inheritance of the wife and her dowry
are the same as fixed in the chapter on ' Inheri-
tance' and in the following chapter.
Chapter 7
ON THE DOWRY (Mahr)
Article 1078.
Anything which can be called property and which
13http://www.rezabastani.ir
can be owned and possessed can be designated as
a marriage portion.
Article 1079.
The marriage portion must be known to the mar-
rying parties to the extent that their ignorance
is removed.
Article 10 80.
Fixing of the amount of marriage portion depends
upon the mutual consent of the marrying parties.
Article 1081. If a condition is laid 1n the marriage act that if
the marriage portion 1s not paid within a fixed
period the marriage will be cancelled, the mar-
riage and the marriage portion will remain bind-
ing and authentic but the condition will be null
and void.
Ar,icle 1082.
Immediately after the performance of the mar-
riage ceremony the wife becomes the owner of the
marriage portion and can dispose of it in any way
and manner that she may like.
Article 1083.
A duration of time or instalments can be
for the payment of the marriage portion,
fixed
as a
whole or in parts.
Article l O84.
If the marriage portion consist of a designated pro-
perty and it is found out that before the celebration
of the marriage that property was defective, or
that
after the
marriage
celebration and
before
the delivery of the property it became defective
or
it
was
destroyed,
the husband is
liable to
compensation for the defective part or the
of the property if destroyed.
Article 108 5.
14
value
So long as the marriage portion is not delivered
to her, the wife can refuse to fulfil the duties
which she has to her husband, provided however
that the marriage portion is payable at once.http://www.rezabastani.ir
NOORMAGShttp://www.rezabastani.ir
circumstances and peculiarities concerning her in
comparison with her equals and relatives and
also the customs of the locality, etcetera, must be
considered.
Article 1092.If the husband divorces his wife before the consum-
mation of marriage, the wife will be entitled to
half of the marriage portion and if the husband
has already paid more than half of the marriage
portion he has the right to demand the return
of the surplus, in original, in the equivalent, or
1n value.
Article I 093.If no marriage portion 1s mentioned in the act
of marriage and the husband divorces his wife
before the consummation of marriage and the
fixing of the marriage portion, the wife is entitled
to "Mahr-ul-Mut'eh" (marriage
portion due
to
the wife in respect of the social station of the
husband) and if she is divorced after the consum-
mation of marriage, she will be entitled to a
"Mahr-ul-Misl''.
Article 1094.The status of the man 1n respect of wealth or
poverty will be considered in fixing "Mahr-ul-
Mut'eh ''.
Article I 095.Absence of marriage portion 1n the act of a
temporary marriage will render the contract
void.
Article 1096.
The death of the
wife in a
temporary
marriage
during the period of marriage will not cause the
forfeiture of the marriage portion; the same will
be true if the husband did not have any relations
with her up to the end of the period of the
marriage.
Article 10 9 7.
16
If the husband resigns his
rights
to
the
wholehttp://www.rezabastani.ir
period of marriage in a temporary marriage before
having any relations with the wife, he must pay
half of the marriage portion.
Aritcle 1098.
If the marriage, whether temporary or permanent,
was void, and there has not been any matrimonial
relations, the wife will not be
entitled
to
any
marriage money and the husband can demand the
refund
of
the
marriage money
if it
has
been
paid.
Article 1099.
If the wife was ignorant of the fact that the mar-
riage
was
unauthentic,
and
if
1n
such
case
matrimonial relations have occurred, the wife will
be entitled to «Mahr-ul-Misl».
Article 1100.
If the specified marriageportion 1s unknownor
if it isnature thatbe
not of
such a
it
can
owned or if it belongs to someone else, the wife
will be entitled in the first two cases to ''l\Jahr-
ul-Misl" and in the third case to the equivalent
of the value of the property which proved to be
that of a third party, unless the latter authorises
the transfer.
Article 1101.
If the marriage 1s cancelled before matrimonial
relation for any reason, the wife is not entitled
to any marriage portion. If the reason of cancel-
lation is impotency, the wife will be entitled to
half of the marriage
money
notwithstanding the
cancellation of the marriage.
17http://www.rezabastani.ir
Chapter 8
RECIPROCAL DUTIES AND RIGHTS
OF PARTIES TO A MARRIAGE
Article
1102.
takes
marriage
As soon as
place
relations of matrimony will
between
the
reciprocal
marring
duties of
due form,
In
automatically exist
and
parties
husband
rights
and
will be
and wife
established between them.
Article
l I 03.
Husband and wife are bound to treat each other as
good companions.
Article 1104.
Husband and wife must co-operate with each other
for the welfare of their family and the education
of their children.
Article 1105.
In relations between husband and wife, the position
of the head of the family is the exclusive
of the husband.
Article 1106.
The cost of maintenance of the
wife
right
is at
the
charge of the husband in permanent marriage.
Article 110 7.
Cost
of maintenance includes
dwelling,
clothig,
food, furniture in proporation to the situation of
the wife, on a reasonable basis, and provision of a
servant if the wife is accustomed to have servants
Article 1108.
or if she needs one
of limbs.because of illness or
If theto fulfil
wife
refuses
duties
defects
of a
wife
without legitimate excuse, she will not be entitled
to the cost of maintenance.
18http://www.rezabastani.ir
Article 1109.
Cost of maintenance of a divorced wife in a case
where remarrying could take place and during
the period of «uddeh» is to be borne by the hus-
band, unless the divorce has taken place because
of disobedience. But if the «uddeh» araises
from
the cancellation of the marriage or a definite and
final divorce, the wife is not entitled to cost of
mainance, unless she is with child from her hus-
band in which case she will be enti tied
to
cost
of maintenance till her child is born.
Article 1110.
The wife is not entitled to
cost of
maintenance
if she is passing through the «uddeh» period due
to the death of her husband.
Article 1111.
The wife can refer to the Court if her
husband
refuses to provide for her maintenance. In such a
case the court will fix the amount and will com-
pel the husband to pay it.
Article
1112.
If the
enforcement
impossible, the
of
the
foregoing
Article is
provisions of Article 1129
must
be followed.
Article 1113.
In the case of a temporary marriage the wife is
not entitled to the cost of maintenance, unless
provision has been specially made for this, or
the marriage has been arranged on this condition.
Article 1114.
The wife must stay 1n the dwelling that tlw hus-
band allots for her unless such a right is reserved
to the wife.
Article 1115.
If the existence of the wife and husband in the
same house involves the risk of bodily or financial
injury or that to the
dignity
of
the
wife,
she
can choose a seprate dwelling; and if the alleged
risk
is proved the court will
not order her
to
19http://www.rezabastani.ir
return to the house of the husband and, so
as she 1s authorised not to return
long
to the house,
her cost of maintenance will be on the charge of
her husband.
Articlt" 1116.
In the case of the foregoing
article, so
long as
the Ii tigation is not concluded between the mar-
ried couple, the dwelling of the wife will be fix-
ed by mutual consent of both parties and failing
such consent, the court will fix the dwelling after
duly obtaining the views of near relatives,
in the
absence of relatives
the court
and
itself will
fix a suitable dwelling.
Articlt" 111 7.
The husband can prevent his wife from occupations
or technical work which is incompatible with the
family interests or the dignity of himself or his wife.
Article 1118.
The wife can · independently do what
shelikes
marriage can stipulateany
with her own property.
Article 1119.
The
parties
to the
condition to the marriage which is
not
incom-
patible with the terms of the Act, either as part
of the marriage contractor
contract: forcan be stipulated
example, it
in
another binding
that
if the husband marries another wife or absents
himself during a certain period, or discontinues
the payment of cost of maintenance, or attempts
the life of his wife or teats her so harshly that
their life together becomes unbearable, the wife has
the power, which, she can also transfer to a third
party by power of attorney to obtain a divorce
herself after establishing in the Court the fact
that one of the foregoing alternatives has occured
and after
effect.
20
the issue of a final
judgment to that
